Missouri, session 2026, HB3329.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 99.1205, 100.260, 100.270, 100.293, 135.313, 135.500, 135.503,
135.505, 135.508, 135.516, 135.517, 135.520, 135.523, 135.526, 135.529, 135.530, 135.535,
135.545, 135.546, 135.679, 135.680, 135.682, 135.700, 135.710, 135.766, 135.800, 135.950,
135.953, 135.957, 135.960, 135.963, 135.967, 135.968, 135.970, 135.973, 135.1125,
137.123, 148.330, 148.350, 173.196, 190.465, 320.092, 320.093, 348.302, 348.304,
348.306, 348.308, 348.310, 348.312, 348.316, 348.318, 620.635, 620.638, 620.641,
620.644, 620.647, 620.650, 620.653, 620.1875, 620.1878, 620.1881, 620.1884, 620.1887,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3329 2
620.1890, 620.1910, 620.2010, 620.2020, and 620.2600, RSMo, and section 348.300 as
enacted by senate bill no. 7, ninety-sixth general assembly, first extraordinary session, and
section 348.300 as enacted by house bill no. 1, ninety-fourth general assembly, first
extraordinary session, are repealed and thirteen new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 100.260, 100.270, 100.293, 135.530, 135.800, 137.123, 148.330, 148.350,
190.465, 320.092, 620.1910, 620.2010, and 620.2020, to read as follows:
100.260. 1. There are hereby created four special funds, to be known as the
"Industrial Development and Reserve Fund", the "Industrial Development Guarantee Fund",
the "Export Finance Fund", and the "Jobs Now Fund", into which the following may be
deposited as and when received and designated for deposit in one of such funds:
(1) Any moneys appropriated by the general assembly for use by the board in
carrying out the powers set forth in sections 100.250 to 100.297;
(2) Any moneys made available through the issuance of revenue bonds under the
provisions of sections 100.250 to [100.295] 100.297;
(3) Any moneys received from grants or which are given, donated, or contributed to
the fund from any source;
(4) Any moneys received in repayment of loans or from application fees, reserve
participation fees, guarantee fees and premium payments as provided for under sections
100.250 to 100.297;
(5) Any moneys received as interest on deposits or as income on approved
investments of the fund;
(6) Any moneys obtained from the issuance of revenue bonds or notes by the board;
(7) Any moneys that were in the industrial development fund authorized by this
section, the economic development reserve authorized by section 620.215, or the industrial
revenue bond guarantee fund authorized by section 620.240, respectively, as of September 28,
1985; and
(8) Any moneys obtained from any other available source.
2. The development and reserve fund, the guarantee fund, the jobs now fund, and the
export finance fund shall be administered by the board as provided in sections 100.250 to
100.297. Separate accounts may be created within the development and reserve fund and the
guarantee fund for moneys specifically appropriated, donated or otherwise received for
industrial development purposes. The board may also create such other separate accounts
within any of such funds as deemed necessary or appropriate by the board to carry out the
duties and purposes of sections 100.250 to 100.297. All such separate accounts may be
administered by a corporate trustee on behalf of the board upon the terms and conditions
established by the board.

HB 3329 3
3. Moneys in the jobs now fund, the development and reserve fund, the guarantee
fund, and the export finance fund shall be invested by the board in the manner prescribed by
the board and any interest earned on invested moneys shall accrue to the benefit of the
respective fund.
4. None of the funds and accounts of the board shall be considered a state fund, and
money deposited therein may not be appropriated therefrom, nor shall any money deposited
therein be subject to the provisions of section 33.080.
5. The commissioner of administration shall annually calculate the increased amount
of revenue to the state treasury due to the provisions of sections 135.155[,] and 135.286[,
135.546, and subsection 7 of section 620.1039,] as enacted or modified by this act and shall
allocate up to twelve million dollars of such revenue to the jobs now fund.
100.270. The board shall have the power to:
(1) Sue and be sued in its official name;
(2) Adopt and use an official seal;
(3) Confer with agencies of the state and development agencies, and with
representatives of business, industry, and labor for the purpose of promoting the economic
development of this state;
(4) Consider and review applications for loans to be made from the development and
reserve fund or for loans, bonds or notes to be made by or secured by the development and
reserve fund, the guarantee fund, the export finance fund or the infrastructure development
fund or any other available money, under sections 100.250 to 100.297, and for grants or loans
to be made by or secured by the jobs now fund;
(5) Enter into agreements with development agencies, borrowers, participating
lenders and others to implement any of the provisions of sections 100.250 to 100.297;
(6) Direct disbursements from the development and reserve fund, the guarantee fund,
the export finance fund, the infrastructure development fund, and the jobs now fund as
provided in sections 100.250 to 100.297;
(7) Administer the development and reserve fund, the guarantee fund, the export
finance fund, the infrastructure development fund, and the jobs now fund and invest any
portion of such funds not required for immediate disbursement in obligations of the United
States, or any agency or instrumentality of the United States, in obligations of the state of
Missouri and its political subdivisions, in certificates of deposit and time deposits or other
obligations of banks and savings and loan associations or in such other obligations as may be
prescribed by the board;
(8) Apply for and accept gifts, grants, appropriations, loans or contributions to the
development and reserve fund, the guarantee fund, the export finance fund, the infrastructure
development fund, and the jobs now fund from any source, public or private, and enter into

HB 3329 4
contracts or other transactions with any federal or state agency, any development agency,
private organization, or any other source in furtherance of the purposes of sections 100.250 to
100.297, and do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid and
cooperation;
(9) Issue, from time to time, its negotiable revenue bonds or notes in such principal
amounts as, in its opinion, shall be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving its
purposes;
(10) Establish reserves to secure bonds, notes and loans issued or made by the board,
development agencies or participating lenders;
(11) Make, purchase, or participate in the making or purchase, of loans, bonds, or
notes to finance the costs of projects;
(12) Procure insurance, letters of credit, or other form of credit enhancement, to
secure the payment of principal and interest on any loans, bonds or notes or other obligations
of the board;
(13) Purchase, receive, take by grant, gift, devise, bequest or otherwise, lease, or
otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, employ, use and otherwise deal in and with, real or
personal property, or any interest therein, wherever situated;
(14) Sell, convey, lease, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of, all or any of its
property, or any interest therein, wherever situated;
(15) Conduct hearings and other methods of examination, and authorize any of its
members to do so, on any matter material for its information and necessary to the exercise of
the duties of the board;
(16) Employ and fix the compensation of an executive director and such other agents
or employees as it considers necessary;
(17) Adopt, alter, or repeal its own bylaws, rules, and regulations governing the
manner in which its business may be transacted;
(18) Assess or charge a fee for each application it receives for funding for a project or
a jobs now project and assess or charge other fees as the board determines to be reasonable to
carry out its purposes, including, but not limited to, fees or premiums for loans made from the
development and reserve fund and the export finance fund and for loans, bonds or notes
secured by the development and reserve fund, the guarantee fund, the export finance fund or
the infrastructure development fund or the jobs now fund;
(19) Make all expenditures which are incident and necessary to carry out its purposes
and powers;
(20) Take such action, enter into such agreements and exercise all other powers and
functions necessary or appropriate to carry out the duties and purposes set forth in sections
100.250 to 100.297;

HB 3329 5
(21) Insure, coinsure, guarantee loans and make loans relating to qualified export
transactions and adopt criteria, by means of rules and regulations, establishing which
exporters shall be eligible for the insurance, coinsurance, loan guarantees and loans which
may be extended by the board;
(22) Do all things necessary to ensure full participation by the state of Missouri in any
federal program which may relate to the construction, repair, replacement or further
development of the infrastructure of the state and its political subdivisions;
(23) Receive funds from the federal government for deposit into the infrastructure
development fund or the jobs now fund and authorize disbursements therefrom. The board
may enter into agreements with agencies of the federal government and may, on behalf of the
state of Missouri, do all things necessary to ensure full participation by the state of Missouri
in any federal program which may relate to the repair, replacement or further development of
the infrastructure of the state and its political subdivisions;
(24) Set guidelines and priorities for loans, loan guarantees or grants from the
infrastructure development fund. The board is the sole state agency authorized to set such
guidelines and priorities with respect to the infrastructure development fund on behalf of the
state or any of its political subdivisions, and loans, loan guarantees, or grants shall only be
made upon approval of the board;
(25) Make equity investments in or otherwise acquire ownership interests in: for-
profit and not-for-profit federal- or state-authorized community development corporations;
small business investment companies, including minority or specialized small business
investment companies; and microloan corporations and similar lending institutions, when
such investments are deemed to enhance the benefit of the public;
(26) Make investments in Missouri certified capital companies, as defined [by] under
this subdivision [(5) of subsection 2 of section 135.500], or other investment companies for
investment in qualified Missouri businesses, as defined [by] under this subdivision [(14) of
subsection 2 of section 135.500]. All investments made by the board for the eventual
investment in qualified Missouri businesses shall be matched by an equivalent investment
made by the certified capital company or other investment firm for investment into qualified
Missouri businesses. All investments made into Missouri qualified businesses under the
provisions of this subdivision shall be in the form of equity or unsecured debt financing. No
investment shall be made by the board under the provisions of this subdivision without the
approval of the director of the department of economic development. For the purposes of
this subdivision the following terms mean:
(a) "Certified capital company", any partnership, corporation, trust, or limited
liability company, whether organized on a profit or not-for-profit basis, that is located,

HB 3329 6
100 headquartered, and registered to conduct business in Missouri and has as its primary
101 business activity the investment of cash in qualified Missouri businesses;
102 (b) "Qualified Missouri business", an independently owned and operated
103 business that is headquartered and located in Missouri and is in need of venture capital
104 and cannot obtain conventional financing. Such business shall have no more than two
105 hundred employees, at least eighty percent of whom are employed in Missouri. Such
106 business shall be involved in commerce for the purpose of manufacturing, processing or
107 assembling products, conducting research and development, or providing services in
108 interstate commerce, but excluding retail, real estate, real estate development,
109 insurance, and professional services provided by accountants, lawyers, or physicians.
110 At the time a certified capital company or qualified investing entity makes an initial
111 investment in a business, such business shall be a small business concern that meets the
112 requirements of the United States Small Business Administration's qualification size
113 standards for its venture capital program, as defined in Section 13 CFR 121.301(c) of
114 the Small Business Investment Act of 1958, as amended. Any business that is classified
115 as a qualified Missouri business at the time of the first investment in such business by a
116 Missouri certified capital company or qualified investing entity shall, for a period of
117 seven years from the date of such first investment, remain classified as a qualified
118 Missouri business and may receive follow-on investments from any Missouri certified
119 capital company or qualified investing entity and such follow-on investments shall be
120 qualified investments regardless of whether such business meets the other qualifications
121 of this subsection at the time of such follow-on investments; and
122 (27) Make loans and grants from the jobs now fund in accordance with the provisions
123 of section 100.293.
100.293. 1. This section[,] and section 100.277[, and sections 135.950 to 135.973]
shall be known and may be cited as the "Jobs Now Act".
2. There shall be created a "Jobs Now Recommendation Committee", comprised of
representatives of the department of economic development, the department of agriculture,
the department of natural resources, and the department of transportation. The committee
shall establish application materials and procedures for development agencies to apply to the
board for grants or low-interest or interest-free loans for the purpose of funding jobs now
projects.
3. Applications shall be submitted simultaneously to the committee and the board.
The committee shall review the applications and prepare and submit analyses and
recommendations to the board for a determination as to approval or denial of grants or
loans from the jobs now fund.

HB 3329 7
4. In reviewing applications, the board shall give preference to redevelopment
projects that protect natural resources or rehabilitate existing dilapidated or inadequate
infrastructure in areas defined under section 135.530.
5. After reviewing applications and such other information as the board may require,
the board may grant all or a part of a grant or loan request, provided the board determines:
(1) The jobs now project:
(a) Will not happen without the grant or loan from the board; or
(b) Will have a significant local economic impact; or
(c) Demonstrates high levels of job creation;
(2) In the case of a low-interest or interest-free loan, the jobs now project will
generate sufficient revenues or the borrower will otherwise have sufficient revenues available
to enable the borrower to repay the loan to the jobs now fund, along with any interest to be
charged; and
(3) No loan or grant may exceed two million dollars.
135.530. For the purposes of sections [100.010,] 100.710, 100.850, 135.110,
[135.200, 135.258, 135.313,] 135.403, 135.405, [135.503,] 135.530, [135.545,] and 215.030,
[348.300, 348.302, and 620.1400 to 620.1460,] "distressed community" means either a
Missouri municipality within a metropolitan statistical area which has a median household
income of under seventy percent of the median household income for the metropolitan
statistical area, according to the United States Census Bureau's American Community Survey,
based on the most recent of five-year period estimate data in which the final year of the
estimate ends in either zero or five, or a United States census block group or contiguous group
of block groups within a metropolitan statistical area which has a population of at least two
thousand five hundred, and each block group having a median household income of under
seventy percent of the median household income for the metropolitan area in Missouri,
according to the United States Census Bureau's American Community Survey, based on the
most recent of five-year period estimate data in which the final year of the estimate ends in
either zero or five. In addition the definition shall include municipalities not in a metropolitan
statistical area, with a median household income of under seventy percent of the median
household income for the nonmetropolitan areas in Missouri according to the United States
Census Bureau's American Community Survey, based on the most recent of five-year period
estimate data in which the final year of the estimate ends in either zero or five or a census
block group or contiguous group of block groups which has a population of at least two
thousand five hundred with each block group having a median household income of under
seventy percent of the median household income for the nonmetropolitan areas of Missouri,
according to the United States Census Bureau's American Community Survey, based on the
most recent of five-year period estimate data in which the final year of the estimate ends in

HB 3329 8
either zero or five. In metropolitan statistical areas, the definition shall include areas that
were designated as either a federal empowerment zone; or a federal enhanced enterprise
community; or a state enterprise zone that was originally designated before January 1, 1986,
but shall not include expansions of such state enterprise zones done after March 16, 1988.
135.800. 1. The provisions of sections 135.800 to 135.830 shall be known and may
be cited as the "Tax Credit Accountability Act of 2004".
2. As used in sections 135.800 to 135.830, the following terms mean:
(1) "Administering agency", the state agency or department charged with
administering a particular tax credit program, as set forth by the program's enacting
statute; where no department or agency is set forth, the department of revenue;
(2) "Agricultural tax credits", the agricultural product utilization contributor tax credit
created pursuant to section 348.430, the new generation cooperative incentive tax credit
created pursuant to section 348.432, and the family farm breeding livestock loan tax credit
created under section 348.505[, the qualified beef tax credit created under section 135.679,
and the wine and grape production tax credit created pursuant to section 135.700];
(3) "Business recruitment tax credits", the business facility tax credit created pursuant
to sections 135.110 to 135.150 and section 135.258, the enterprise zone tax benefits created
pursuant to sections 135.200 to 135.270, the business use incentives for large-scale
development programs created pursuant to sections 100.700 to 100.850, [the development tax
credits created pursuant to sections 32.100 to 32.125, the rebuilding communities tax credit
created pursuant to section 135.535,] the [film production] show MO act tax credit created
pursuant to section 135.750, [the enhanced enterprise zone created pursuant to sections
135.950 to 135.970, and the Missouri quality jobs program created pursuant to sections
620.1875 to 620.1900] and the Missouri works program established under sections
620.2000 to 620.2020;
(4) "Community development tax credits", the neighborhood assistance tax credit
created pursuant to sections 32.100 to 32.125[,] and the family development account tax
credit created pursuant to sections 208.750 to 208.775[, the dry fire hydrant tax credit created
pursuant to section 320.093, and the transportation development tax credit created pursuant to
section 135.545];
(5) "Domestic and social tax credits", the youth opportunities tax credit created
pursuant to section 135.460 and sections 620.1100 to 620.1103, the shelter for victims of
domestic violence or rape crisis center created pursuant to section 135.550, the senior
citizen or disabled person property tax credit created pursuant to sections 135.010 to 135.035,
the adoption tax credit created pursuant to sections 135.325 to 135.339, the champion for
children tax credit created pursuant to section 135.341, the maternity home tax credit created
pursuant to section 135.600, the surviving spouse tax credit created pursuant to section

HB 3329 9
135.090, the residential treatment agency tax credit created pursuant to section 135.1150, the
pregnancy resource center tax credit created pursuant to section 135.630, the food pantry tax
credit created pursuant to section 135.647, the residential dwelling access tax credit created
pursuant to section 135.562, the developmental disability care provider tax credit created
under section 135.1180, the shared care tax credit created pursuant to section 192.2015, [the
health, hunger, and hygiene tax credit created pursuant to section 135.1125,] and the diaper
bank tax credit created pursuant to section 135.621;
(6) "Entrepreneurial tax credits", the capital tax credit created pursuant to sections
135.400 to [135.429] 135.432, [the certified capital company tax credit created pursuant to
sections 135.500 to 135.529, the seed capital tax credit created pursuant to sections 348.300
to 348.318, the new enterprise creation tax credit created pursuant to sections 620.635 to
620.653,] the research tax credit created pursuant to section 620.1039, andthe small business
incubator tax credit created pursuant to section 620.495[, the guarantee fee tax credit created
pursuant to section 135.766, and the new generation cooperative tax credit created pursuant to
sections 32.105 to 32.125];
(7) "Environmental tax credits", [the charcoal producer tax credit created pursuant to
section 135.313,] the wood energy tax credit created pursuant to sections 135.300 to 135.311
[, and the alternative fuel stations tax credit created pursuant to section 135.710];
(8) "Financial and insurance tax credits", the bank franchise tax credit created
pursuant to section 148.030, the bank tax credit for S corporations created pursuant to section
143.471, the exam fee tax credit created pursuant to section 148.400, the health insurance
pool tax credit created pursuant to section 376.975, the life and health insurance guaranty
association tax credit created pursuant to section 376.745, the property and casualty guaranty
association tax credit created pursuant to section 375.774, and the self-employed health
insurance tax credit created pursuant to section 143.119;
(9) "Housing tax credits", the neighborhood preservation tax credit created pursuant
to sections 135.475 to 135.487, the low-income housing tax credit created pursuant to
sections 135.350 to 135.363, and the affordable housing tax credit created pursuant to
sections 32.105 to 32.125;
(10) "Recipient", the individual or entity who both:
(a) Is the original applicant for a tax credit; and
(b) Who directly receives a tax credit or the right to transfer a tax credit under a tax
credit program, regardless as to whether the tax credit has been used or redeemed; a recipient
shall not include the transferee of a transferable tax credit;
(11) "Redevelopment tax credits", the historic preservation tax credit created pursuant
to sections 253.545 to 253.559, the brownfield redevelopment program tax credit created
pursuant to sections 447.700 to 447.718, the community development corporations tax credit

HB 3329 10
created pursuant to sections 135.400 to [135.430] 135.432, the infrastructure tax credit
created pursuant to subsection 6 of section 100.286, the bond guarantee tax credit created
pursuant to section 100.297, and the disabled access tax credit created pursuant to section
135.490[, the new markets tax credit created pursuant to section 135.680, and the distressed
areas land assemblage tax credit created pursuant to section 99.1205];
(12) "Tax credit program", any of the tax credit programs included in the definitions
of agricultural tax credits, business recruitment tax credits, community development tax
credits, domestic and social tax credits, entrepreneurial tax credits, environmental tax credits,
housing tax credits, redevelopment tax credits, and training and educational tax credits;
(13) "Training and educational tax credits", the Missouri [works] one start new jobs
tax credit and Missouri [works] one start retained jobs credit created pursuant to sections
620.800 to 620.809.
137.123. 1. Beginning January 1, 2022, for purposes of assessing all real property,
excluding land, or tangible personal property associated with a project that uses wind energy
directly to generate electricity, thirty-seven and one-half percent of the original costs shall be
the true value in money of such property. Such value shall begin the year immediately
following the year of construction of the property. The original costs shall reflect either:
(1) The actual and documented original property cost to the taxpayer, as shall be
provided by the taxpayer to the assessor; or
(2) In the absence of actual and documented original property cost to the taxpayer, the
estimated cost of the property by the assessor, using an authoritative cost guide.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a project from engaging in
enhanced enterprise zone agreements [under sections 135.950 to 135.973] or similar tax
abatement agreements with state or local officials or to affect any existing enhanced
enterprise zone agreements.
148.330. 1. Every such company shall, on or before the first day of March in each
year, make a return, verified by the affidavit of its president and secretary, or other authorized
officers, to the director of the department of commerce and insurance stating the amount of all
premiums received on account of policies issued in this state by the company, whether in cash
or in notes, during the year ending on the thirty-first day of December, next preceding. Upon
receipt of such returns the director of the department of commerce and insurance shall verify
the same and certify the amount of tax due from the various companies on the basis and at the
rates provided in section 148.320, and shall certify the same to the director of revenue
together with the amount of the quarterly installments to be made as provided in subsection 2
of this section, on or before the thirtieth day of April of each year.
2. Beginning January 1, 1983, the amount of the tax due for that calendar year and
each succeeding calendar year thereafter shall be paid in four approximately equal estimated

HB 3329 11
quarterly installments, and a fifth reconciling installment. The first four installments shall be
based upon the tax for the immediately preceding [taxable] tax year ending on the thirty-first
day of December, next preceding. The quarterly installments shall be made on the first day of
March, the first day of June, the first day of September and the first day of December.
Immediately after receiving certification from the director of the department of commerce
and insurance of the amount of tax due from the various companies the director of revenue
shall notify and assess each company the amount of taxes on its premiums for the calendar
year ending on the thirty-first day of December, next preceding. The director of revenue shall
also notify and assess each company the amount of the estimated quarterly installments to be
made for the calendar year. If the amount of the actual tax due for any year exceeds the total
of the installments made for such year, the balance of the tax due shall be paid on the first day
of June of the year following, together with the regular quarterly payment due at that time. If
the total amount of the tax actually due is less than the total amount of the installments
actually paid, the amount by which the amount paid exceeds the amount due shall be credited
against the tax for the following year and deducted from the quarterly installment otherwise
due on the first day of June. If the March first quarterly installment made by a company is
less than the amount assessed by the director of revenue, the difference will be due on June
first, but no interest will accrue to the state on the difference unless the amount paid by the
company is less than eighty percent of one-fourth of the total amount of tax assessed by the
director of revenue for the immediately preceding [taxable] tax year. The state treasurer,
upon receiving the moneys paid as a tax upon such premiums to the director of revenue, shall
place the moneys to the credit of a fund to be known as "The County Stock Insurance Fund",
which is hereby created and established. The county stock insurance fund shall be included in
the calculation of total state revenue pursuant to Article X, Section 18, of the Missouri
Constitution.
3. If the estimated quarterly tax installments are not so paid, the director of revenue
shall certify such fact to the director of the department of commerce and insurance who shall
thereafter suspend such delinquent company or companies from the further transaction of
business in this state until such taxes shall be paid and such companies shall be subject to the
provisions of sections 148.410 to 148.461.
4. On or before the first day of September of each year the commissioner of
administration shall apportion all moneys in the county stock insurance fund to the general
revenue fund of the state, to the county treasurer and to the treasurer of the school district in
which the principal office of the company paying the same is located. All premium tax
credits described in [sections 135.500 to 135.529 and] sections 348.430 and 348.432 shall
only reduce the amounts apportioned to the general revenue fund of the state and shall not
reduce any moneys apportioned to any county treasurer or to the treasurer of the school

HB 3329 12
district in which the principal office of the company paying the same is located.
Apportionments shall be made in the same ratio which the rates of levy for the same year
for state purposes, for county purposes, and for all school district purposes, bear to each other;
provided that any proceeds from such tax for prior years remaining on hand in the hands of
the county collector or county treasurer undistributed on the effective date of sections 148.310
to 148.460 and any proceeds of such tax for prior years collected thereafter shall be
distributed and paid in accordance with the provisions of such sections. Whenever the word
"county" occurs herein it shall be construed to include the city of St. Louis.
148.350. 1. Every such company or association shall, on or before the first day of
March in each year, make a return, verified by the affidavit of its president and secretary or
other authorized officers, to the director of the department of commerce and insurance stating
the amount of all premiums received on account of policies issued in this state by such
company, whether in cash or in notes, during the year ending on the thirty-first day of
December, next preceding. Upon receipt of such returns, the director of the department of
commerce and insurance shall verify the same and certify the amount of tax due from the
various companies on the basis and at the rate provided in section 148.340, and shall certify
the same to the director of revenue together with the amount of the quarterly installments to
be made as provided in subsection 2 of this section, on or before the thirtieth day of April of
each year.
2. Beginning January 1, 1983, the amount of the tax due for that calendar year and
each succeeding calendar year thereafter shall be paid in four approximately equal estimated
quarterly installments and a fifth reconciling installment. The first four installments shall be
based upon the tax assessed for the immediately preceding [taxable] tax year ending on the
thirty-first day of December, next preceding. The quarterly installment shall be made on the
first day of March, the first day of June, the first day of September, and the first day of
December. Immediately after receiving from the director of the department of commerce and
insurance, certification of the amount of tax due from the various companies, the director of
revenue shall notify and assess each company the amount of taxes on its premiums for the
calendar year ending on the thirty-first day of December, next preceding. The director of
revenue shall also notify and assess each company the amount of the estimated quarterly
installments to be made for the calendar year. If the amount of the actual tax due for any year
exceeds the total of the installments made for such year, the balance of the tax due shall be
paid on the first day of June of the following year, together with the regular quarterly
installment due at that time. If the total amount of the tax actually due is less than the total
amount of the installments actually paid, the amount by which the amount paid exceeds the
amount due shall be credited against the tax for the following year and deducted from the
quarterly installment otherwise due on the first day of June. If the March first quarterly

HB 3329 13
installment made by a company is less than the amount assessed by the director of revenue,
the difference will be due on June first, but no interest will accrue to the state on the
difference unless the amount paid by the company is less than eighty percent of one-fourth of
the total amount of tax assessed by the director of revenue for the immediately preceding
[taxable] tax year. If the estimated quarterly tax installments are not so paid, the director of
revenue shall certify such fact to the director of the department of commerce and insurance
who shall thereafter suspend such delinquent company or companies from the further
transaction of business in this state until such taxes shall be paid, and such companies shall be
subject to the provisions of sections 148.410 to 148.461.
3. Upon receiving such money from the director of revenue, the state treasurer shall
receipt one-half thereof into the general revenue fund of the state, and he shall place the
remainder of such tax to the credit of a fund to be known as "The County Foreign Insurance
Tax Fund", which is hereby created and established. [All premium tax credits described in
sections 135.500 to 135.529 shall only reduce the amount of moneys received by the general
revenue fund of this state and shall not reduce any moneys received by the county foreign
insurance tax fund.]
190.465. 1. In order to provide the best possible 911 technology and service to all
areas of the state in the most efficient and economical manner possible, it is the public policy
of this state to encourage the consolidation of emergency communications operations.
2. Any county, city, or 911 or emergency services board established under this chapter
or section 321.243 may contract and cooperate with any other county, city, or 911 or
emergency services board established under this chapter or section 321.243 as provided in
sections 70.210 to 70.320. Any contracting counties or boards may seek assistance and
advice from the Missouri 911 service board established in section 650.325 regarding the
terms of the joint contract and the administration and operation of the contracting counties,
cities, and boards.
3. If two or more counties, cities, 911 districts, or existing emergency
communications entities desire to consolidate their emergency communications operations,
a joint emergency communications entity may be established by the parties through an
agreement identifying the conditions and provisions of the consolidation and the operation of
the joint entity. This agreement may include the establishment of a joint governing body that
may be comprised of the boards of the entities forming the agreement currently authorized by
statute or an elected or appointed joint board authorized under section 70.260; provided that,
the representation on the joint board of each of the entities forming the agreement shall be
equal. If the entities entering into an agreement under this subsection decide that any 911
service center responsible for the answering of 911 calls and the dispatch of assistance shall
be physically located in a county other than a county with the lowest average county wage

HB 3329 14
from the set of counties where the entities entering into an agreement under this subsection
are located in whole or part, such entities shall provide a written reason for this decision to the
Missouri 911 service board and such document shall be considered a public record under
chapter 610. The county average wage comparison shall be conducted using the information
from the Missouri department of economic development[, which calculates such county
average wages under section 135.950].
4. After August 28, 2018, no public safety answering point operation may be
established as a result of its separation from an existing public safety answering point
operation without a study by, and the approval of, the Missouri 911 service board.
5. No provision of this section shall be construed to prohibit or discourage in any
manner the formation of multiagency or multijurisdictional public safety answering point
operations.
320.092. 1. Tax credits issued pursuant to sections 135.400[,] to 135.432 and section
135.750 [and 320.093] shall be subject to oversight provisions. Effective January 1, 2000,
notwithstanding the provisions of section 32.057, the board, department or authority issuing
tax credits shall annually report to the office of administration, president pro tem of the
senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives regarding the tax credits issued
pursuant to sections 135.400[,] to 135.432 and section 135.750 [and 320.093] which were
issued in the previous fiscal year. The report shall contain, but not be limited to, the aggregate
number and dollar amount of tax credits issued by the board, department or authority, the
number and dollar amount of tax credits claimed by taxpayers, and the number and dollar
amount of tax credits unclaimed by taxpayers as well as the number of years allowed for
claims to be made. This report shall be delivered no later than November of each year.
2. The reporting requirements established pursuant to subsection 1 of this section
shall also apply to the department of economic development and the Missouri development
finance board established pursuant to section 100.265. The department and the Missouri
development finance board shall report on the tax credit programs which they respectively
administer that are authorized under the provisions of chapters 32, 100, 135, 178, 253, 348,
447 and 620.
620.1910. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Manufacturing
Jobs Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Approval", a document submitted by the department to the qualified
manufacturing company or qualified supplier that states the benefits that may be provided
under this section;
(2) "Average wage", the new payroll divided by the number of new jobs;

HB 3329 15
(3) "Capital investment", expenditures made by a qualified manufacturing company
to retool or reconfigure a manufacturing facility directly related to the manufacturing of a new
product or the expansion or modification of the manufacture of an existing product;
[(3)] (4) "County average wage", the [same meaning as such term is defined in
section 620.1878] average wages in each county as determined by the department for the
most recently completed full calendar year. However, if the computed county average
wage is above the statewide average wage, the statewide average wage shall be deemed
the county average wage for such county for the purpose of determining eligibility. The
department shall publish the county average wage for each county at least annually.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision to the contrary, for any qualified
company that in conjunction with its project is relocating employees from a Missouri
county with a higher county average wage, the company shall obtain the endorsement of
the governing body of the community from which jobs are being relocated or the county
average wage for its project shall be the county average wage for the county from which
the employees are being relocated;
[(4)] (5) "Department", the department of economic development;
[(5)] (6) "Facility", a building or buildings located in Missouri at which the qualified
manufacturing company manufactures a product;
[(6)] (7) "Full-time job", a job for which a person is compensated for an average of at
least thirty-five hours per week for a twelve-month period, and one for which the qualified
manufacturing company or qualified supplier offers health insurance and pays at least fifty
percent of such insurance premiums;
[(7)] (8) "NAICS industry classification", the most recent edition of the North
American Industry Classification System as prepared by the Executive Office of the
President, Office of Management and Budget;
[(8)] (9) "New job", the [same meaning as such term is defined in section 620.1878]
number of full-time employees located at the project facility that exceeds the project
facility base employment less any decrease in the number of full-time employees at
related facilities below the related facility base employment. No job that was created
prior to the date of the notice of intent shall be deemed a new job. An employee who
spends less than fifty percent of the employee's work time at the facility is still
considered to be located at the facility if the employee receives his or her directions and
control from that facility, is on the facility's payroll, one hundred percent of the
employee's income from such employment is Missouri income, and the employee is paid
at or above the statewide average wage;
(10) "New payroll", the amount of taxable wages of full-time employees,
excluding owners, located at the project facility that exceeds the project facility base

HB 3329 16
payroll. If full-time employment at related facilities is below the related facility base
employment, any decrease in payroll for full-time employees at the related facilities
below that related facility base payroll shall also be subtracted to determine new
payroll;
[(9)] (11) "New product", a new model or line of a manufactured good that has not
been manufactured in Missouri by the qualified manufacturing company at any time prior to
the date of the notice of intent, or an existing brand, model, or line of a manufactured good
that is redesigned with more than seventy-five percent new exterior body parts and
incorporates new powertrain options;
[(10)] (12) "Notice of intent", a form developed by the department, completed by the
qualified manufacturing company or qualified supplier and submitted to the department
which states the qualified manufacturing company's or qualified supplier's intent to create
new jobs or retain current jobs and make additional capital investment, as applicable, and
request benefits under this section. The notice of intent shall specify the minimum number of
such new or retained jobs and the minimum amount of such capital investment;
[(11)] (13) "Qualified manufacturing company", a business with a NAICS code of
33611 that:
(a) Manufactures goods at a facility in Missouri;
(b) In the case of the manufacture of a new product, commits to make a capital
investment of at least seventy-five thousand dollars per retained job within no more than two
years of the date the qualified manufacturing company begins to retain withholding tax under
this section, or in the case of the modification or expansion of the manufacture of an existing
product, commits to make a capital investment of at least fifty thousand dollars per retained
job within no more than two years of the date the qualified manufacturing company begins to
retain withholding tax under this section;
(c) Manufactures a new product or has commenced making capital improvements to
the facility necessary for the manufacturing of such new product, or modifies or expands the
manufacture of an existing product or has commenced making capital improvements to the
facility necessary for the modification or expansion of the manufacture of such existing
product; and
(d) Continues to meet the requirements of paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subdivision for
the withholding period;
[(12)] (14) "Qualified supplier", a manufacturing company that:
(a) Attests to the department that it derives more than ten percent of the total annual
sales of the company from sales to a qualified manufacturing company;
(b) Adds five or more new jobs;

HB 3329 17
(c) Has an average wage, as defined [in] under this section [135.950], for such new
jobs that are equal to or exceed the lower of the county average wage for Missouri as
determined by the department using NAICS industry classifications, but not lower than sixty
percent of the statewide average wage; and
(d) Provides health insurance for all full-time jobs and pays at least fifty percent of
the premiums of such insurance;
[(13)] (15) "Retained job", the number of full-time jobs of persons employed by the
qualified manufacturing company located at the facility that existed as of the last working day
of the month immediately preceding the month in which notice of intent is submitted;
[(14)] (16) "Statewide average wage", an amount equal to the quotient of the sum of
the total gross wages paid for the corresponding four calendar quarters divided by the average
annual employment for such four calendar quarters, which shall be computed using the
Quarterly Census of Employment and Wages Data for All Private Ownership Businesses in
Missouri, as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of
Labor;
[(15)] (17) "Withholding period", the seven- or ten-year period in which a qualified
manufacturing company may receive benefits under this section;
[(16)] (18) "Withholding tax", the [same meaning as such term is defined in section
620.1878] state withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265. For purposes of
100 this program, the withholding tax shall be computed using a schedule as determined by
101 the department based on average wages.
102 3. The department shall respond within thirty days to a qualified manufacturing
103 company or a qualified supplier who provides a notice of intent with either an approval or a
104 rejection of the notice of intent. Failure to respond on behalf of the department shall result in
105 the notice of intent being deemed an approval for the purposes of this section.
106 4. A qualified manufacturing company that manufactures a new product may, upon
107 the department's approval of a notice of intent and the execution of an agreement that meets
108 the requirements of subsection 9 of this section, but no earlier than January 1, 2012, retain one
109 hundred percent of the withholding tax from full-time jobs at the facility for a period of ten
110 years. A qualified manufacturing company that modifies or expands the manufacture of an
111 existing product may, upon the department's approval of a notice of intent and the execution
112 of an agreement that meets the requirements of subsection 9 of this section, but no earlier than
113 January 1, 2012, retain fifty percent of the withholding tax from full-time jobs at the facility
114 for a period of seven years. Except as otherwise allowed under subsection 7 of this section,
115 the commencement of the withholding period may be delayed by no more than twenty-four
116 months after execution of the agreement at the option of the qualified manufacturing
117 company. [Such qualified manufacturing company shall be eligible for participation in the

HB 3329 18
118 Missouri quality jobs program in sections 620.1875 to 620.1890 for any new jobs for which it
119 does not retain withholding tax under this section, provided all qualifications for such
120 program are met.]
121 5. A qualified supplier may, upon approval of a notice of intent by the department,
122 retain all withholding tax from new jobs for a period of three years from the date of approval
123 of the notice of intent or for a period of five years if the supplier pays wages for the new jobs
124 equal to or greater than one hundred twenty percent of county average wage.
125 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a qualified supplier that is
126 awarded benefits under this section shall not receive any tax credit or exemption or be entitled
127 to retain withholding under sections 100.700 to 100.850, sections 135.100 to 135.150, or
128 sections 135.200 to 135.286[, section 135.535, sections 135.900 to 135.906, sections 135.950
129 to 135.970, or section 620.1881] for the same jobs.
130 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the maximum amount
131 of withholding tax that may be retained by any one qualified manufacturing company under
132 this section shall not exceed ten million dollars per calendar year. The aggregate amount of
133 withholding tax that may be retained by all qualified manufacturing companies under this
134 section shall not exceed fifteen million dollars per calendar year.
135 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any qualified
136 manufacturing company that is awarded benefits under this section shall not simultaneously
137 receive tax credits or exemptions under sections 100.700 to 100.850, sections 135.100 to
138 135.150, or sections 135.200 to 135.286[, section 135.535, or sections 135.900 to 135.906]
139 for the jobs created or retained or capital improvement which qualified for benefits under this
140 section. The benefits available to the qualified manufacturing company under any other state
141 programs for which the qualified manufacturing company is eligible and which utilize
142 withholding tax from the jobs at the facility shall first be credited to the other state program
143 before the applicable withholding period for benefits provided under this section shall begin.
144 These other state programs include, but are not limited to, the Missouri [works] one startjobs
145 training program under sections 620.800 to 620.809, the real property tax increment
146 allocation redevelopment act under sections 99.800 to 99.865, or the Missouri downtown and
147 rural economic stimulus act under sections 99.915 to 99.980. If any qualified manufacturing
148 company also participates in the Missouri [works] one startjobs training program in sections
149 620.800 to 620.809, such qualified manufacturing company shall not retain any withholding
150 tax that has already been allocated for use in the new jobs training program. Any qualified
151 manufacturing company or qualified supplier that is awarded benefits under this program and
152 knowingly hires individuals who are not allowed to work legally in the United States shall
153 immediately forfeit such benefits and shall repay the state an amount equal to any
154 withholding taxes already retained. Subsection 5 of section 285.530 shall not apply to

HB 3329 19
155 qualified manufacturing companies or qualified suppliers which are awarded benefits under
156 this program.
157 8. The department may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.
158 Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
159 the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
160 subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section
161 and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
162 under chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
163 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
164 proposed or adopted after the effective date of this section shall be invalid and void.
165 9. Within six months of completion of a notice of intent required under this section,
166 the qualified manufacturing company shall enter into an agreement with the department that
167 memorializes the content of the notice of intent, the requirements of this section, and the
168 consequences for failing to meet such requirements, which shall include the following:
169 (1) If the amount of capital investment made by the qualified manufacturing company
170 is not made within the two-year period provided for such investment, the qualified
171 manufacturing company shall immediately cease retaining any withholding tax with respect
172 to jobs at the facility and it shall forfeit all rights to retain withholding tax for the remainder of
173 the withholding period. In addition, the qualified manufacturing company shall repay any
174 amounts of withholding tax retained plus interest of five percent per annum. However, in the
175 event that such capital investment shortfall is due to economic conditions beyond the control
176 of the qualified manufacturing company, the director may, at the qualified manufacturing
177 company's request, suspend rather than terminate its privilege to retain withholding tax under
178 this section for up to three years. Any such suspension shall extend the withholding period by
179 the same amount of time. No more than one such suspension shall be granted to a qualified
180 manufacturing company;
181 (2) If the qualified manufacturing company discontinues the manufacturing of the
182 new product and does not replace it with a subsequent or additional new product
183 manufactured at the facility at any time during the withholding period, the qualified
184 manufacturing company shall immediately cease retaining any withholding tax with respect
185 to jobs at that facility and it shall forfeit all rights to retain withholding tax for the remainder
186 of the withholding period.
187 10. Prior to March first each year, the department shall provide a report to the general
188 assembly including the names of participating qualified manufacturing companies or
189 qualified suppliers, location of such companies or suppliers, the annual amount of benefits
190 provided, the estimated net state fiscal impact including direct and indirect new state taxes
191 derived, and the number of new jobs created or jobs retained.

HB 3329 20
192 11. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
193 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall
194 automatically sunset October 12, 2016, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
195 and
196 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section shall
197 automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization of this section;
198 and
199 (3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year immediately
200 following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this section is sunset.
620.2010. 1. In exchange for the consideration provided by the new tax revenues and
other economic stimuli that will be generated by the new jobs created, a qualified company
may, for a period of five years from the date the new jobs are created, or for a period of six
years from the date the new jobs are created if the qualified company is an existing Missouri
business, retain an amount equal to the withholding tax as calculated under subdivision (38)
of section 620.2005 from the new jobs that would otherwise be withheld and remitted by the
qualified company under the provisions of sections 143.191 to 143.265 if:
(1) The qualified company creates ten or more new jobs, and the average wage of the
new payroll equals or exceeds ninety percent of the county average wage;
(2) The qualified company creates two or more new jobs at a project facility located
in a rural area, the average wage of the new payroll equals or exceeds ninety percent of the
county average wage, and the qualified company commits to making at least one hundred
thousand dollars of new capital investment at the project facility within two years; or
(3) The qualified company creates two or more new jobs at a project facility located
within [a] an enhanced enterprise zone [designated under sections 135.950 to 135.963], the
average wage of the new payroll equals or exceeds eighty percent of the county average
wage, and the qualified company commits to making at least one hundred thousand dollars in
new capital investment at the project facility within two years of approval.
2. In addition to any benefits available under subsection 1 of this section, the
department may award a qualified company that satisfies subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of
this section additional tax credits, issued each year for a period of five years from the date the
new jobs are created, or for a period of six years from the date the new jobs are created if the
qualified company is an existing Missouri business, in an amount equal to or less than six
percent of new payroll; provided that in no event may the total amount of benefits awarded to
a qualified company under this section exceed nine percent of new payroll in any calendar
year. The amount of tax credits awarded to a qualified company under this subsection shall
not exceed the projected net fiscal benefit to the state, as determined by the department, and
shall not exceed the least amount necessary to obtain the qualified company's commitment to

HB 3329 21
initiate the project. In determining the amount of tax credits to award to a qualified company
under this subsection or a qualified manufacturing company under subsection 3 of this
section, the department shall consider the following factors:
(1) The significance of the qualified company's need for program benefits;
(2) The amount of projected net fiscal benefit to the state of the project and the period
in which the state would realize such net fiscal benefit;
(3) The overall size and quality of the proposed project, including the number of new
jobs, new capital investment, manufacturing capital investment, proposed wages, growth
potential of the qualified company, the potential multiplier effect of the project, and similar
factors;
(4) The financial stability and creditworthiness of the qualified company;
(5) The level of economic distress in the area;
(6) An evaluation of the competitiveness of alternative locations for the project
facility, as applicable; and
(7) The percent of local incentives committed.
3. (1) The department may award tax credits to a qualified manufacturing company
that makes a manufacturing capital investment of at least five hundred million dollars not
more than three years following the department's approval of a notice of intent and the
execution of an agreement that meets the requirements of subsection 4 of this section. Such
tax credits shall be issued no earlier than January 1, 2023, and may be issued each year for a
period of five years. A qualified manufacturing company may qualify for an additional five-
year period under this subsection if it makes an additional manufacturing capital investment
of at least two hundred fifty million dollars within five years of the department's approval of
the original notice of intent.
(2) The maximum amount of tax credits that any one qualified manufacturing
company may receive under this subsection shall not exceed five million dollars per calendar
year. The aggregate amount of tax credits awarded to all qualified manufacturing companies
under this subsection shall not exceed ten million dollars per calendar year.
(3) If, at the project facility at any time during the project period, the qualified
manufacturing company discontinues the manufacturing of the new product, or discontinues
the modification or expansion of an existing product, and does not replace it with a
subsequent or additional new product or with a modification or expansion of an existing
product, the company shall immediately cease receiving any benefit awarded under this
subsection for the remainder of the project period and shall forfeit all rights to retain or
receive any benefit awarded under this subsection for the remainder of such period.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any qualified
manufacturing company that is awarded benefits under this section shall not simultaneously

HB 3329 22
receive tax credits or exemptions under sections 100.700 to 100.850 for the jobs created or
retained or capital improvement that qualified for benefits under this section. The provisions
of subsection 5 of section 285.530 shall not apply to a qualified manufacturing company that
is awarded benefits under this section.
4. Upon approval of a notice of intent to receive tax credits under subsection 2, 3, 6,
or 7 of this section, the department and the qualified company shall enter into a written
agreement covering the applicable project period. The agreement shall specify, at a
minimum:
(1) The committed number of new jobs, new payroll, and new capital investment, or
the manufacturing capital investment and committed percentage of retained jobs for each year
during the project period;
(2) The date or time period during which the tax credits shall be issued, which may be
immediately or over a period not to exceed two years from the date of approval of the notice
of intent;
(3) Clawback provisions, as may be required by the department;
(4) Financial guarantee provisions as may be required by the department, provided
that financial guarantee provisions shall be required by the department for tax credits awarded
under subsection 7 of this section; and
(5) Any other provisions the department may require.
5. In lieu of the benefits available under subsections 1 and 2 of this section, and in
exchange for the consideration provided by the new tax revenues and other economic stimuli
that will be generated by the new jobs created by the program, a qualified company may, for a
period of five years from the date the new jobs are created, or for a period of six years from
the date the new jobs are created if the qualified company is an existing Missouri business,
retain an amount equal to the withholding tax as calculated under subdivision (38) of section
620.2005 from the new jobs that would otherwise be withheld and remitted by the qualified
company under the provisions of sections 143.191 to 143.265 equal to:
(1) Six percent of new payroll for a period of five years from the date the required
number of new jobs were created if the qualified company creates one hundred or more new
jobs and the average wage of the new payroll equals or exceeds one hundred twenty percent
of the county average wage of the county in which the project facility is located; or
(2) Seven percent of new payroll for a period of five years from the date the required
number of jobs were created if the qualified company creates one hundred or more new jobs
and the average wage of the new payroll equals or exceeds one hundred forty percent of the
100 county average wage of the county in which the project facility is located.
101

HB 3329 23
102 The department shall issue a refundable tax credit for any difference between the amount of
103 benefit allowed under this subsection and the amount of withholding tax retained by the
104 company, in the event the withholding tax is not sufficient to provide the entire amount of
105 benefit due to the qualified company under this subsection.
106 6. In addition to the benefits available under subsection 5 of this section, the
107 department may award a qualified company that satisfies the provisions of subsection 5 of
108 this section additional tax credits, issued each year for a period of five years from the date the
109 new jobs are created, or for a period of six years from the date the new jobs are created if the
110 qualified company is an existing Missouri business, in an amount equal to or less than three
111 percent of new payroll; provided that in no event may the total amount of benefits awarded to
112 a qualified company under this section exceed nine percent of new payroll in any calendar
113 year. The amount of tax credits awarded to a qualified company under this subsection shall
114 not exceed the projected net fiscal benefit to the state, as determined by the department, and
115 shall not exceed the least amount necessary to obtain the qualified company's commitment to
116 initiate the project. In determining the amount of tax credits to award to a qualified company
117 under this subsection, the department shall consider the factors provided under subsection 2
118 of this section.
119 7. In lieu of the benefits available under subsections 1, 2, 5, and 6 of this section, and
120 in exchange for the consideration provided by the new tax revenues and other economic
121 stimuli that will be generated by the new jobs and new capital investment created by the
122 program, the department may award a qualified company that satisfies the provisions of
123 subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section tax credits, issued within one year following the
124 qualified company's acceptance of the department's proposal for benefits, in an amount equal
125 to or less than nine percent of new payroll. The amount of tax credits awarded to a qualified
126 company under this subsection shall not exceed the projected net fiscal benefit to the state, as
127 determined by the department, and shall not exceed the least amount necessary to obtain the
128 qualified company's commitment to initiate the project. In determining the amount of tax
129 credits to award to a qualified company under this subsection, the department shall consider
130 the factors provided under subsection 2 of this section and the qualified company's
131 commitment to new capital investment and new job creation within the state for a period of
132 not less than ten years. For the purposes of this subsection, each qualified company shall
133 have an average wage of the new payroll that equals or exceeds one hundred percent of the
134 county average wage. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 620.2020 to the contrary,
135 this subsection shall expire on June 30, 2025.
136 8. No benefits shall be available under this section for any qualified company that has
137 performed significant, project-specific site work at the project facility, purchased machinery
138 or equipment related to the project, or has publicly announced its intention to make new

HB 3329 24
139 capital investment or manufacturing capital investment at the project facility prior to receipt
140 of a proposal for benefits under this section or approval of its notice of intent, whichever
141 occurs first.
142 9. In lieu of any other benefits under this chapter, the department of economic
143 development may award a tax credit to an industrial development authority for a qualified
144 military project in an amount equal to the estimated withholding taxes associated with the
145 part-time and full-time civilian and military new jobs located at the facility and directly
146 impacted by the project. The amount of the tax credit shall be calculated by multiplying:
147 (1) The average percentage of tax withheld, as provided by the department of revenue
148 to the department of economic development;
149 (2) The average salaries of the jobs directly created by the qualified military project;
150 and
151 (3) The number of jobs directly created by the qualified military project.
152
153 If the amount of the tax credit represents the least amount necessary to accomplish the
154 qualified military project, the tax credits may be issued, but no tax credits shall be issued for a
155 term longer than fifteen years. No qualified military project shall be eligible for tax credits
156 under this subsection unless the department of economic development determines the
157 qualified military project shall achieve a net positive fiscal impact to the state.
620.2020. 1. The department shall respond to a written request, by or on behalf of a
qualified company or qualified military project, for a proposed benefit award under the
provisions of this program within five business days of receipt of such request. The
department shall respond to a written request, by or on behalf of a qualified manufacturing
company, for a proposed benefit award under the provisions of this program within fifteen
business days of receipt of such request. Such response shall contain either a proposal of
benefits for the qualified company or qualified military project, or a written response refusing
to provide such a proposal and stating the reasons for such refusal. A qualified company or
qualified military project that intends to seek benefits under the program shall submit to the
department a notice of intent. The department shall respond within thirty days to a notice of
intent with an approval or a rejection, provided that the department may withhold approval or
provide a contingent approval until it is satisfied that proper documentation of eligibility has
been provided. The department shall certify or reject the qualifying company's plan outlined
in their notice of intent as satisfying good faith efforts made to employ, at a minimum,
commensurate with the percentage of minority populations in the state of Missouri, as
reported in the previous decennial census, the following: racial minorities, contractors who
are racial minorities, and contractors that, in turn, employ at a minimum racial minorities
commensurate with the percentage of minority populations in the state of Missouri, as

HB 3329 25
reported in the previous decennial census. Failure to respond on behalf of the department
shall result in the notice of intent being deemed approved. A qualified company receiving
approval for program benefits may receive additional benefits for subsequent new jobs at the
same facility after the full initial project period if the applicable minimum job requirements
are met. There shall be no limit on the number of project periods a qualified company may
participate in the program, and a qualified company may elect to file a notice of intent to
begin a new project period concurrent with an existing project period if the applicable
minimum job requirements are achieved, the qualified company provides the department with
the required annual reporting, and the qualified company is in compliance with this program
and any other state programs in which the qualified company is currently or has previously
participated. However, the qualified company shall not receive any further program benefits
under the original approval for any new jobs created after the date of the new notice of intent,
and any jobs created before the new notice of intent shall not be included as new jobs for
purposes of the benefit calculation for the new approval. When a qualified company has filed
and received approval of a notice of intent and subsequently files another notice of intent, the
department shall apply the definition of project facility under subdivision (24) of section
620.2005 to the new notice of intent as well as all previously approved notices of intent and
shall determine the application of the definitions of new job, new payroll, project facility base
employment, and project facility base payroll accordingly.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the benefits available to the
qualified company under any other state programs for which the company is eligible and
which utilize withholding tax from the new or retained jobs of the company shall first be
credited to the other state program before the withholding retention level applicable under this
program will begin to accrue. If any qualified company also participates in a job training
program utilizing withholding tax, the company shall retain no withholding tax under this
program, but the department shall issue a refundable tax credit for the full amount of benefit
allowed under this program. The calendar year annual maximum amount of tax credits which
may be issued to a qualifying company that also participates in a job training program shall be
increased by an amount equivalent to the withholding tax retained by that company under a
jobs training program.
3. A qualified company or qualified military project receiving benefits under this
program shall provide an annual report of the number of jobs, along with minority jobs
created or retained, and such other information as may be required by the department to
document the basis for program benefits available no later than ninety days prior to the end of
the qualified company's or industrial development authority's tax year immediately following
the tax year for which the benefits provided under the program are attributed. In such annual
report, if the average wage is below the applicable percentage of the county average wage, the

HB 3329 26
qualified company or qualified military project has not maintained the employee insurance as
required, if the department after a review determines the qualifying company fails to satisfy
other aspects of their notice of intent, including failure to make good faith efforts to employ,
at a minimum, commensurate with the percentage of minority populations in the state of
Missouri, as reported in the previous decennial census, the following: racial minorities,
contractors who are racial minorities, and contractors that, in turn, employ at a minimum
racial minorities commensurate with the percentage of minority populations in the state of
Missouri, as reported in the previous decennial census, or if the number of jobs is below the
number required, the qualified company or qualified military project shall not receive tax
credits or retain the withholding tax for the balance of the project period. If a statewide state
of emergency exists for more than sixteen months, a qualified company or industrial
development authority shall be entitled to a one-time suspension of program deadlines equal
to the number of months such statewide state of emergency existed with any partial month
rounded to the next whole. During such suspension, the qualified company or industrial
development authority shall not be entitled to retain any withholding tax as calculated under
subdivision (38) of section 620.2005 nor shall it earn any awarded tax credit or receive any
tax credit under the program for the suspension period. The suspension period shall run
consecutively and be available to a qualified company or industrial development authority
that, during the statewide state of emergency, submitted notice of intent that was approved or
that was in year one or a subsequent year of benefits under a program agreement with the
department. The suspension period that runs consecutively and may be available to a
qualified company or industrial development authority as provided in this subsection may
apply retroactively. Any qualified company or industrial development authority requesting a
suspension pursuant to this subsection shall submit notice to the department on its provided
form identifying the requested start and end dates of the suspension, not to exceed the
maximum number of months available under this subsection. Such notice shall be submitted
to the department not later than the end of the twelfth month following the termination of the
state of emergency. No suspension period shall start later than the date on which the state of
emergency was terminated. The department and the qualified company or the industrial
development authority shall enter into a program agreement or shall amend an existing
program agreement, as applicable, stating the deadlines following the suspension period and
updating the applicable wage requirements. Failure to timely file the annual report required
under this section may result in the forfeiture of tax credits attributable to the year for which
the reporting was required and a recapture of withholding taxes retained by the qualified
company or qualified military project during such year.
4. The department may withhold the approval of any benefits under this program until
it is satisfied that proper documentation has been provided, and shall reduce the benefits to

HB 3329 27
reflect any reduction in full-time employees or payroll. Upon approval by the department, the
qualified company may begin the retention of the withholding taxes when it reaches the
required number of jobs and the average wage meets or exceeds the applicable percentage of
county average wage. Tax credits, if any, may be issued upon satisfaction by the department
that the qualified company has exceeded the applicable percentage of county average wage
and the required number of jobs; provided that, tax credits awarded under subsection 7 of
section 620.2010 may be issued following the qualified company's acceptance of the
100 department's proposal and pursuant to the requirements set forth in the written agreement
101 between the department and the qualified company under subsection 4 of section 620.2010.
102 5. Any qualified company or qualified military project approved for benefits under
103 this program shall provide to the department, upon request, any and all information and
104 records reasonably required to monitor compliance with program requirements. This
105 program shall be considered a business recruitment tax credit under subdivision (3) of
106 subsection 2 of section 135.800, and any qualified company or qualified military project
107 approved for benefits under this program shall be subject to the provisions of sections
108 135.800 to 135.830.
109 6. Any taxpayer who is awarded benefits under this program who knowingly hires
110 individuals who are not allowed to work legally in the United States shall immediately forfeit
111 such benefits and shall repay the state an amount equal to any state tax credits already
112 redeemed and any withholding taxes already retained.
113 7. (1) The maximum amount of tax credits that may be authorized under this program
114 for any fiscal year shall be limited as follows, less the amount of any tax credits previously
115 obligated for that fiscal year under any of the tax credit programs referenced in subsection 14
116 of this section:
117 (a) For the fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2013, but ending on or before June 30,
118 2014, no more than one hundred six million dollars in tax credits may be authorized;
119 (b) For the fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2014, but ending on or before June 30,
120 2015, no more than one hundred eleven million dollars in tax credits may be authorized;
121 (c) For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2015, but ending on or before June
122 30, 2020, no more than one hundred sixteen million dollars in tax credits may be authorized
123 for each fiscal year; and
124 (d) For all fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2020, no more than one hundred
125 six million dollars in tax credits may be authorized for each fiscal year. The provisions of this
126 paragraph shall not apply to tax credits issued to qualified companies under a notice of intent
127 filed prior to July 1, 2020.
128 (2) For all fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2020, in addition to the amount of
129 tax credits that may be authorized under paragraph (d) of subdivision (1) of this subsection,

HB 3329 28
130 an additional ten million dollars in tax credits may be authorized for each fiscal year for the
131 purpose of the completion of infrastructure projects directly connected with the creation or
132 retention of jobs under the provisions of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 and an additional ten
133 million dollars in tax credits may be authorized for each fiscal year for a qualified
134 manufacturing company based on a manufacturing capital investment as set forth in section
135 620.2010.
136 8. For all fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2020, the maximum total amount
137 of withholding tax that may be authorized for retention for the creation of new jobs under the
138 provisions of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 by qualified companies with a project facility
139 base employment of at least fifty shall not exceed seventy-five million dollars for each fiscal
140 year. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to withholding tax authorized for
141 retention for the creation of new jobs by qualified companies with a project facility base
142 employment of less than fifty.
143 9. For tax credits for the creation of new jobs under section 620.2010, the department
144 shall allocate the annual tax credits based on the date of the approval, reserving such tax
145 credits based on the department's best estimate of new jobs and new payroll of the project,
146 and any other applicable factors in determining the amount of benefits available to the
147 qualified company or qualified military project under this program; provided that, the
148 department may reserve up to twenty-one and one-half percent of the maximum annual
149 amount of tax credits that may be authorized under subsection 7 of this section for award
150 under subsection 7 of section 620.2010. However, the annual issuance of tax credits shall be
151 subject to annual verification of actual payroll by the department or, for qualified military
152 projects, annual verification of average salary for the jobs directly created by the qualified
153 military project. Any authorization of tax credits shall expire if, within two years from the
154 date of commencement of operations, or approval if applicable, the qualified company has
155 failed to meet the applicable minimum job requirements. The qualified company may retain
156 authorized amounts from the withholding tax under the project once the applicable minimum
157 job requirements have been met for the duration of the project period. No benefits shall be
158 provided under this program until the qualified company or qualified military project meets
159 the applicable minimum new job requirements or, for benefits awarded under subsection 7 of
160 section 620.2010, until the qualified company has satisfied the requirements set forth in the
161 written agreement between the department and the qualified company under subsection 4 of
162 section 620.2010. In the event the qualified company or qualified military project does not
163 meet the applicable minimum new job requirements, the qualified company or qualified
164 military project may submit a new notice of intent or the department may provide a new
165 approval for a new project of the qualified company or qualified military project at the project
166 facility or other facilities.

HB 3329 29
167 10. Tax credits provided under this program may be claimed against taxes otherwise
168 imposed by chapters 143 and 148, and may not be carried forward, but shall be claimed
169 within one year of the close of the [taxable] tax year for which they were issued. Tax credits
170 provided under this program may be transferred, sold, or assigned by filing a notarized
171 endorsement thereof with the department that names the transferee, the amount of tax credit
172 transferred, and the value received for the credit, as well as any other information reasonably
173 requested by the department. For a qualified company with flow-through tax treatment to its
174 members, partners, or shareholders, the tax credit shall be allowed to members, partners, or
175 shareholders in proportion to their share of ownership on the last day of the qualified
176 company's tax period.
177 11. Prior to the issuance of tax credits or the qualified company beginning to retain
178 withholding taxes, the department shall verify through the department of revenue and any
179 other applicable state department that the tax credit applicant does not owe any delinquent
180 income, sales, or use tax or interest or penalties on such taxes, or any delinquent fees or
181 assessments levied by any state department and through the department of commerce and
182 insurance that the applicant does not owe any delinquent insurance taxes or other fees. Such
183 delinquency shall not affect the approval, except that any tax credits issued shall be first
184 applied to the delinquency and any amount issued shall be reduced by the applicant's tax
185 delinquency. If the department of revenue, the department of commerce and insurance, or any
186 other state department concludes that a taxpayer is delinquent after June fifteenth but before
187 July first of any year and the application of tax credits to such delinquency causes a tax
188 deficiency on behalf of the taxpayer to arise, then the taxpayer shall be granted thirty days to
189 satisfy the deficiency in which interest, penalties, and additions to tax shall be tolled. After
190 applying all available credits toward a tax delinquency, the administering agency shall notify
191 the appropriate department and that department shall update the amount of outstanding
192 delinquent tax owed by the applicant. If any credits remain after satisfying all insurance,
193 income, sales, and use tax delinquencies, the remaining credits shall be issued to the
194 applicant, subject to the restrictions of other provisions of law.
195 12. The director of revenue shall issue a refund to the qualified company to the extent
196 that the amount of tax credits allowed under this program exceeds the amount of the qualified
197 company's tax liability under chapter 143 or 148.
198 13. An employee of a qualified company shall receive full credit for the amount of tax
199 withheld as provided in section 143.211.
200 14. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning August 28, 2013,
201 no new benefits shall be authorized for any project that had not received from the department
202 a proposal or approval for such benefits prior to August 28, 2013, under the development tax
203 credit program created under sections 32.100 to 32.125[, the rebuilding communities tax

HB 3329 30
204 credit program created under section 135.535, the enhanced enterprise zone tax credit
205 program created under sections 135.950 to 135.973, and the Missouri quality jobs program
206 created under sections 620.1875 to 620.1890]. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
207 construed to limit or impair the ability of any administering agency to authorize or issue
208 benefits for any project that had received an approval or a proposal from the department under
209 any of the programs referenced in this subsection prior to August 28, 2013, or the ability of
210 any taxpayer to redeem any such tax credits or to retain any withholding tax under an
211 approval issued prior to that date. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to
212 limit or in any way impair the ability of any governing authority to provide any local
213 abatement or designate a new zone under the enhanced enterprise zone program [created by
214 sections 135.950 to 135.963]. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no
215 qualified company that is awarded benefits under this program shall:
216 (1) Simultaneously receive benefits under the programs referenced in this subsection
217 at the same capital investment; or
218 (2) Receive benefits under the provisions of section 620.1910 for the same jobs.
219 15. If any provision of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 or application thereof to any
220 person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
221 application of these sections which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or
222 application, and to this end, the provisions of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 are hereby
223 declared severable.
224 16. By no later than January 1, 2014, and the first day of each calendar quarter
225 thereafter, the department shall present a quarterly report to the general assembly detailing the
226 benefits authorized under this program during the immediately preceding calendar quarter to
227 the extent such information may be disclosed under state and federal law. The report shall
228 include, at a minimum:
229 (1) A list of all approved and disapproved applicants for each tax credit;
230 (2) A list of the aggregate amount of new or retained jobs that are directly attributable
231 to the tax credits authorized;
232 (3) A statement of the aggregate amount of new capital investment directly
233 attributable to the tax credits authorized;
234 (4) Documentation of the estimated net state fiscal benefit for each authorized project
235 and, to the extent available, the actual benefit realized upon completion of such project or
236 activity; and
237 (5) The department's response time for each request for a proposed benefit award
238 under this program.
239 17. The department may adopt such rules, statements of policy, procedures, forms,
240 and guidelines as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 620.2000 to

HB 3329 31
241 620.2020. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
242 created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
243 with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
244 This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
245 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
246 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
247 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2013, shall be invalid
248 and void.
249 18. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
250 (1) The provisions of the program authorized under sections 620.2000 to 620.2020
251 shall be reauthorized as of August 28, 2018, and shall expire on August 28, 2030; and
252 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section shall
253 automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization of sections
254 620.2000 to 620.2020; and
255 (3) Sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 shall terminate on September first of the calendar
256 year immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under sections
257 620.2000 to 620.2020 is sunset.
[99.1205. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the
"Distressed Areas Land Assemblage Tax Credit Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Acquisition costs", the purchase price for the eligible parcel, costs
of environmental assessments, closing costs, real estate brokerage fees,
reasonable demolition costs of vacant structures, and reasonable maintenance
costs incurred to maintain an acquired eligible parcel for a period of five years
after the acquisition of such eligible parcel. Acquisition costs shall not include
costs for title insurance and survey, attorney's fees, relocation costs, fines, or
bills from a municipality;
(2) "Applicant", any person, firm, partnership, trust, limited liability
company, or corporation which has:
(a) Incurred, within an eligible project area, acquisition costs for the
acquisition of land sufficient to satisfy the requirements under subdivision (8)
of this subsection; and
(b) Been appointed or selected, pursuant to a redevelopment
agreement by a municipal authority, as a redeveloper or similar designation,
under an economic incentive law, to redevelop an urban renewal area or a
redevelopment area that includes all of an eligible project area or whose
redevelopment plan or redevelopment area, which encompasses all of an
eligible project area, has been approved or adopted under an economic
incentive law. In addition to being designated the redeveloper, the applicant
shall have been designated to receive economic incentives only after the
municipal authority has considered the amount of the tax credits in adopting

HB 3329 32
such economic incentives as provided in subsection 8 of this section. The
redevelopment agreement shall provide that:
a. The funds generated through the use or sale of the tax credits issued
under this section shall be used to redevelop the eligible project area;
b. No more than seventy-five percent of the urban renewal area
identified in the urban renewal plan or the redevelopment area identified in the
redevelopment plan may be redeveloped by the applicant; and
c. The remainder of the urban renewal area or the redevelopment area
shall be redeveloped by co-redevelopers or redevelopers to whom the
applicant has assigned its redevelopment rights and obligations under the
urban renewal plan or the redevelopment plan;
(3) "Certificate", a tax credit certificate issued under this section;
(4) "Condemnation proceedings", any action taken by, or on behalf of,
an applicant to initiate an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to use the
power of eminent domain to acquire a parcel within the eligible project area.
Condemnation proceedings shall include any and all actions taken after the
submission of a notice of intended acquisition to an owner of a parcel within
the eligible project area by a municipal authority or any other person or entity
under section 523.250;
(5) "Department", the Missouri department of economic development;
(6) "Economic incentive laws", any provision of Missouri law
pursuant to which economic incentives are provided to redevelopers of a
parcel or parcels to redevelop the land, such as tax abatement or payments in
lieu of taxes, or redevelopment plans or redevelopment projects approved or
adopted which include the use of economic incentives to redevelop the land.
Economic incentive laws include, but are not limited to, the land clearance for
redevelopment authority law under sections 99.300 to 99.660, the real property
tax increment allocation redevelopment act under sections 99.800 to 99.865,
the Missouri downtown and rural economic stimulus act under sections 99.915
to 99.1060, and the downtown revitalization preservation program under
sections 99.1080 to 99.1092;
(7) "Eligible parcel", a parcel:
(a) Which is located within an eligible project area;
(b) Which is to be redeveloped;
(c) On which the applicant has not commenced construction prior to
November 28, 2007;
(d) Which has been acquired without the commencement of any
condemnation proceedings with respect to such parcel brought by or on behalf
of the applicant. Any parcel acquired by the applicant from a municipal
authority shall not constitute an eligible parcel; and
(e) On which all outstanding taxes, fines, and bills levied by municipal
governments that were levied by the municipality during the time period that
the applicant held title to the eligible parcel have been paid in full;
(8) "Eligible project area", an area which shall have satisfied the
following requirements:
(a) The eligible project area shall consist of at least seventy-five acres
and may include parcels within its boundaries that do not constitute an eligible
parcel;

HB 3329 33
(b) At least eighty percent of the eligible project area shall be located
within a Missouri qualified census tract area, as designated by the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development under 26 U.S.C.
Section 42, or within a distressed community as that term is defined in section
135.530;
(c) The eligible parcels acquired by the applicant within the eligible
project area shall total at least fifty acres, which may consist of contiguous and
noncontiguous parcels;
(d) The average number of parcels per acre in an eligible project area
shall be four or more;
(e) Less than five percent of the acreage within the boundaries of the
eligible project area shall consist of owner-occupied residences which the
applicant has identified for acquisition under the urban renewal plan or the
redevelopment plan pursuant to which the applicant was appointed or selected
as the redeveloper or by which the person or entity was qualified as an
applicant under this section on the date of the approval or adoption of such
plan;
(9) "Interest costs", interest, loan fees, and closing costs. Interest costs
shall not include attorney's fees;
(10) "Maintenance costs", costs of boarding up and securing vacant
structures, costs of removing trash, and costs of cutting grass and weeds;
(11) "Municipal authority", any city, town, village, county, public
body corporate and politic, political subdivision, or land trust of this state
established and authorized to own land within the state;
(12) "Municipality", any city, town, village, or county;
(13) "Parcel", a single lot or tract of land, and the improvements
thereon, owned by, or recorded as the property of, one or more persons or
100 entities;
101 (14) "Redeveloped", the process of undertaking and carrying out a
102 redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan pursuant to which the conditions
103 which provided the basis for an eligible project area to be included in a
104 redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan are to be reduced or eliminated by
105 redevelopment or rehabilitation; and
106 (15) "Redevelopment agreement", the redevelopment agreement or
107 similar agreement into which the applicant entered with a municipal authority
108 and which is the agreement for the implementation of the urban renewal plan
109 or redevelopment plan pursuant to which the applicant was appointed or
110 selected as the redeveloper or by which the person or entity was qualified as an
111 applicant under this section; and such appointment or selection shall have been
112 approved by an ordinance of the governing body of the municipality, or
113 municipalities, or in the case of any city not within a county, the board of
114 aldermen, in which the eligible project area is located. The redevelopment
115 agreement shall include a time line for redevelopment of the eligible project
116 area. The redevelopment agreement shall state that the named developer shall
117 be subject to the provisions of chapter 290.
118 3. Any applicant shall be entitled to a tax credit against the taxes
119 imposed under chapters 143, 147, and 148, except for sections 143.191 to
120 143.265, in an amount equal to fifty percent of the acquisition costs, and one

HB 3329 34
121 hundred percent of the interest costs incurred for a period of five years after
122 the acquisition of an eligible parcel. No tax credits shall be issued under this
123 section until after January 1, 2008.
124 4. If the amount of such tax credit exceeds the total tax liability for the
125 year in which the applicant is entitled to receive a tax credit, the amount that
126 exceeds the state tax liability may be carried forward for credit against the
127 taxes imposed under chapters 143, 147, and 148 for the succeeding six years,
128 or until the full credit is used, whichever occurs first. The applicant shall not
129 be entitled to a tax credit for taxes imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265.
130 Applicants entitled to receive such tax credits may transfer, sell, or assign the
131 tax credits. Tax credits granted to a partnership, a limited liability company
132 taxed as a partnership, or multiple owners of property shall be passed through
133 to the partners, members, or owners respectively pro rata or pursuant to an
134 executed agreement among the partners, members, or owners documenting an
135 alternate distribution method.
136 5. A purchaser, transferee, or assignee of the tax credits authorized
137 under this section may use acquired tax credits to offset up to one hundred
138 percent of the tax liabilities otherwise imposed under chapters 143, 147, and
139 148, except for sections 143.191 to 143.265. A seller, transferor, or assignor
140 shall perfect such transfer by notifying the department in writing within thirty
141 calendar days following the effective date of the transfer and shall provide any
142 information as may be required by the department to administer and carry out
143 the provisions of this section.
144 6. To claim tax credits authorized under this section, an applicant shall
145 submit to the department an application for a certificate. An applicant shall
146 identify the boundaries of the eligible project area in the application. The
147 department shall verify that the applicant has submitted a valid application in
148 the form and format required by the department. The department shall verify
149 that the municipal authority held the requisite hearings and gave the requisite
150 notices for such hearings in accordance with the applicable economic incentive
151 act, and municipal ordinances. On an annual basis, an applicant may file for
152 the tax credit for the acquisition costs, and for the tax credit for the interest
153 costs, subject to the limitations of this section. If an applicant applying for the
154 tax credit meets the criteria required under this section, the department shall
155 issue a certificate in the appropriate amount. If an applicant receives a tax
156 credit for maintenance costs as a part of the applicant's acquisition costs, the
157 department shall post on its internet website the amount and type of
158 maintenance costs and a description of the redevelopment project for which
159 the applicant received a tax credit within thirty days after the department
160 issues the certificate to the applicant.
161 7. The total aggregate amount of tax credits authorized under this
162 section shall not exceed ninety-five million dollars. At no time shall the
163 annual amount of the tax credits issued under this section exceed twenty
164 million dollars. If the tax credits that are to be issued under this section
165 exceed, in any year, the twenty million dollar limitation, the department shall
166 either:

HB 3329 35
167 (1) Issue tax credits to the applicant in the amount of twenty million
168 dollars, if there is only one applicant entitled to receive tax credits in that year;
169 or
170 (2) Issue the tax credits on a pro rata basis to all applicants entitled to
171 receive tax credits in that year. Any amount of tax credits, which an applicant
172 is, or applicants are, entitled to receive on an annual basis and are not issued
173 due to the twenty million dollar limitation, shall be carried forward for the
174 benefit of the applicant or applicants to subsequent years.
175
176 No tax credits provided under this section shall be authorized after August 28,
177 2013. Any tax credits which have been authorized on or before August 28,
178 2013, but not issued, may be issued, subject to the limitations provided under
179 this subsection, until all such authorized tax credits have been issued.
180 8. Upon issuance of any tax credits pursuant to this section, the
181 department shall report to the municipal authority the applicant's name and
182 address, the parcel numbers of the eligible parcels for which the tax credits
183 were issued, the itemized acquisition costs and interest costs for which tax
184 credits were issued, and the total value of the tax credits issued. The municipal
185 authority and the state shall not consider the amount of the tax credits as an
186 applicant's cost, but shall include the tax credits in any sources and uses and
187 cost benefit analysis reviewed or created for the purpose of awarding other
188 economic incentives. The amount of the tax credits shall not be considered an
189 applicant's cost in the evaluation of the amount of any award of any other
190 economic incentives, but shall be considered in measuring the reasonableness
191 of the rate of return to the applicant with respect to such award of other
192 economic incentives. The municipal authority shall provide the report to any
193 relevant commission, board, or entity responsible for the evaluation and
194 recommendation or approval of other economic incentives to assist in the
195 redevelopment of the eligible project area. Tax credits authorized under this
196 section shall constitute redevelopment tax credits, as such term is defined
197 under section 135.800, and shall be subject to all provisions applicable to
198 redevelopment tax credits provided under sections 135.800 to 135.830.
199 9. The department may promulgate rules to implement the provisions
200 of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
201 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
202 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions
203 of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
204 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
205 assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
206 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
207 grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
208 28, 2007, shall be invalid and void.]
[135.313. 1. Any person, firm or corporation who engages in the
business of producing charcoal or charcoal products in the state of Missouri
shall be eligible for a tax credit on income taxes otherwise due pursuant to
chapter 143, except sections 143.191 to 143.261, as an incentive to implement
safe and efficient environmental controls. The tax credit shall be equal to fifty

HB 3329 36
percent of the purchase price of the best available control technology
equipment connected with the production of charcoal in the state of Missouri
or, if the taxpayer manufactures such equipment, fifty percent of the
manufacturing cost of the equipment, to and including the year the
equipment is put into service. The credit may be claimed for a period of
eight years beginning with the 1998 calendar year and is to be a tax credit
against the tax otherwise due.
2. Any amount of credit which exceeds the tax due shall not be
refunded but may be carried over to any subsequent taxable year, not to exceed
seven years.
3. The charcoal producer may elect to assign to a third party the
approved tax credit. Certification of assignment and other appropriate forms
must be filed with the Missouri department of revenue and the department of
economic development.
4. When applying for a tax credit, the charcoal producer specified in
subsection 1 of this section shall make application for the credit to the division
of environmental quality of the department of natural resources. The
application shall identify the specific best available control technology
equipment and the purchase price, or manufacturing cost of such equipment.
The director of the department of natural resources is authorized to require
permits to construct prior to the installation of best available control
technology equipment and other information which he or she deems
appropriate.
5. The director of the department of natural resources in conjunction
with the department of economic development shall certify to the department
of revenue that the best available control technology equipment meets the
requirements to obtain a tax credit as specified in this section.]
[135.500. 1. Sections 135.500 to 135.529 shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Certified Capital Company Law".
2. As used in sections 135.500 to 135.529, the following terms mean:
(1) "Affiliate of a certified company":
(a) Any person, directly or indirectly owning, controlling or holding
power to vote ten percent or more of the outstanding voting securities or other
ownership interests of the Missouri certified capital company;
(b) Any person ten percent or more of whose outstanding voting
securities or other ownership interest are directly or indirectly owned,
controlled or held with power to vote by the Missouri certified capital
company;
(c) Any person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or
under common control with the Missouri certified capital company;
(d) A partnership in which the Missouri certified capital company is a
general partner;
(e) Any person who is an officer, director or agent of the Missouri
certified capital company or an immediate family member of such officer,
director or agent;
(2) "Applicable percentage", one hundred percent;

HB 3329 37
(3) "Capital in a qualified Missouri business", any debt, equity or
hybrid security, of any nature and description whatsoever, including a debt
instrument or security which has the characteristics of debt but which provides
for conversion into equity or equity participation instruments such as options
or warrants which are acquired by a Missouri certified capital company or a
qualified investing entity as a result of a transfer of cash to a business;
(4) "Certified capital", an investment of cash by an investor in a
Missouri certified capital company;
(5) "Certified capital company", any partnership, corporation, trust or
limited liability company, whether organized on a profit or not-for-profit basis,
that is located, headquartered and registered to conduct business in Missouri
that has as its primary business activity, the investment of cash in qualified
Missouri businesses, and which is certified by the department as meeting the
criteria of sections 135.500 to 135.529;
(6) "Department", the Missouri department of economic development;
(7) "Director", the director of the department of economic
development or a person acting under the supervision of the director;
(8) "Investor", any insurance company that contributes cash;
(9) "Liquidating distribution", payments to investors or to the certified
capital company from earnings;
(10) "Person", any natural person or entity, including a corporation,
general or limited partnership, trust, limited liability company, or any
charitable organization which is exempt from federal income tax and whose
Missouri unrelated business taxable income, if any, would be subject to the
state income tax imposed under chapter 143;
(11) "Qualified distribution", any distribution or payment to equity
holders of a certified capital company in connection with the following:
(a) Reasonable costs and expenses of forming, syndicating, managing
and operating the certified capital company;
(b) Management fees for managing and operating the certified capital
company; and
(c) Any increase in federal or state taxes, penalties and interest,
including those related to state and federal income taxes, of equity owners of a
certified capital company which related to the ownership, management or
operation of a certified capital company;
(12) "Qualified investing entity", any partnership, corporation, trust, or
limited liability company, whether organized on a for-profit or not-for-profit
basis, that:
(a) Is registered to do business in this state;
(b) Is a wholly owned subsidiary of a certified capital company or
otherwise affiliated with and under common control with a certified capital
company; and
(c) Has been designated as a qualified investing entity by such
certified capital company. Such designation shall be effective upon delivery
by the certified capital company of written notice of the designation to the
department. A qualified investing entity may raise debt or equity capital for
investment, but such capital shall not be considered certified capital. Any
qualified investment made by a qualified investing entity after the effective

HB 3329 38
date of this act shall be deemed to have been made by a certified capital
company that designated the qualified investing entity as such; provided that
no qualified investment may be deemed to have been made by more than one
certified capital company;
(13) "Qualified investment", the investment of cash by a Missouri
certified capital company or a qualified investing entity in such a manner as to
acquire capital in a qualified Missouri business;
(14) "Qualified Missouri business", an independently owned and
operated business, which is headquartered and located in Missouri and which
is in need of venture capital and cannot obtain conventional financing. Such
business shall have no more than two hundred employees, eighty percent of
which are employed in Missouri. Such business shall be involved in
commerce for the purpose of manufacturing, processing or assembling
products, conducting research and development, or providing services in
interstate commerce, but excluding retail, real estate, real estate development,
insurance and professional services provided by accountants, lawyers or
physicians. At the time a certified capital company or qualified investing
entity makes an initial investment in a business, such business shall be a small
business concern that meets the requirements of the United States Small
Business Administration's qualification size standards for its venture capital
program, as defined in Section 13 CFR 121.301(c) of the Small Business
Investment Act of 1958, as amended. Any business which is classified as a
qualified Missouri business at the time of the first investment in such business
by a Missouri certified capital company or qualified investing entity shall, for
a period of seven years from the date of such first investment, remain
classified as a qualified Missouri business and may receive follow-on
investments from any Missouri certified capital company or qualified
investing entity and such follow-on investments shall be qualified
investments even though such business may not meet the other
qualifications of this subsection at the time of such follow-on investments;
(15) "State premium tax liability", any liability incurred by an
insurance company pursuant to the provisions of section 148.320, 148.340,
100 148.370 or 148.376, and any other related provisions, which may impose a tax
101 upon the premium income of insurance companies after January 1, 1997.]
[135.503. 1. Any investor that makes an investment of certified
capital shall, in the year of investment, earn a vested credit against state
premium tax liability equal to the applicable percentage of the investor's
investment of certified capital. An investor shall be entitled to take up to ten
percent of the vested credit in any taxable year of the investor. Any time after
three years after August 28, 1996, the director, with the approval of the
commissioner of administration, may reduce the applicable percentage on a
prospective basis. Any such reduction in the applicable percentage by the
director shall not have any effect on credits against state premium tax liability
which have been claimed or will be claimed by any investor with respect to
credits which have been earned and vested pursuant to an investment of
certified capital prior to the effective date of any such change.

HB 3329 39
2. An insurance company claiming a state premium tax credit earned
through an investment in a certified capital company shall not be required to
pay any additional retaliatory tax levied pursuant to section 375.916 as a result
of claiming such credit.
3. The credit against state premium tax liability which is described in
subsection 1 of this section may not exceed the state premium tax liability of
the investor for any taxable year. All such credits against state premium tax
liability may be carried forward indefinitely until the credits are utilized. The
maximum amount of certified capital in one or more certified capital
companies for which earned and vested tax credits will be allowed in any year
to any one investor or its affiliates shall be limited to ten million dollars.
4. Except as provided in subsection 5 of this section, the aggregate
amount of certified capital for which earned and vested credits against state
premium tax liability are allowed for all persons pursuant to sections 135.500
to 135.529 shall not exceed the following amounts: for calendar year 1996,
$0.00; for calendar year 1997, an amount which would entitle all Missouri
certified capital company investors to take aggregate credits of five million
dollars; and for any year thereafter, an additional amount to be determined by
the director but not to exceed aggregate credits of ten million dollars for any
year with the approval of the commissioner of administration and reported to
the general assembly as provided in subsection 2 of section 33.282, provided
that the amount so determined shall not impair the ability of an investor with
earned and vested credits which have been allowed in previous years to take
them, pursuant to subsection 1 of this section. During any calendar year in
which the limitation described in this subsection will limit the amount of
certified capital for which earned and vested credits against state premium tax
liability are allowed, certified capital for which credits are allowed will be
allocated in order of priority based upon the date of filing of information
described in subdivision (1) of subsection 5 of section 135.516. Certified
capital limited in any calendar year by the application of the provisions of this
subsection shall be allowed and allocated in the immediately succeeding
calendar year in the order of priority set forth in this subsection. The
department shall make separate allocations of certified capital for which
credits are allowed under the limitations described in this subsection and under
the limitations described in subsection 5 of this section.
5. In addition to the maximum amount pursuant to subsection 4 of this
section, the aggregate amount of certified capital for which earned and vested
credits against state premium tax liability are allowed for persons pursuant to
sections 135.500 to 135.529 shall be the following: for calendar year 1999 and
for any year thereafter, an amount to be determined by the director which
would entitle all Missouri certified capital company investors to take aggregate
credits not to exceed four million dollars for any year with the approval of the
commissioner of administration and reported to the general assembly as
provided in subsection 2 of section 33.282, provided that the amount so
determined shall not impair the ability of an investor with earned and vested
credits which have been allowed in previous years or pursuant to the
provisions of subsection 4 of this section to take them, pursuant to subsection
1 of this section. For purposes of any requirement regarding the schedule of

HB 3329 40
qualified investments for certified capital for which earned and vested credits
against state premium tax liability are allowed pursuant to this subsection only,
the definition of a "qualified Missouri business" as set forth in subdivision (14)
of subsection 2 of section 135.500 means a Missouri business that is located in
a distressed community as defined in section 135.530, and meets all of the
requirements of subdivision (14) of subsection 2 of section 135.500. During
any calendar year in which the limitation described in this subsection limits the
amount of additional certified capital for which earned and vested credits
against state premium tax liability are allowed, additional certified capital for
which credits are allowed shall be allocated in order of priority based upon the
date of filing of information described in subdivision (1) of subsection 5 of
section 135.516 with respect to such additional certified capital. The
department shall make separate allocations of certified capital for which
credits are allowed under the limitations described in this subsection and under
the limitations described in subsection 4 of this section. No limitation
applicable to any certified capital company with respect to certified capital for
which credits are allowed pursuant to subsection 4 of this section shall limit
the amount of certified capital for which credits are allowed pursuant to this
subsection. No limitation applicable to any certified capital company with
respect to certified capital for which credits are allowed pursuant to this
subsection shall limit the amount of certified capital for which credits are
allowed pursuant to subsection 4 of this section.
6. The department shall advise any Missouri certified capital company,
in writing, within fifteen days after receiving the filing described in
subdivision (1) of subsection 5 of section 135.516 whether the limitations of
subsection 3 of this section then in effect will be applicable with respect to the
investments and credits described in such filing with the department.]
[135.505. A Missouri certified capital company shall have a funding
period of one year from the date of receiving certification from the director.
All investments in the Missouri certified capital company shall be made within
such three hundred sixty-five-day funding period.]
[135.508. The department may certify profit or not-for-profit entities
which submit an application to be designated as a Missouri certified capital
company. The department shall review the organizational documents for each
applicant for certification and the business history of the applicant, determine
that the Missouri certified capital company's cash, marketable securities and
other liquid assets are at least five hundred thousand dollars, determine that the
liquid asset base for certified companies is at least five hundred thousand
dollars at all times during the company's participation in the program
authorized by sections 135.500 to 135.529, and determine that the officers and
the board of directors, partners, trustees or managers are thoroughly
acquainted with the requirements of sections 135.500 to 135.529. No
insurance company which receives tax credits permitted under sections
135.500 to 135.529 for an investment in a Missouri certified capital company
shall, individually or with or through one or more affiliates, be a managing
general partner of or control the direction of investments of that Missouri

HB 3329 41
certified capital company. Within seventy-five days of application, the
department shall either issue the certification and notify the department of
revenue and the director of the department of commerce and insurance of such
certification or shall refuse the certification and communicate in detail to the
applicant the grounds for the refusal, including the suggestions for the removal
of those grounds. The department shall be responsible for the administration
of the tax credits authorized by sections 135.500 to 135.529. No rule or
portion of a rule promulgated under the authority of sections 135.500 to
135.529 shall become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 536. All rulemaking authority delegated prior to June
27, 1997, is of no force and effect and repealed; however, nothing in this
section shall be interpreted to repeal or affect the validity of any rule filed or
adopted prior to June 27, 1997, if such rule complied with the provisions of
chapter 536. The provisions of this section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536, including the ability to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule or portion of a rule, are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the purported grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
so proposed and contained in the order of rulemaking shall be invalid and
void.]
[135.516. 1. To continue to be certified, a Missouri certified capital
company shall make qualified investments according to the following
schedule:
(1) Within two years after the date on which a Missouri certified
capital company is designated as a Missouri certified capital company at least
twenty-five percent of its certified capital shall be, or have been, placed in
qualified investments;
(2) Within three years after the date on which a Missouri certified
capital company is designated as a Missouri certified capital company at least
forty percent of its certified capital shall be, or have been, placed in qualified
investments;
(3) Within four years after the date on which a Missouri certified
capital company is designated as a Missouri certified capital company, at least
fifty percent of its total certified capital shall be, or have been, placed in
qualified investments. A Missouri certified capital company may not make an
investment in an affiliate of the certified capital company. For the purposes of
this subsection, if a legal entity is not an affiliate before a certified capital
company initially invests in the entity, it will not be an affiliate if a certified
capital company provides additional investment in such entity subsequent to
its initial investment;
(4) A certified capital company, at least fifteen working days prior to
making what it determines to be an initial qualified investment in a specific
qualified Missouri business, shall certify to the department that the company in
which it or a qualified investing entity proposes to invest is a qualified
Missouri business. The certified capital company shall state the amount of
capital it or a qualified investing entity intends to invest and the name of the
business in which it or a qualified investing entity intends to invest. The

HB 3329 42
certified capital company shall also provide to the department an explanation
of its determination that the business meets the definition of a qualified
Missouri business. If the department determines that the business does not
meet the definition of a qualified Missouri business, it shall, within the fifteen-
working-day period prior to the making of the proposed investment, notify the
certified capital company of its determination and an explanation thereof. If
the department fails to notify the certified capital company with respect to the
proposed investment within the fifteen-working-day period prior to the making
of the proposed investment, the company in which the certified capital
company or a qualified investing entity proposes to invest shall be deemed to
be a qualified Missouri business. If a certified capital company fails to notify
the department prior to making an initial investment in a business, the
department may subsequently determine that the business in which the
certified capital company or a qualified investing entity invested was not a
qualified Missouri business even though the business, at the time of the
investment, met the requirements of subdivision (15) of subsection 2 of section
135.500;
(5) All certified capital which is not required to be placed in qualified
investments or which has been placed in qualified investments and can be
received by the company, may be held or invested in such manner as the
Missouri certified capital company, in its discretion, deems appropriate. The
proceeds of all certified capital which is received by a certified capital
company after it was originally placed in qualified investments may be placed
again in qualified investments and shall count toward any requirement in
sections 135.500 to 135.529 with respect to placing certified capital in
qualified investments.
2. A certified capital company may make qualified distributions at any
time. In order to make distributions, other than qualified distributions, a
certified capital company must have made cumulative qualified investments,
including those made through a qualified investing entity, in an amount
cumulatively equal to at least one hundred percent of its certified capital.
Cumulative distributions to equity holders, other than qualified distributions,
in excess of the certified capital company's original certified capital and any
additional capital contributions to the certified capital company shall be
subject to audit by a nationally recognized certified public accounting firm
acceptable to the department, at the expense of the certified capital company.
The audit shall determine whether aggregate cumulative distributions to all
investors and equity holders, other than qualified distributions, when
combined with all tax credits utilized by investors pursuant to sections
135.500 to 135.529, have resulted in an annual internal rate of return of fifteen
percent computed on the sum of total original certified capital of the certified
capital company and any additional capital contributions to the certified capital
company. Twenty-five percent of distributions made, other than qualified
distributions, in excess of the amount required to produce a fifteen percent
annual internal rate of return, as determined by the audit, shall be payable by
the certified capital company to the Missouri development finance board.
Distributions or payments to debt holders of a certified capital company,
however, may be made without restriction with respect to debt owed to them

HB 3329 43
by a certified capital company. A debt holder that is also an investor or equity
holder of a certified capital company may receive distributions or payments
with respect to such debt without restriction.
3. No qualified investment may be made at a cost to a Missouri
certified capital company greater than fifteen percent of the total certified
capital under management of the Missouri certified capital company at the
time of investment.
4. Documents and other materials submitted by Missouri certified
capital companies or by businesses for purposes of the continuance of
certification may be deemed "closed records" pursuant to the provisions of
section 620.014.
5. Each Missouri certified capital company shall report the following
to the department:
(1) As soon as practicable after the receipt of certified capital, the
name of each investor from which the certified capital was received, the
amount of each investor's investment of certified capital and tax credits
computed without regard to any limitations under subsection 3 of section
135.503, and the date on which the certified capital was received;
(2) On a quarterly basis, the amount of the Missouri certified capital
company's certified capital at the end of the quarter, whether or not the
Missouri certified capital company has invested, together with any
investments made by a qualified investing entity that are deemed to have
been made by the certified capital company, more than fifteen percent of the
total certified capital under management in any one company, and all qualified
100 investments that the Missouri certified capital company has made or has been
101 deemed to have been made through a qualified investing entity;
102 (3) Each Missouri certified capital company shall provide annual
103 audited financial statements to the department which include an opinion of an
104 independent certified public accountant to the department within ninety days
105 of the close of the fiscal year. At the same time, the certified capital company
106 shall also provide audited financial statements for any qualified investing
107 entity that has made qualified investments on its behalf, unless the financial
108 results of such qualified investing entity are included in the consolidated
109 financial statements of the certified capital company. The audit shall address
110 the methods of operation and conduct of the business of the Missouri certified
111 capital company to determine if the Missouri certified capital company is
112 complying with the statutes and program rules and that the funds received by
113 the Missouri certified capital company have been invested as required within
114 the time limits provided by sections 135.500 to 135.529.]
[135.517. In order for investments of a qualifying investing entity to
be counted as qualified investments pursuant to sections 135.500 to 135.529,
each such investment of a qualifying investing entity must have received prior
approval from the department.]
[135.520. 1. The division of finance shall conduct an annual review of
each Missouri certified capital company and any qualified investing entities
designated by it to determine if the Missouri certified capital company is

HB 3329 44
abiding by the requirements of certifications, to advise the Missouri certified
capital company as to the certification status of its qualified investments and to
ensure that no investment has been made in violation of sections 135.500 to
135.529. The cost of the annual review shall be paid by each Missouri
certified capital company according to a reasonable fee schedule adopted by
the department. The division of finance shall report its findings to the
department as soon as practicable following completion of the audit.
2. Any material violation of sections 135.500 to 135.529 shall be
grounds for decertification under this section. If the department determines
that a company is not in compliance with any requirements for continuing in
certification, it shall, by written notice, inform the officers of the company and
the board of directors, managers, trustees or general partners that they may be
decertified in one hundred twenty days from the date of mailing of the notice,
unless they correct the deficiencies and are again in compliance with the
requirements for certification.
3. At the end of the one hundred twenty-day grace period, if the
Missouri certified capital company is still not in compliance, the department
may send a notice of decertification to the company and to the directors of the
department of revenue and department of commerce and insurance.
Decertification of a Missouri certified capital company prior to the certified
capital company meeting all requirements of subdivisions (1) to (3) of
subsection 1 of section 135.516 shall cause the recapture of all premium tax
credits previously claimed by an investor and the forfeiture of all future credits
to be claimed by an investor with respect to its investment in the certified
capital company. Decertification of a Missouri certified capital company after
it has met all requirements of subdivisions (1) to (3) of subsection 1 of section
135.516 shall cause the forfeiture of premium tax credits for the taxable year
of the investor in which the decertification arose and for future taxable years
with no recapture of tax credits obtained by an investor with respect to the
investor's tax years which ended before the decertification occurred. Once a
certified capital company has made cumulative qualified investments,
including those made through a qualified investing entity and deemed to
have been made by the certified capital company, in an amount equal to at least
one hundred percent of its certified capital, all future premium tax credits to be
claimed by investors with respect to said certified capital company pursuant to
sections 135.500 to 135.529 shall be nonforfeitable. Once a certified capital
company has made cumulative qualified investments, including those made
through a qualified investing entity and deemed to have been made by the
certified capital company, in an amount equal to at least one hundred percent
of its certified capital and has met all other requirements under sections
135.500 to 135.529, it shall no longer be subject to regulation by the
department except with respect to the payment of distributions to the Missouri
development finance board.]
[135.523. The department may revoke the certification of a Missouri
certified capital company if any material representation to the department in
connection with the application process proves to have been falsely made or if

HB 3329 45
the application materially violates any requirement established by the
department pursuant to sections 135.500 to 135.529.]
[135.526. All investments for which tax credits are claimed under the
provisions of sections 135.500 to 135.529 shall satisfy the conditions of being
registered or specifically exempt from registration by provisions or regulations
under chapter 409.]
[135.529. 1. The tax credit established pursuant to sections 135.500 to
135.529 may be sold or transferred in accordance with regulations adopted by
the department. Any such sale or transfer shall not affect the time schedule for
taking the tax credit, as provided in sections 135.500 to 135.529. Any
premium tax credits recaptured pursuant to section 135.520 shall be the
liability of the taxpayer which actually claimed the credit. In approving the
sale or transfer of the credit pursuant to this section, the department may
require the transferor or the transferee or both the transferor and the transferee
to execute guarantees or post bonds with respect to any potential credit
recapture.
2. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the authority of
sections 135.500 to 135.529 shall become effective unless it has been
promulgated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 536. The department shall
make and promulgate emergency rules and regulations consistent with the
provisions of sections 135.500 to 135.529 as are necessary or useful to carry
out the provisions of sections 135.500 to 135.529, pursuant to section 536.025.
3. Every final order, decision, license or other official act of the
director pursuant to sections 135.500 to 135.529 is subject to administrative
review in accordance with chapter 621.]
[135.535. 1. A corporation, limited liability corporation, partnership
or sole proprietorship, which moves its operations from outside Missouri or
outside a distressed community into a distressed community, or which
commences operations in a distressed community on or after January 1, 1999,
and in either case has more than seventy-five percent of its employees at the
facility in the distressed community, and which has fewer than one hundred
employees for whom payroll taxes are paid, and which is a manufacturing,
biomedical, medical devices, scientific research, animal research, computer
software design or development, computer programming, including internet,
web hosting, and other information technology, wireless or wired or other
telecommunications or a professional firm shall receive a forty percent credit
against income taxes owed pursuant to chapter 143, 147 or 148, other than
taxes withheld pursuant to sections 143.191 to 143.265, for each of the three
years after such move, if approved by the department of economic
development, which shall issue a certificate of eligibility if the department
determines that the taxpayer is eligible for such credit. The maximum amount
of credits per taxpayer set forth in this subsection shall not exceed one hundred
twenty-five thousand dollars for each of the three years for which the credit is
claimed. The department of economic development, by means of rule or
regulation promulgated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 536, shall assign

HB 3329 46
appropriate North American Industry Classification System numbers to the
companies which are eligible for the tax credits provided for in this section.
Such three-year credits shall be awarded only one time to any company which
moves its operations from outside of Missouri or outside of a distressed
community into a distressed community or to a company which commences
operations within a distressed community. A taxpayer shall file an application
for certification of the tax credits for the first year in which credits are claimed
and for each of the two succeeding taxable years for which credits are claimed.
2. Employees of such facilities physically working and earning wages
for that work within a distressed community whose employers have been
approved for tax credits pursuant to subsection 1 of this section by the
department of economic development for whom payroll taxes are paid shall
also be eligible to receive a tax credit against individual income tax, imposed
pursuant to chapter 143, equal to one and one-half percent of their gross salary
paid at such facility earned for each of the three years that the facility receives
the tax credit provided by this section, so long as they were qualified
employees of such entity. The employer shall calculate the amount of such
credit and shall report the amount to the employee and the department of
revenue.
3. A tax credit against income taxes owed pursuant to chapter 143, 147
or 148, other than the taxes withheld pursuant to sections 143.191 to 143.265,
in lieu of the credit against income taxes as provided in subsection 1 of this
section, may be taken by such an entity in a distressed community in an
amount of forty percent of the amount of funds expended for computer
equipment and its maintenance, medical laboratories and equipment, research
laboratory equipment, manufacturing equipment, fiber optic equipment, high
speed telecommunications, wiring or software development expense up to a
maximum of seventy-five thousand dollars in tax credits for such equipment or
expense per year per entity and for each of three years after commencement in
or moving operations into a distressed community.
4. A corporation, partnership or sole partnership, which has no more
than one hundred employees for whom payroll taxes are paid, which is already
located in a distressed community and which expends funds for such
equipment pursuant to subsection 3 of this section in an amount exceeding its
average of the prior two years for such equipment, shall be eligible to receive a
tax credit against income taxes owed pursuant to chapters 143, 147 and 148 in
an amount equal to the lesser of seventy-five thousand dollars or twenty-five
percent of the funds expended for such additional equipment per such entity.
Tax credits allowed pursuant to this subsection or subsection 1 of this section
may be carried back to any of the three prior tax years and carried forward to
any of the next five tax years.
5. An existing corporation, partnership or sole proprietorship that is
located within a distressed community and that relocates employees from
another facility outside of the distressed community to its facility within the
distressed community, and an existing business located within a distressed
community that hires new employees for that facility may both be eligible for
the tax credits allowed by subsections 1 and 3 of this section. To be eligible
for such tax credits, such a business, during one of its tax years, shall employ

HB 3329 47
within a distressed community at least twice as many employees as were
employed at the beginning of that tax year. A business hiring employees shall
have no more than one hundred employees before the addition of the new
employees. This subsection shall only apply to a business which is a
manufacturing, biomedical, medical devices, scientific research, animal
research, computer software design or development, computer programming
or telecommunications business, or a professional firm.
6. Tax credits shall be approved for applicants meeting the
requirements of this section in the order that such applications are received.
Certificates of tax credits issued in accordance with this section may be
transferred, sold or assigned by notarized endorsement which names the
transferee.
7. The tax credits allowed pursuant to subsections 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5 of
this section shall be for an amount of no more than ten million dollars for each
year beginning in 1999. The total maximum credit for all entities already
located in distressed communities and claiming credits pursuant to subsection
4 of this section shall be seven hundred and fifty thousand dollars. The
department of economic development in approving taxpayers for the credit as
provided for in subsection 6 of this section shall use information provided by
the department of revenue regarding taxes paid in the previous year, or
projected taxes for those entities newly established in the state, as the method
of determining when this maximum will be reached and shall maintain a
record of the order of approval. Any tax credit not used in the period for
which the credit was approved may be carried over until the full credit has
been allowed.
8. A Missouri employer relocating into a distressed community and
having employees covered by a collective bargaining agreement at the facility
from which it is relocating shall not be eligible for the credits in subsection 1,
3, 4 or 5 of this section, and its employees shall not be eligible for the credit in
subsection 2 of this section if the relocation violates or terminates a collective
bargaining agreement covering employees at the facility, unless the affected
100 collective bargaining unit concurs with the move.
101 9. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no taxpayer
102 shall earn the tax credits allowed in this section and the tax credits otherwise
103 allowed in section 135.110, or the tax credits, exemptions, and refund
104 otherwise allowed in sections 135.200, 135.220, 135.225 and 135.245,
105 respectively, for the same business for the same tax period.]
[135.545. A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit for taxes paid pursuant
to chapter 143, 147 or 148 in an amount equal to fifty percent of a qualified
investment in transportation development for aviation, mass transportation,
including parking facilities for users of mass transportation, railroads, ports,
including parking facilities and limited access roads within ports, waterborne
transportation, bicycle and pedestrian paths, or rolling stock located in a
distressed community as defined in section 135.530, and which are part of a
development plan approved by the appropriate local agency. If the department
of economic development determines the investment has been so approved,
the department shall grant the tax credit in order of date received. A taxpayer

HB 3329 48
may carry forward any unused tax credit for up to ten years and may carry it
back for the previous three years until such credit has been fully claimed.
Certificates of tax credit issued in accordance with this section may be
transferred, sold or assigned by notarized endorsement which names the
transferee. The tax credits allowed pursuant to this section shall be for an
amount of no more than ten million dollars for each year. This credit shall
apply to returns filed for all taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
1999. Any unused portion of the tax credit authorized pursuant to this section
shall be available for use in the future by those entities until fully claimed. For
purposes of this section, a "taxpayer" shall include any charitable organization
that is exempt from federal income tax and whose Missouri unrelated business
taxable income, if any, would be subject to the state income tax imposed under
chapter 143.]
[135.546. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, no
tax credits shall be approved, awarded, or issued to any person or entity
claiming any tax credit under section 135.545; if an organization has been
allocated credits for contribution-based credits prior to January 1, 2005, the
organization may issue such credits prior to January 1, 2007, for qualified
contributions.]
[135.679. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the
"Qualified Beef Tax Credit Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Agricultural property", any real and personal property, including
but not limited to buildings, structures, improvements, equipment, and
livestock, that is used in or is to be used in this state by residents of this
state for:
(a) The operation of a farm or ranch; and
(b) Grazing, feeding, or the care of livestock;
(2) "Authority", the agricultural and small business development
authority established in chapter 348;
(3) "Backgrounded", any additional weight at the time of the first
qualifying sale, before being finished, above the established baseline weight;
(4) "Baseline weight", the average weight in the immediate past two
years of all beef animals sold that are thirty months of age or younger,
categorized by sex. Baseline weight for qualified beef animals that are
physically out-of-state but whose ownership is retained by a resident of this
state shall be established by the average transfer weight in the immediate past
two years of all beef animals that are thirty months of age or younger and that
are transferred out-of-state but whose ownership is retained by a resident of
this state, categorized by sex. The established baseline weight shall be
effective for a period of three years. If the taxpayer is a qualifying beef animal
producer with fewer than two years of production, the baseline weight shall be
established by the available average weight in the immediate past year of all
beef animals sold that are thirty months of age or younger, categorized by sex.
If the qualifying beef animal producer has no previous production, the baseline
weight shall be established by the authority;

HB 3329 49
(5) "Finished", the period from backgrounded to harvest;
(6) "Qualifying beef animal", any beef animal that is certified by the
authority, that was born in this state after August 28, 2008, that was raised and
backgrounded or finished in this state by the taxpayer, excluding any beef
animal more than thirty months of age as verified by certified written birth
records;
(7) "Qualifying sale", the first time a qualifying beef animal is sold in
this state after the qualifying beef animal is backgrounded, and a subsequent
sale if the weight of the qualifying beef animal at the time of the subsequent
sale is greater than the weight of the qualifying beef animal at the time of the
first qualifying sale of such beef animal;
(8) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise due under chapter
143, excluding withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, or
otherwise due under chapter 147;
(9) "Taxpayer", any individual or entity who:
(a) Is subject to the tax imposed in chapter 143, excluding withholding
tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, or the tax imposed in chapter
147;
(b) In the case of an individual, is a resident of this state as verified by
a 911 address or in the absence of a 911 system, a physical address; and
(c) Owns or rents agricultural property and principal place of business
is located in this state.
3. (1) For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2009, but
ending on or before December 31, 2021, a taxpayer shall be allowed a tax
credit for the first qualifying sale and for a subsequent qualifying sale of all
qualifying beef animals.
(2) The tax credit amount for the first qualifying sale shall be ten cents
per pound for qualifying sale weights under six hundred pounds and twenty-
five cents per pound for qualifying sale weights of six hundred pounds or
greater, shall be based on the backgrounded weight of all qualifying beef
animals at the time of the first qualifying sale, and shall be calculated as
follows:
(a) If the qualifying sale weight is under six hundred pounds, the
qualifying sale weight minus the baseline weight multiplied by ten cents, as
long as the qualifying sale weight is equal to or greater than one hundred
pounds above the baseline weight; or
(b) If the qualifying sale weight is six hundred pounds or greater, the
qualifying sale weight minus the baseline weight multiplied by twenty-five
cents, as long as the qualifying sale weight is equal to or greater than one
hundred pounds above the baseline weight.
(3) The tax credit amount for each subsequent qualifying sale shall be
ten cents per pound for qualifying sale weights under six hundred pounds and
twenty-five cents per pound for qualifying sale weights of six hundred pounds
or greater, shall be based on the backgrounded weight of all qualifying beef
animals at the time of the subsequent qualifying sale, and shall be calculated as
follows:
(a) If the qualifying sale weight is under six hundred pounds, the
qualifying sale weight minus the baseline weight multiplied by ten cents, as

HB 3329 50
long as the qualifying sale weight is equal to or greater than one hundred
pounds above the baseline weight; or
(b) If the qualifying sale weight is six hundred pounds or greater, the
qualifying sale weight minus the baseline weight multiplied by twenty-five
cents, as long as the qualifying sale weight is equal to or greater than one
hundred pounds above the baseline weight.

The authority may waive no more than twenty-five percent of the one-
hundred-pound weight gain requirement, but any such waiver shall be based
on a disaster declaration issued by the U.S. Department of Agriculture.
4. The amount of the tax credit claimed shall not exceed the amount of
the taxpayer's state tax liability for the tax year for which the credit is claimed.
No tax credit claimed under this section shall be refundable. The tax credit
shall be claimed in the tax year in which the qualifying sale of the qualifying
beef occurred, but any amount of credit that the taxpayer is prohibited by this
section from claiming in a tax year may be carried forward to any of the
taxpayer's four subsequent tax years. The total amount of tax credits that any
taxpayer may claim shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars per year. No
taxpayer shall be allowed to claim tax credits under this section for more than
three years. The amount of tax credits that may be issued to all eligible
applicants claiming tax credits authorized in this section and section 135.686
in a calendar year shall not exceed two million dollars. Tax credits shall be
issued on an as-received application basis until the calendar year limit is
reached. Any credits not issued in any calendar year shall expire and shall not
100 be issued in any subsequent years.
101 5. To claim the tax credit allowed under this section, the taxpayer shall
102 submit to the authority an application for the tax credit on a form provided by
103 the authority and any application fee imposed by the authority. The
104 application shall be filed with the authority at the end of each calendar year in
105 which a qualified sale was made and for which a tax credit is claimed under
106 this section. The application shall include any certified documentation and
107 information required by the authority. All required information obtained by
108 the authority shall be confidential and not disclosed except by court order,
109 subpoena, or as otherwise provided by law. If the taxpayer and the qualified
110 sale meet all criteria required by this section and approval is granted by the
111 authority, the authority shall issue a tax credit certificate in the appropriate
112 amount. Tax credit certificates issued under this section may be assigned,
113 transferred, sold, or otherwise conveyed, and the new owner of the tax credit
114 certificate shall have the same rights in the tax credit as the original taxpayer.
115 Whenever a tax credit certificate is assigned, transferred, sold or otherwise
116 conveyed, a notarized endorsement shall be filed with the authority specifying
117 the name and address of the new owner of the tax credit certificate or the value
118 of the tax credit.
119 6. Any information provided under this section shall be confidential
120 information, to be shared with no one except state and federal animal health
121 officials, except as provided in subsection 5 of this section.

HB 3329 51
122 7. The authority shall, at least annually, submit a report to the Missouri
123 general assembly reviewing the costs and benefits of the program established
124 under this section.
125 8. The authority may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of
126 this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
127 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
128 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions
129 of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
130 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
131 assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
132 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
133 grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
134 28, 2007, shall be invalid and void.
135 9. This section shall not be subject to the Missouri sunset act, sections
136 23.250 to 23.298.]
[135.680. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Adjusted purchase price", the product of:
(a) The amount paid to the issuer of a qualified equity investment for
such qualified equity investment; and
(b) The following fraction:
a. The numerator shall be the dollar amount of qualified low-income
community investments held by the issuer in this state as of the credit
allowance date during the applicable tax year; and
b. The denominator shall be the total dollar amount of qualified low-
income community investments held by the issuer in all states as of the credit
allowance date during the applicable tax year;
c. For purposes of calculating the amount of qualified low-income
community investments held by an issuer, an investment shall be considered
held by an issuer even if the investment has been sold or repaid; provided that
the issuer reinvests an amount equal to the capital returned to or recovered by
the issuer from the original investment, exclusive of any profits realized, in
another qualified low-income community investment within twelve months of
the receipt of such capital. An issuer shall not be required to reinvest capital
returned from qualified low-income community investments after the sixth
anniversary of the issuance of the qualified equity investment, the proceeds of
which were used to make the qualified low-income community investment,
and the qualified low-income community investment shall be considered held
by the issuer through the seventh anniversary of the qualified equity
investment's issuance;
(2) "Applicable percentage", zero percent for each of the first two
credit allowance dates, seven percent for the third credit allowance date, and
eight percent for the next four credit allowance dates;
(3) "Credit allowance date", with respect to any qualified equity
investment:
(a) The date on which such investment is initially made; and
(b) Each of the six anniversary dates of such date thereafter;

HB 3329 52
(4) "Long-term debt security", any debt instrument issued by a
qualified community development entity, at par value or a premium, with an
original maturity date of at least seven years from the date of its issuance, with
no acceleration of repayment, amortization, or prepayment features prior to its
original maturity date, and with no distribution, payment, or interest features
related to the profitability of the qualified community development entity or
the performance of the qualified community development entity's investment
portfolio. The foregoing shall in no way limit the holder's ability to accelerate
payments on the debt instrument in situations where the issuer has defaulted
on covenants designed to ensure compliance with this section or Section 45D
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(5) "Qualified active low-income community business", the meaning
given such term in Section 45D of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended; provided that any business that derives or projects to derive fifteen
percent or more of its annual revenue from the rental or sale of real estate shall
not be considered to be a qualified active low-income community business;
(6) "Qualified community development entity", the meaning given
such term in Section 45D of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
provided that such entity has entered into an allocation agreement with the
Community Development Financial Institutions Fund of the U.S. Treasury
Department with respect to credits authorized by Section 45D of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, which includes the state of Missouri
within the service area set forth in such allocation agreement;
(7) "Qualified equity investment", any equity investment in, or long-
term debt security issued by, a qualified community development entity that:
(a) Is acquired after September 4, 2007, at its original issuance solely
in exchange for cash;
(b) Has at least eighty-five percent of its cash purchase price used by
the issuer to make qualified low-income community investments; and
(c) Is designated by the issuer as a qualified equity investment under
this subdivision and is certified by the department of economic development
as not exceeding the limitation contained in subsection 2 of this section. This
term shall include any qualified equity investment that does not meet the
provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivision if such investment was a
qualified equity investment in the hands of a prior holder;
(8) "Qualified low-income community investment", any capital or
equity investment in, or loan to, any qualified active low-income community
business. With respect to any one qualified active low-income community
business, the maximum amount of qualified low-income community
investments made in such business, on a collective basis with all of its
affiliates, that may be used from the calculation of any numerator described in
subparagraph a. of paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
ten million dollars whether issued to one or several qualified community
development entities;
(9) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise due under chapter
143, excluding withholding tax imposed in sections 143.191 to 143.265, or
otherwise due under section 375.916 or chapter 147, 148, or 153;

HB 3329 53
(10) "Taxpayer", any individual or entity subject to the tax imposed in
chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed in sections 143.191 to
143.265, or the tax imposed in section 375.916 or chapter 147, 148, or 153.
2. A taxpayer that makes a qualified equity investment earns a vested
right to tax credits under this section. On each credit allowance date of such
qualified equity investment the taxpayer, or subsequent holder of the qualified
equity investment, shall be entitled to a tax credit during the taxable year
including such credit allowance date. The tax credit amount shall be equal to
the applicable percentage of the adjusted purchase price paid to the issuer of
such qualified equity investment. The amount of the tax credit claimed shall
not exceed the amount of the taxpayer's state tax liability for the tax year for
which the tax credit is claimed. No tax credit claimed under this section shall
be refundable or transferable. Tax credits earned by a partnership, limited
liability company, S-corporation, or other pass-through entity may be allocated
to the partners, members, or shareholders of such entity for their direct use in
accordance with the provisions of any agreement among such partners,
members, or shareholders. Any amount of tax credit that the taxpayer is
prohibited by this section from claiming in a taxable year may be carried
forward to any of the taxpayer's five subsequent taxable years. The
department of economic development shall limit the monetary amount of
qualified equity investments permitted under this section to a level necessary
100 to limit tax credit utilization at no more than twenty-five million dollars of tax
101 credits in any fiscal year. Such limitation on qualified equity investments shall
102 be based on the anticipated utilization of credits without regard to the potential
103 for taxpayers to carry forward tax credits to later tax years.
104 3. The issuer of the qualified equity investment shall certify to the
105 department of economic development the anticipated dollar amount of such
106 investments to be made in this state during the first twelve-month period
107 following the initial credit allowance date. If on the second credit allowance
108 date, the actual dollar amount of such investments is different than the amount
109 estimated, the department of economic development shall adjust the credits
110 arising on the second allowance date to account for such difference.
111 4. The department of economic development shall recapture the tax
112 credit allowed under this section with respect to such qualified equity
113 investment under this section if:
114 (1) Any amount of the federal tax credit available with respect to a
115 qualified equity investment that is eligible for a tax credit under this section is
116 recaptured under Section 45D of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
117 amended; or
118 (2) The issuer redeems or makes principal repayment with respect to a
119 qualified equity investment prior to the seventh anniversary of the issuance of
120 such qualified equity investment. Any tax credit that is subject to recapture
121 shall be recaptured from the taxpayer that claimed the tax credit on a return.
122 5. The department of economic development shall promulgate rules to
123 implement the provisions of this section, including recapture provisions on a
124 scaled proportional basis, and to administer the allocation of tax credits issued
125 for qualified equity investments, which shall be conducted on a first-come,
126 first-serve basis. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in

HB 3329 54
127 section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section
128 shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
129 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
130 chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
131 assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
132 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
133 grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
134 September 4, 2007, shall be invalid and void.
135 6. For fiscal years following fiscal year 2010, qualified equity
136 investments shall not be made under this section unless reauthorization is
137 made pursuant to this subsection. For all fiscal years following fiscal year
138 2010, unless the general assembly adopts a concurrent resolution granting
139 authority to the department of economic development to approve qualified
140 equity investments for the Missouri new markets development program and
141 clearly describing the amount of tax credits available for the next fiscal year,
142 or otherwise complies with the provisions of this subsection, no qualified
143 equity investments may be permitted to be made under this section. The
144 amount of available tax credits contained in such a resolution shall not exceed
145 the limitation provided under subsection 2 of this section. In any year in
146 which the provisions of this section shall sunset pursuant to subsection 7 of
147 this section, reauthorization shall be made by general law and not by
148 concurrent resolution. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a taxpayer
149 who makes a qualified equity investment prior to the expiration of authority to
150 make qualified equity investments from claiming tax credits relating to such
151 qualified equity investment for each applicable credit allowance date.
152 7. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
153 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
154 shall automatically sunset six years after September 4, 2007, unless
155 reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
156 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
157 section shall automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the
158 reauthorization of this section; and
159 (3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
160 immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
161 under this section is sunset. However, nothing in this subsection shall preclude
162 a taxpayer who makes a qualified equity investment prior to sunset of this
163 section under the provisions of section 23.253 from claiming tax credits
164 relating to such qualified equity investment for each credit allowance date.]
[135.682. 1. The director of the department of economic development
or the director's designee shall issue letter rulings regarding the tax credit
program authorized under section 135.680, subject to the terms and conditions
set forth in this section. The director of the department of economic
development may impose additional terms and conditions consistent with this
section to requests for letter rulings by regulation promulgated under chapter
536. For the purposes of this section, the term "letter ruling" means a written
interpretation of law to a specific set of facts provided by the applicant
requesting a letter ruling.

HB 3329 55
2. The director or director's designee shall respond to a request for a
letter ruling within sixty days of receipt of such request. The applicant may
provide a draft letter ruling for the department's consideration. The applicant
may withdraw the request for a letter ruling, in writing, prior to the issuance of
the letter ruling. The director or the director's designee may refuse to issue a
letter ruling for good cause, but must list the specific reasons for refusing to
issue the letter ruling. Good cause includes, but is not limited to:
(1) The applicant requests the director to determine whether a statute
is constitutional or a regulation is lawful;
(2) The request involves a hypothetical situation or alternative plans;
(3) The facts or issues presented in the request are unclear, overbroad,
insufficient, or otherwise inappropriate as a basis upon which to issue a letter
ruling; and
(4) The issue is currently being considered in a rulemaking procedure,
contested case, or other agency or judicial proceeding that may definitely
resolve the issue.
3. Letter rulings shall bind the director and the director's agents and
their successors until such time as the taxpayer or its shareholders, members,
or partners, as applicable, claim all of such tax credits on a Missouri tax return,
subject to the terms and conditions set forth in properly published regulations.
The letter ruling shall apply only to the applicant.
4. Letter rulings issued under the authority of this section shall not be a
rule as defined in section 536.010 in that it is an interpretation issued by the
department with respect to a specific set of facts and intended to apply only to
that specific set of facts, and therefore shall not be subject to the rulemaking
requirements of chapter 536.
5. Information in letter ruling requests as described in section 620.014
shall be closed to the public. Copies of letter rulings shall be available to the
public provided that the applicant identifying information and otherwise
protected information is redacted from the letter ruling as provided in
subsection 1 of section 610.024.]
[135.700. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 1999, a
grape grower or wine producer shall be allowed a tax credit against the state
tax liability incurred pursuant to chapter 143, exclusive of the provisions
relating to the withholding of tax as provided in sections 143.191 to 143.265,
in an amount equal to twenty-five percent of the purchase price of all new
equipment and materials used directly in the growing of grapes or the
production of wine in the state. Each grower or producer shall apply to the
department of economic development and specify the total amount of such
new equipment and materials purchased during the calendar year. The
department of economic development shall certify to the department of
revenue the amount of such tax credit to which a grape grower or wine
producer is entitled pursuant to this section. The provisions of this section
notwithstanding, a grower or producer may only apply for and receive the
credit authorized by this section for five tax periods.]
[135.710. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:

HB 3329 56
(1) "Alternative fuel vehicle refueling property", property in this state
owned by an eligible applicant and used for storing alternative fuels and for
dispensing such alternative fuels into fuel tanks of motor vehicles owned by
such eligible applicant or private citizens;
(2) "Alternative fuels", any motor fuel at least seventy percent of the
volume of which consists of one or more of the following:
(a) Ethanol;
(b) Natural gas;
(c) Compressed natural gas, or CNG;
(d) Liquified natural gas, or LNG;
(e) Liquified petroleum gas, or LP gas, propane, or autogas;
(f) Any mixture of biodiesel and diesel fuel, without regard to any use
of kerosene;
(g) Hydrogen;
(3) "Department", the department of economic development;
(4) "Electric vehicle recharging property", property in this state owned
by an eligible applicant and used for recharging electric motor vehicles owned
by such eligible applicant or private citizens;
(5) "Eligible applicant", a business entity or private citizen that is the
owner of an electric vehicle recharging property or an alternative fuel vehicle
refueling property;
(6) "Qualified Missouri contractor", a contractor whose principal place
of business is located in Missouri and has been located in Missouri for a period
of not less than five years;
(7) "Qualified property", an electric vehicle recharging property or an
alternative fuel vehicle refueling property which, if constructed after August
28, 2014, was constructed with at least fifty-one percent of the costs being paid
to qualified Missouri contractors for the:
(a) Fabrication of premanufactured equipment or process piping used
in the construction of such facility;
(b) Construction of such facility; and
(c) General maintenance of such facility during the time period in
which such facility receives any tax credit under this section.

If no qualified Missouri contractor is located within seventy-five miles of the
property, the requirement that fifty-one percent of the costs shall be paid to
qualified Missouri contractors shall not apply.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, but before
January 1, 2018, any eligible applicant who installs and operates a qualified
property shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due under chapter
143, excluding withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, or
due under chapter 147 or chapter 148 for any tax year in which the applicant is
constructing the qualified property. The credit allowed in this section per
eligible applicant who is a private citizen shall not exceed fifteen hundred
dollars or per eligible applicant that is a business entity shall not exceed the
lesser of twenty thousand dollars or twenty percent of the total costs directly
associated with the purchase and installation of any alternative fuel storage and

HB 3329 57
dispensing equipment or any recharging equipment on any qualified property,
which shall not include the following:
(1) Costs associated with the purchase of land upon which to place a
qualified property;
(2) Costs associated with the purchase of an existing qualified
property; or
(3) Costs for the construction or purchase of any structure.
3. Tax credits allowed by this section shall be claimed by the eligible
applicant at the time such applicant files a return for the tax year in which the
storage and dispensing or recharging facilities were placed in service at a
qualified property, and shall be applied against the income tax liability
imposed by chapter 143, chapter 147, or chapter 148 after all other credits
provided by law have been applied. The cumulative amount of tax credits
which may be claimed by eligible applicants claiming all credits authorized in
this section shall not exceed one million dollars in any calendar year, subject to
appropriations.
4. If the amount of the tax credit exceeds the eligible applicant's tax
liability, the difference shall not be refundable. Any amount of credit that an
eligible applicant is prohibited by this section from claiming in a taxable year
may be carried forward to any of such applicant's two subsequent taxable
years. Tax credits allowed under this section may be assigned, transferred,
sold, or otherwise conveyed.
5. Any qualified property, for which an eligible applicant receives tax
credits under this section, which ceases to sell alternative fuel or recharge
electric vehicles shall cause the forfeiture of such eligible applicant's tax
credits provided under this section for the taxable year in which the qualified
property ceased to sell alternative fuel or recharge electric vehicles and for
future taxable years with no recapture of tax credits obtained by an eligible
applicant with respect to such applicant's tax years which ended before the sale
of alternative fuel or recharging of electric vehicles ceased.
6. The director of revenue shall establish the procedure by which the
tax credits in this section may be claimed, and shall establish a procedure by
which the cumulative amount of tax credits is apportioned equally among all
eligible applicants claiming the credit. To the maximum extent possible, the
director of revenue shall establish the procedure described in this subsection in
such a manner as to ensure that eligible applicants can claim all the tax credits
possible up to the cumulative amount of tax credits available for the taxable
year. No eligible applicant claiming a tax credit under this section shall be
liable for any interest or penalty for filing a tax return after the date fixed for
filing such return as a result of the apportionment procedure under this
subsection.
7. Any eligible applicant desiring to claim a tax credit under this
section shall submit the appropriate application for such credit with the
department. The application for a tax credit under this section shall include
any information required by the department. The department shall review the
applications and certify to the department of revenue each eligible applicant
that qualifies for the tax credit.

HB 3329 58
8. The department and the department of revenue may promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
100 subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
101 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
102 powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
103 delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
104 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
105 proposed or adopted after August 28, 2008, shall be invalid and void.
106 9. The provisions of section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act
107 notwithstanding:
108 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
109 shall automatically sunset three years after December 31, 2014, unless
110 reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
111 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
112 section shall automatically sunset six years after the effective date of the
113 reauthorization of this section; and
114 (3) This section shall terminate on December thirty-first of the
115 calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the program
116 authorized under this section is sunset; and
117 (4) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to limit or
118 in any way impair the department's ability to redeem tax credits authorized on
119 or before the date the program authorized under this section expires or a
120 taxpayer's ability to redeem such tax credits.]
[135.766. An eligible small business, as defined in Section 44 of the
Internal Revenue Code, shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due
pursuant to chapter 143, not including sections 143.191 to 143.265, in an
amount equal to any amount paid by the eligible small business to the United
States Small Business Administration as a guaranty fee pursuant to obtaining
Small Business Administration guaranteed financing and to programs
administered by the United States Department of Agriculture for rural
development or farm service agencies. No tax credits provided under this
section shall be authorized on or after the thirtieth day following the effective
date of this act. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to
limit or in any way impair the department's ability to issue tax credits
authorized prior to the thirtieth day following the effective date of this act, or a
taxpayer's ability to redeem such tax credits.]
[135.950. The following terms, whenever used in sections 135.950 to
135.970 mean:
(1) "Average wage", the new payroll divided by the number of new
jobs;
(2) "Blighted area", the same meaning as defined pursuant to section
99.805;
(3) "Board", an enhanced enterprise zone board established pursuant
to section 135.957;

HB 3329 59
(4) "Commencement of commercial operations" shall be deemed to
occur during the first taxable year for which the new business facility is first
put into use by the taxpayer in the enhanced business enterprise in which the
taxpayer intends to use the new business facility;
(5) "County average wage", the average wages in each county as
determined by the department for the most recently completed full calendar
year. However, if the computed county average wage is above the statewide
average wage, the statewide average wage shall be deemed the county average
wage for such county for the purpose of determining eligibility. The
department shall publish the county average wage for each county at least
annually. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision to the contrary,
for any taxpayer that in conjunction with their project is relocating employees
from a Missouri county with a higher county average wage, such taxpayer
shall obtain the endorsement of the governing body of the community from
which jobs are being relocated or the county average wage for their project
shall be the county average wage for the county from which the employees are
being relocated;
(6) "Department", the department of economic development;
(7) "Director", the director of the department of economic
development;
(8) "Employee", a person employed by the enhanced business
enterprise that is scheduled to work an average of at least one thousand hours
per year, and such person at all times has health insurance offered to him or
her, which is partially paid for by the employer;
(9) "Enhanced business enterprise", an industry or one of a cluster of
industries that is either:
(a) Identified by the department as critical to the state's economic
security and growth; or
(b) Will have an impact on industry cluster development, as identified
by the governing authority in its application for designation of an enhanced
enterprise zone and approved by the department; but excluding gambling
establishments (NAICS industry group 7132), retail trade (NAICS sectors 44
and 45), educational services (NAICS sector 61), religious organizations
(NAICS industry group 8131), public administration (NAICS sector 92), and
food and drinking places (NAICS subsector 722), however, notwithstanding
provisions of this section to the contrary, headquarters or administrative
offices of an otherwise excluded business may qualify for benefits if the
offices serve a multistate territory. In the event a national, state, or regional
headquarters operation is not the predominant activity of a project facility, the
new jobs and investment of such headquarters operation is considered eligible
for benefits under this section if the other requirements are satisfied. Service
industries may be eligible only if a majority of its annual revenues will be
derived from out of the state;
(10) "Existing business facility", any facility in this state which was
employed by the taxpayer claiming the credit in the operation of an enhanced
business enterprise immediately prior to an expansion, acquisition, addition, or
replacement;

HB 3329 60
(11) "Facility", any building used as an enhanced business enterprise
located within an enhanced enterprise zone, including the land on which the
facility is located and all machinery, equipment, and other real and depreciable
tangible personal property acquired for use at and located at or within such
facility and used in connection with the operation of such facility;
(12) "Facility base employment", the greater of the number of
employees located at the facility on the date of the notice of intent, or for the
twelve-month period prior to the date of the notice of intent, the average
number of employees located at the facility, or in the event the project facility
has not been in operation for a full twelve-month period, the average number
of employees for the number of months the facility has been in operation prior
to the date of the notice of intent;
(13) "Facility base payroll", the total amount of taxable wages paid by
the enhanced business enterprise to employees of the enhanced business
enterprise located at the facility in the twelve months prior to the notice of
intent, not including the payroll of owners of the enhanced business enterprise
unless the enhanced business enterprise is participating in an employee stock
ownership plan. For the purposes of calculating the benefits under this
program, the amount of base payroll shall increase each year based on the
consumer price index or other comparable measure, as determined by the
department;
(14) "Governing authority", the body holding primary legislative
authority over a county or incorporated municipality;
(15) "Megaproject", any manufacturing or assembling facility,
approved by the department for construction and operation within an
enhanced enterprise zone, which satisfies the following:
(a) The new capital investment is projected to exceed three hundred
million dollars over a period of eight years from the date of approval by the
department;
(b) The number of new jobs is projected to exceed one thousand over a
period of eight years beginning on the date of approval by the department;
(c) The average wage of new jobs to be created shall exceed the
county average wage;
(d) The taxpayer shall offer health insurance to all new jobs and pay at
least eighty percent of such insurance premiums; and
(e) An acceptable plan of repayment, to the state, of the tax credits
provided for the megaproject has been provided by the taxpayer;
(16) "NAICS", the 1997 edition of the North American Industry
Classification System as prepared by the Executive Office of the President,
Office of Management and Budget. Any NAICS sector, subsector, industry
group or industry identified in this section shall include its corresponding
classification in subsequent federal industry classification systems;
(17) "New business facility", a facility that does not produce or
generate electrical energy from a renewable energy resource and satisfies the
100 following requirements:
101 (a) Such facility is employed by the taxpayer in the operation of an
102 enhanced business enterprise. Such facility shall not be considered a new
103 business facility in the hands of the taxpayer if the taxpayer's only activity with

HB 3329 61
104 respect to such facility is to lease it to another person or persons. If the
105 taxpayer employs only a portion of such facility in the operation of an
106 enhanced business enterprise, and leases another portion of such facility to
107 another person or persons or does not otherwise use such other portions in the
108 operation of an enhanced business enterprise, the portion employed by the
109 taxpayer in the operation of an enhanced business enterprise shall be
110 considered a new business facility, if the requirements of paragraphs (b), (c),
111 and (d) of this subdivision are satisfied;
112 (b) Such facility is acquired by, or leased to, the taxpayer after
113 December 31, 2004. A facility shall be deemed to have been acquired by, or
114 leased to, the taxpayer after December 31, 2004, if the transfer of title to the
115 taxpayer, the transfer of possession pursuant to a binding contract to transfer
116 title to the taxpayer, or the commencement of the term of the lease to the
117 taxpayer occurs after December 31, 2004;
118 (c) If such facility was acquired by the taxpayer from another taxpayer
119 and such facility was employed immediately prior to the acquisition by
120 another taxpayer in the operation of an enhanced business enterprise, the
121 operation of the same or a substantially similar enhanced business enterprise is
122 not continued by the taxpayer at such facility; and
123 (d) Such facility is not a replacement business facility, as defined in
124 subdivision (27) of this section;
125 (18) "New business facility employee", an employee of the taxpayer in
126 the operation of a new business facility during the taxable year for which the
127 credit allowed by section 135.967 is claimed, except that truck drivers and rail
128 and barge vehicle operators and other operators of rolling stock for hire shall
129 not constitute new business facility employees;
130 (19) "New business facility investment", the value of real and
131 depreciable tangible personal property, acquired by the taxpayer as part of the
132 new business facility, which is used by the taxpayer in the operation of the new
133 business facility, during the taxable year for which the credit allowed by
134 135.967 is claimed, except that trucks, truck-trailers, truck semitrailers, rail
135 vehicles, barge vehicles, aircraft and other rolling stock for hire, track,
136 switches, barges, bridges, tunnels, and rail yards and spurs shall not constitute
137 new business facility investments. The total value of such property during
138 such taxable year shall be:
139 (a) Its original cost if owned by the taxpayer; or
140 (b) Eight times the net annual rental rate, if leased by the taxpayer.
141 The net annual rental rate shall be the annual rental rate paid by the taxpayer
142 less any annual rental rate received by the taxpayer from subrentals. The new
143 business facility investment shall be determined by dividing by twelve the sum
144 of the total value of such property on the last business day of each calendar
145 month of the taxable year. If the new business facility is in operation for less
146 than an entire taxable year, the new business facility investment shall be
147 determined by dividing the sum of the total value of such property on the last
148 business day of each full calendar month during the portion of such taxable
149 year during which the new business facility was in operation by the number of
150 full calendar months during such period;

HB 3329 62
151 (20) "New job", the number of employees located at the facility that
152 exceeds the facility base employment less any decrease in the number of the
153 employees at related facilities below the related facility base employment. No
154 job that was created prior to the date of the notice of intent shall be deemed a
155 new job;
156 (21) "Notice of intent", a form developed by the department which is
157 completed by the enhanced business enterprise and submitted to the
158 department which states the enhanced business enterprise's intent to hire
159 new jobs and request benefits under such program;
160 (22) "Related facility", a facility operated by the enhanced business
161 enterprise or a related company in this state that is directly related to the
162 operation of the project facility;
163 (23) "Related facility base employment", the greater of:
164 (a) The number of employees located at all related facilities on the
165 date of the notice of intent; or
166 (b) For the twelve-month period prior to the date of the notice of
167 intent, the average number of employees located at all related facilities of the
168 enhanced business enterprise or a related company located in this state;
169 (24) "Related taxpayer":
170 (a) A corporation, partnership, trust, or association controlled by the
171 taxpayer;
172 (b) An individual, corporation, partnership, trust, or association in
173 control of the taxpayer; or
174 (c) A corporation, partnership, trust or association controlled by an
175 individual, corporation, partnership, trust or association in control of the
176 taxpayer. "Control of a corporation" shall mean ownership, directly or
177 indirectly, of stock possessing at least fifty percent of the total combined
178 voting power of all classes of stock entitled to vote, "control of a partnership or
179 association" shall mean ownership of at least fifty percent of the capital or
180 profits interest in such partnership or association, and "control of a trust" shall
181 mean ownership, directly or indirectly, of at least fifty percent of the beneficial
182 interest in the principal or income of such trust; ownership shall be determined
183 as provided in Section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
184 (25) "Renewable energy generation zone", an area which has been
185 found, by a resolution or ordinance adopted by the governing authority having
186 jurisdiction of such area, to be a blighted area and which contains land,
187 improvements, or a lock and dam site which is unutilized or underutilized for
188 the production, generation, conversion, and conveyance of electrical energy
189 from a renewable energy resource;
190 (26) "Renewable energy resource", shall include:
191 (a) Wind;
192 (b) Solar thermal sources or photovoltaic cells and panels;
193 (c) Dedicated crops grown for energy production;
194 (d) Cellulosic agricultural residues;
195 (e) Plant residues;
196 (f) Methane from landfills, agricultural operations, or wastewater
197 treatment;

HB 3329 63
198 (g) Thermal depolymerization or pyrolysis for converting waste
199 material to energy;
200 (h) Clean and untreated wood such as pallets;
201 (i) Hydroelectric power, which shall include electrical energy
202 produced or generated by hydroelectric power generating equipment, as
203 such term is defined in section 137.010;
204 (j) Fuel cells using hydrogen produced by one or more of the
205 renewable resources provided in paragraphs (a) to (i) of this subdivision; or
206 (k) Any other sources of energy, not including nuclear energy, that are
207 certified as renewable by rule by the department of economic development;
208 (27) "Replacement business facility", a facility otherwise described in
209 subdivision (17) of this section, hereafter referred to in this subdivision as
210 "new facility", which replaces another facility, hereafter referred to in this
211 subdivision as "old facility", located within the state, which the taxpayer or a
212 related taxpayer previously operated but discontinued operating on or before
213 the close of the first taxable year for which the credit allowed by this section is
214 claimed. A new facility shall be deemed to replace an old facility if the
215 following conditions are met:
216 (a) The old facility was operated by the taxpayer or a related taxpayer
217 during the taxpayer's or related taxpayer's taxable period immediately
218 preceding the taxable year in which commencement of commercial
219 operations occurs at the new facility; and
220 (b) The old facility was employed by the taxpayer or a related taxpayer
221 in the operation of an enhanced business enterprise and the taxpayer continues
222 the operation of the same or substantially similar enhanced business enterprise
223 at the new facility. Notwithstanding the preceding provisions of this
224 subdivision, a facility shall not be considered a replacement business facility if
225 the taxpayer's new business facility investment, as computed in subdivision
226 (19) of this section, in the new facility during the tax period for which the
227 credits allowed in section 135.967 are claimed exceed one million dollars and
228 if the total number of employees at the new facility exceeds the total number
229 of employees at the old facility by at least two;
230 (28) "Same or substantially similar enhanced business enterprise", an
231 enhanced business enterprise in which the nature of the products produced or
232 sold, or activities conducted, are similar in character and use or are produced,
233 sold, performed, or conducted in the same or similar manner as in another
234 enhanced business enterprise.]
[135.953. 1. For purposes of sections 135.950 to 135.970, an area
shall meet the following criteria in order to qualify as an enhanced enterprise
zone:
(1) The area shall be a blighted area, have pervasive poverty,
unemployment and general distress; and
(2) At least sixty percent of the residents living in the area have
incomes below ninety percent of the median income of all residents:
(a) Within the state of Missouri, according to the last decennial census
or other appropriate source as approved by the director; or

HB 3329 64
(b) Within the county or city not within a county in which the area is
located, according to the last decennial census or other appropriate source as
approved by the director; and
(3) The resident population of the area shall be at least five hundred
but not more than one hundred thousand at the time of designation as an
enhanced enterprise zone if the area lies within a metropolitan statistical area,
as established by the United States Census Bureau, or if the area does not lie
within a metropolitan statistical area, the resident population of the area at the
time of designation shall be at least five hundred but not more than forty
thousand inhabitants. If the population of the jurisdiction of the governing
authority does not meet the minimum population requirements set forth in this
subdivision, the population of the area must be at least fifty percent of the
population of the jurisdiction. However, no enhanced enterprise zone shall be
created which consists of the total area within the political boundaries of a
county;
(4) The level of unemployment of persons, according to the most
recent data available from the United States Bureau of Census and approved
by the director, within the area is equal to or exceeds the average rate of
unemployment for:
(a) The state of Missouri over the previous twelve months; or
(b) The county or city not within a county over the previous twelve
months; and
(5) No finding of blight under this chapter shall be used to meet the
conditions for blight under any other statute of this state.
2. Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection 1 of this section to
the contrary, an enhanced enterprise zone may be established in an area located
within a county for which public and individual assistance has been requested
by the governor pursuant to Section 401 of the Robert T. Stafford Disaster
Relief and Emergency Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. 5121, et seq., for an
emergency proclaimed by the governor pursuant to section 44.100 due to a
natural disaster of major proportions, if the area to be designated is blighted
and sustained severe damage as a result of such natural disaster, as determined
by the state emergency management agency. An application for designation as
an enhanced enterprise zone pursuant to this subsection shall be made before
the expiration of one year from the date the governor requested federal relief
for the area sought to be designated.
3. Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection 1 of this section to
the contrary, an enhanced enterprise zone may be designated in a county of
declining population if it meets the requirements of subdivisions (1), (3) and
either (2) or (4) of subsection 1 of this section. For the purposes of this
subsection, a "county of declining population" is one that has lost one percent
or more of its population as demonstrated by comparing the most recent
decennial census population to the next most recent decennial census
population for the county.
4. In addition to meeting the requirements of subsection 1, 2, or 3 of
this section, an area, to qualify as an enhanced enterprise zone, shall be
demonstrated by the governing authority to have either:
(1) The potential to create sustainable jobs in a targeted industry; or

HB 3329 65
(2) A demonstrated impact on local industry cluster development.
5. Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections 1 and 4 of this
section to the contrary, a renewable energy generation zone may be designated
as an enhanced enterprise zone if the renewable energy generation zone meets
the criteria set forth in subdivision (25) of section 135.950.]
[135.957. 1. A governing authority planning to seek designation of an
enhanced enterprise zone shall establish an enhanced enterprise zone board.
The number of members on the board shall be seven. One member of the
board shall be appointed by the school district or districts located within the
area proposed for designation as an enhanced enterprise zone. One member of
the board shall be appointed by other affected taxing districts. The remaining
five members shall be chosen by the chief elected official of the county or
municipality.
2. The school district member and the affected taxing district member
shall each have initial terms of five years. Of the five members appointed by
the chief elected official, two shall have initial terms of four years, two shall
have initial terms of three years, and one shall have an initial term of two
years. Thereafter, members shall serve terms of five years. Each
commissioner shall hold office until a successor has been appointed. All
vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. For
inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a member of the board
may be removed by the applicable appointing authority.
3. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum of such board
for the purpose of conducting business and exercising the powers of the board
and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by the board upon a vote of a
majority of the members present.
4. The members of the board annually shall elect a chair from among
the members.
5. The role of the board shall be to conduct the activities necessary to
advise the governing authority on the designation of an enhanced enterprise
zone and any other advisory duties as determined by the governing authority.
The role of the board after the designation of an enhanced enterprise zone shall
be review and assessment of zone activities as it relates to the annual reports as
set forth in section 135.960.]
[135.960. 1. Any governing authority that desires to have any portion
of a city or unincorporated area of a county under its control designated as an
enhanced enterprise zone shall hold a public hearing for the purpose of
obtaining the opinion and suggestions of those persons who will be affected by
such designation.
2. After a public hearing is held as required in subsection 1 of this
section, the governing authority may, by a majority vote of the members of the
governing authority, adopt an ordinance or resolution designating a specific
area as an enhanced enterprise zone. Such ordinance shall include, in addition
to a description of the physical, social, and economic characteristics of the
area:
(1) A plan to provide adequate police protection within the area;

HB 3329 66
(2) A specific and practical process for individual businesses to obtain
waivers from burdensome local regulations, ordinances, and orders which
serve to discourage economic development within the area to be designated an
enhanced enterprise zone, except that such waivers shall not substantially
endanger the health or safety of the employees of any such business or the
residents of the area;
(3) A description of what other specific actions will be taken to
support and encourage private investment within the area;
(4) A plan to ensure that resources are available to assist area residents
to participate in increased development through self-help efforts and in
ameliorating any negative effects of designation of the area as an enhanced
enterprise zone;
(5) A statement describing the projected positive and negative effects
of designation of the area as an enhanced enterprise zone;
(6) A specific plan to provide assistance to any person or business
dislocated as a result of activities within the enhanced enterprise zone. Such
plan shall determine the need of dislocated persons for relocation assistance;
provide, prior to displacement, information about the type, location, and price
of comparable housing or commercial property; provide information
concerning state and federal programs for relocation assistance and provide
other advisory services to displaced persons. Public agencies may choose to
provide assistance under the Uniform Relocation and Real Property
Acquisition Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 4601, et seq., to meet the requirements
of this subdivision; and
(7) A description or plan that demonstrates the requirements of
subsection 4 of section 135.953.
3. An enhanced enterprise zone designation shall expire in twenty-five
years.
4. Each designated enhanced enterprise zone board shall report to the
director on an annual basis regarding the status of the zone and business
activity within the zone.]
[135.963. 1. Improvements made to real property as such term is
defined in section 137.010 which are made in an enhanced enterprise zone
subsequent to the date such zone or expansion thereto was designated may,
upon approval of an authorizing resolution or ordinance by the governing
authority having jurisdiction of the area in which the improvements are made,
be exempt, in whole or in part, from assessment and payment of ad valorem
taxes of one or more affected political subdivisions. Improvements made to
real property, as such term is defined in section 137.010, which are locally
assessed and in a renewable energy generation zone designated as an enhanced
enterprise zone, subsequent to the date such enhanced enterprise zone or
expansion thereto was designated, may, upon approval of an authorizing
resolution or ordinance by the governing authority having jurisdiction of the
area in which the improvements are made, be exempt, in whole or in part, from
assessment and payment of ad valorem taxes of one or more affected political
subdivisions. In addition to enhanced business enterprises, a speculative

HB 3329 67
industrial or warehouse building constructed by a public entity or a private
entity if the land is leased by a public entity may be subject to such exemption.
2. Such authorizing resolution shall specify the percent of the
exemption to be granted, the duration of the exemption to be granted, and the
political subdivisions to which such exemption is to apply and any other terms,
conditions, or stipulations otherwise required. A copy of the resolution shall
be provided to the director within thirty calendar days following adoption of
the resolution by the governing authority.
3. No exemption shall be granted until the governing authority holds a
public hearing for the purpose of obtaining the opinions and suggestions of
residents of political subdivisions to be affected by the exemption from
property taxes. The governing authority shall send, by certified mail, a notice
of such hearing to each political subdivision in the area to be affected and shall
publish notice of such hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the area
to be affected by the exemption at least twenty days prior to the hearing but not
more than thirty days prior to the hearing. Such notice shall state the time,
location, date, and purpose of the hearing.
4. Notwithstanding subsection 1 of this section, at least one-half of the
ad valorem taxes otherwise imposed on subsequent improvements to real
property located in an enhanced enterprise zone of enhanced business
enterprises or speculative industrial or warehouse buildings as indicated in
subsection 1 of this section shall become and remain exempt from assessment
and payment of ad valorem taxes of any political subdivision of this state or
municipality thereof, if said political subdivision or municipality levies ad
valorem taxes, for a period of not less than ten years following the date such
improvements were assessed, provided the improved properties are used for
enhanced business enterprises. The exemption for speculative buildings is
subject to the approval of the governing authority for a period not to exceed
two years if the building is owned by a private entity and five years if the
building is owned or ground leased by a public entity. This shall not preclude
the building receiving an exemption for the remaining time period established
by the governing authority if it was occupied by an enhanced business
enterprise. The two- and five-year time periods indicated for speculative
buildings shall not be an addition to the local abatement time period for such
facility.
5. No exemption shall be granted for a period more than twenty-five
years, provided, however, that during the ten years prior to the expiration of an
enhanced enterprise zone no exemption shall be granted for a period of more
than ten years.
6. The provisions of subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to
improvements made to real property begun prior to August 28, 2004.
7. The abatement referred to in this section shall not relieve the
assessor or other responsible official from ascertaining the amount of the
equalized assessed value of all taxable property annually as required by section
99.855, 99.957, or 99.1042 and shall not have the effect of reducing the
payments in lieu of taxes referred to in subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of
section 99.845, subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of section 99.957, or
subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of section 99.1042 unless such reduction is

HB 3329 68
set forth in the plan approved by the governing body of the municipality
pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 99.820, section 99.942,
or section 99.1027.]
[135.967. 1. A taxpayer who establishes a new business facility may,
upon approval by the department, be allowed a credit, each tax year for up to
ten tax years, in an amount determined as set forth in this section, against the
tax imposed by chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed by sections
143.191 to 143.265. No taxpayer shall receive multiple ten-year periods for
subsequent expansions at the same facility.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any taxpayer
who establishes a new business facility in an enhanced enterprise zone and is
awarded state tax credits under this section may not also receive tax credits
under sections 135.100 to 135.150, sections 135.200 to 135.286, or section
135.535, and may not simultaneously receive tax credits under sections
620.1875 to 620.1890 at the same facility.
3. No credit shall be issued pursuant to this section unless:
(1) The number of new business facility employees engaged or
maintained in employment at the new business facility for the taxable year for
which the credit is claimed equals or exceeds two; and
(2) The new business facility investment for the taxable year for which
the credit is claimed equals or exceeds one hundred thousand dollars.
4. The annual amount of credits allowed for an approved enhanced
business enterprise shall be the lesser of:
(1) The annual amount authorized by the department for the enhanced
business enterprise, which shall be limited to the projected state economic
benefit, as determined by the department; or
(2) The sum calculated based upon the following:
(a) A credit of four hundred dollars for each new business facility
employee employed within an enhanced enterprise zone;
(b) An additional credit of four hundred dollars for each new business
facility employee who is a resident of an enhanced enterprise zone;
(c) An additional credit of four hundred dollars for each new business
facility employee who is paid by the enhanced business enterprise a wage that
exceeds the average wage paid within the county in which the facility is
located, as determined by the department; and
(d) A credit equal to two percent of new business facility investment
within an enhanced enterprise zone.
5. Prior to January 1, 2007, in no event shall the department authorize
more than four million dollars annually to be issued for all enhanced business
enterprises. After December 31, 2006, in no event shall the department
authorize more than twenty-four million dollars annually to be issued for all
enhanced business enterprises.
6. If a facility, which does not constitute a new business facility, is
expanded by the taxpayer, the expansion shall be considered eligible for the
credit allowed by this section if:
(1) The taxpayer's new business facility investment in the expansion
during the tax period in which the credits allowed in this section are claimed

HB 3329 69
exceeds one hundred thousand dollars and if the number of new business
facility employees engaged or maintained in employment at the expansion
facility for the taxable year for which credit is claimed equals or exceeds two,
and the total number of employees at the facility after the expansion is at least
two greater than the total number of employees before the expansion; and
(2) The taxpayer's investment in the expansion and in the original
facility prior to expansion shall be determined in the manner provided in
subdivision (19) of section 135.950.
7. The number of new business facility employees during any taxable
year shall be determined by dividing by twelve the sum of the number of
individuals employed on the last business day of each month of such taxable
year. If the new business facility is in operation for less than the entire taxable
year, the number of new business facility employees shall be determined by
dividing the sum of the number of individuals employed on the last business
day of each full calendar month during the portion of such taxable year during
which the new business facility was in operation by the number of full
calendar months during such period. For the purpose of computing the credit
allowed by this section in the case of a facility which qualifies as a new
business facility under subsection 6 of this section, and in the case of a new
business facility which satisfies the requirements of paragraph (c) of
subdivision (17) of section 135.950, or subdivision (25) of section 135.950,
the number of new business facility employees at such facility shall be reduced
by the average number of individuals employed, computed as provided in this
subsection, at the facility during the taxable year immediately preceding the
taxable year in which such expansion, acquisition, or replacement occurred
and shall further be reduced by the number of individuals employed by the
taxpayer or related taxpayer that was subsequently transferred to the new
business facility from another Missouri facility and for which credits
authorized in this section are not being earned, whether such credits are
earned because of an expansion, acquisition, relocation, or the establishment
of a new facility.
8. In the case where a new business facility employee who is a resident
of an enhanced enterprise zone for less than a twelve-month period is
employed for less than a twelve-month period, the credits allowed by
paragraph (b) of subdivision (2) of subsection 4 of this section shall be
determined by multiplying four hundred dollars by a fraction, the numerator of
which is the number of calendar days during the taxpayer's tax year for which
such credits are claimed, in which the employee was a resident of an enhanced
enterprise zone, and the denominator of which is three hundred sixty-five.
9. For the purpose of computing the credit allowed by this section in
the case of a facility which qualifies as a new business facility pursuant to
subsection 6 of this section, and in the case of a new business facility which
satisfies the requirements of paragraph (c) of subdivision (17) of section
135.950 or subdivision (25) of section 135.950, the amount of the taxpayer's
new business facility investment in such facility shall be reduced by the
average amount, computed as provided in subdivision (19) of section 135.950
for new business facility investment, of the investment of the taxpayer, or
related taxpayer immediately preceding such expansion or replacement or at

HB 3329 70
the time of acquisition. Furthermore, the amount of the taxpayer's new
business facility investment shall also be reduced by the amount of investment
employed by the taxpayer or related taxpayer which was subsequently
transferred to the new business facility from another Missouri facility and for
which credits authorized in this section are not being earned, whether such
credits are earned because of an expansion, acquisition, relocation, or the
establishment of a new facility.
100 10. For a taxpayer with flow-through tax treatment to its members,
101 partners, or shareholders, the credit shall be allowed to members, partners, or
102 shareholders in proportion to their share of ownership on the last day of the
103 taxpayer's tax period.
104 11. Credits may not be carried forward but shall be claimed for the
105 taxable year during which commencement of commercial operations occurs at
106 such new business facility, and for each of the nine succeeding taxable years
107 for which the credit is issued.
108 12. Certificates of tax credit authorized by this section may be
109 transferred, sold, or assigned by filing a notarized endorsement thereof with
110 the department that names the transferee, the amount of tax credit transferred,
111 and the value received for the credit, as well as any other information
112 reasonably requested by the department. The sale price cannot be less than
113 seventy-five percent of the par value of such credits.
114 13. The director of revenue shall issue a refund to the taxpayer to the
115 extent that the amount of credits allowed in this section exceeds the amount of
116 the taxpayer's income tax.
117 14. Prior to the issuance of tax credits, the department shall verify
118 through the department of revenue, or any other state department, that the tax
119 credit applicant does not owe any delinquent income, sales, or use tax or
120 interest or penalties on such taxes, or any delinquent fees or assessments levied
121 by any state department and through the department of commerce and
122 insurance that the applicant does not owe any delinquent insurance taxes.
123 Such delinquency shall not affect the authorization of the application for such
124 tax credits, except that the amount of credits issued shall be reduced by the
125 applicant's tax delinquency. If the department of revenue or the department of
126 commerce and insurance, or any other state department, concludes that a
127 taxpayer is delinquent after June fifteenth but before July first of any year and
128 the application of tax credits to such delinquency causes a tax deficiency on
129 behalf of the taxpayer to arise, then the taxpayer shall be granted thirty days to
130 satisfy the deficiency in which interest, penalties, and additions to tax shall be
131 tolled. After applying all available credits toward a tax delinquency, the
132 administering agency shall notify the appropriate department, and that
133 department shall update the amount of outstanding delinquent tax owed by
134 the applicant. If any credits remain after satisfying all insurance, income,
135 sales, and use tax delinquencies, the remaining credits shall be issued to the
136 applicant, subject to the restrictions of other provisions of law.]
[135.968. 1. A taxpayer who establishes a megaproject, approved by
the department, within an enhanced enterprise zone shall, in exchange for the
consideration provided by new tax revenues and other economic stimuli that

HB 3329 71
will be generated from the new jobs created by the megaproject, be allowed an
income tax credit equal to the percentage of actual new annual payroll of the
taxpayer attributable to employees directly related to the manufacturing and
assembly process and administration, as provided under subsection 4 of this
section. A taxpayer seeking approval of a megaproject shall submit an
application to the department. The department shall not approve any
megaproject after December 31, 2008. The department shall not approve any
credits for megaprojects to be issued prior to January 1, 2013, and in no event
shall the department authorize more than forty million dollars to be issued
annually for all megaprojects. The total amount of credits issued under this
section shall not exceed two hundred forty million dollars.
2. In considering applications for approval of megaprojects, the
department may approve an application if:
(1) The taxpayer's project is financially sound and the taxpayer has
adequately demonstrated an ability to successfully undertake and complete the
megaproject. This determination shall be supported by a professional third-
party market feasibility analysis conducted on behalf of the state by a firm
with direct experience with the industry of the proposed megaproject, and by a
professional third-party financial analysis of the taxpayer's ability to complete
the project;
(2) The taxpayer's plan of repayment to the state of the amount of tax
credits provided is reasonable and sound;
(3) The taxpayer's megaproject will create new jobs that were not jobs
previously performed by employees of the taxpayer or a related taxpayer in
Missouri;
(4) Local taxing entities are providing a significant level of incentives
for the megaproject relative to the projected new local tax revenues created by
the megaproject;
(5) There is at least one other state or foreign country that the taxpayer
verifies is being considered for the project, and receiving megaproject tax
credits is a major factor in the taxpayer's decision to go forward with the
project and not receiving the credit will result in the taxpayer not creating new
jobs in Missouri;
(6) The megaproject will be located in an enhanced enterprise zone
which constitutes an economic or social liability and a detriment to the public
health, safety, morals, or welfare in its present condition and use;
(7) The completion of the megaproject will serve an essential public
municipal purpose by creating a substantial number of new jobs for citizens,
increasing their purchasing power, improving their living conditions, and
relieving the demand for unemployment and welfare assistance thereby
promoting the economic development of the enhanced enterprise zone, the
municipality, and the state; and
(8) The creation of new jobs will assist the state in providing the
services needed to protect the health, safety, and social and economic well-
being of the citizens of the state.
3. Prior to final approval of an application, a binding contract shall be
executed between the taxpayer and the department of economic development
which shall include, but not be limited to:

HB 3329 72
(1) A repayment plan providing for cash payment to the state general
revenue fund which shall result in a positive internal rate of return to the state
and fully comply with the provisions of the World Trade Organization
Agreement on Subsidies and Countervailing Measures. The rate of return
shall be commercially reasonable and, over the life of the project, exceed one
hundred and fifty percent of the state's borrowing costs based on the AAA-
rated twenty-year tax-exempt bond rate average over a twenty-year borrowing
period. The rate shall be verified by a professional third-party financial
analysis;
(2) The taxpayer's obligation to construct a facility of at least one
million square feet within five years from the date of approval;
(3) A requirement that the issuance of tax credits authorized under this
section shall cease and the taxpayer shall immediately submit payment, to the
state general revenue fund, in an amount equal to all credits previously issued
less any amounts previously repaid, increased by an additional amount that
shall provide the state a reasonable rate of return, in the event the taxpayer:
(a) Fails to construct a facility of at least one million square feet within
five years of the date of approval;
(b) Fails to make a scheduled payment as required by the repayment
plan; or
(c) Fails to compensate new jobs at rate equal to or in excess of the
county average wage or fails to offer health insurance to all such new jobs and
pay at least eighty percent of such premiums; and
(4) A requirement that the department shall suspend issuance of tax
credits authorized under this section if, at any point, the total amount of tax
credits issued less the total amount of repayments received equals one hundred
and fifty-five million dollars.
4. Upon approval of an application by the department, tax credits shall
be issued annually for a period not to exceed eight years from the
commencement of commercial operations of the megaproject. The eight-
year period for the issuance of megaproject tax credits may extend beyond the
expiration of the enhanced enterprise zone. The maximum percentage of the
annual payroll of the taxpayer for new jobs located at the megaproject which
may be approved or issued by the department for tax credits shall not exceed:
(1) Eighty percent for the first three years that tax credits will be
issued for the megaproject;
(2) Sixty percent for the next two subsequent years;
(3) Fifty percent for the next two subsequent years; and
(4) Thirty percent for the remaining year.

In no event shall the department issue more than forty million dollars annually
in megaproject tax credits to any taxpayer. In any given year, the amount of
tax credits issued shall be the lesser of forty million dollars, the applicable
annual payroll percentage, or the amount of tax credits remaining unissued
under the two hundred forty million dollar limitation on megaproject tax credit
issuance provided under subsection 1 of this section.
5. Tax credits issued under this section may be claimed against the tax
imposed by chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed by sections

HB 3329 73
100 143.191 to 143.265. For taxpayers with flow-through tax treatment of its
101 members, partners, or shareholders, the credit shall be allowed to members,
102 partners, or shareholders in proportion to their share of ownership on the last
103 day of the taxpayer's tax period. The director of revenue shall issue a refund to
104 a taxpayer to the extent the amount of credits allowed in this section exceeds
105 the amount of the taxpayer's income tax liability in the year redemption is
106 authorized. An owner of tax credits issued under this section shall not be
107 required to have any Missouri income tax liability in order to redeem such tax
108 credits and receive a refund. The director of revenue shall prepare a form to
109 permit the owner of such tax credits to obtain a refund.
110 6. Certificates of tax credits authorized under this section may be
111 transferred, sold, or assigned by filing a notarized endorsement thereof with
112 the department that names the transferee, the amount of tax credit transferred,
113 and the value received for the credit, as well as any other information
114 reasonably requested by the department. Upon such transfer, sale, or
115 assignment, the transferee shall be the owner of such tax credits entitled to
116 claim the tax credits or any refunds with respect thereto issued to the taxpayer.
117 Tax credits may not be carried forward past the year of issuance. Tax credits
118 authorized by this section may not be pledged or used to secure any bonds or
119 other indebtedness issued by the state or any political subdivision of the state.
120 Once such tax credits have been issued, nothing shall prohibit the owner of the
121 tax credits from pledging the tax credits to any lender or other third party.
122 7. Any taxpayer issued tax credits under this section shall provide an
123 annual report to the department and the house and senate appropriations
124 committees of the number of new jobs located at the megaproject, the new
125 annual payroll of such new jobs, and such other information as may be
126 required by the department to document the basis for benefits under this
127 section. The department may withhold the approval of the annual issuance of
128 any tax credits until it is satisfied that proper documentation has been
129 provided, and shall reduce the tax credits to reflect any reduction in new
130 payroll. If the department determines the average wage is below the county
131 average wage, or the taxpayer has not maintained employee health insurance
132 as required, the taxpayer shall not receive tax credits for that year.
133 8. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any taxpayer
134 who is awarded tax credits under this section shall not also receive tax credits
135 under sections 135.100 to 135.150, sections 135.200 to 135.286, section
136 135.535, or sections 620.1875 to 620.1890.
137 9. Any action brought in any court contesting the approval of a
138 megaproject and the issuance of the tax credits, or any other action undertaken
139 pursuant to this section related to such megaproject, shall be filed within
140 ninety days following approval of the megaproject by the department.
141 10. Records and documents relating to a proposed megaproject shall
142 be deemed closed records until such time as the application has been approved.
143 Provisions of this subsection to the contrary notwithstanding, records
144 containing business plan information which may endanger the
145 competitiveness of the business shall remain closed.

HB 3329 74
146 11. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, no
147 taxpayer who receives megaproject tax credits authorized under this section or
148 any related taxpayer shall employ, prior to January 1, 2022, directly:
149 (1) Any elected public official of this state holding office as of January
150 1, 2008;
151 (2) Any director, deputy director, division director, or employee
152 directly involved in negotiations between the department of economic
153 development and a taxpayer relative to the megaproject who was employed
154 as of January 1, 2008, by the department.]
[135.970. The department may adopt such rules, statements of policy,
procedures, forms, and guidelines as may be necessary to carry out the
provisions of sections 135.950 to 135.970. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2004, shall be invalid and void.]
[135.973. After January 1, 2007, all enterprise zones designated before
January 1, 2006, shall be eligible to receive the tax benefits under sections
135.950 to 135.970.]
[135.1125. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Certificate", a tax credit certificate issued under this section;
(2) "Department", the Missouri department of social services;
(3) "Eligible donation", a donation of cash, stock, bonds or other
marketable securities, or real property made to an eligible provider;
(4) "Eligible provider", an organization that provides funding for
unmet health, hunger, and hygiene needs of children in school;
(5) "Taxpayer", a person, firm, partner in a firm, corporation, or a
shareholder in an S corporation doing business in the state of Missouri and
subject to the state income tax imposed in chapter 143, an insurance company
paying an annual tax on its gross premium receipts in this state, any other
financial institution paying taxes to the state of Missouri or any political
subdivision of this state under chapter 148, or any charitable organization
which is exempt from federal income tax and whose Missouri unrelated
business taxable income, if any, would be subject to the state income tax
imposed under chapter 143.
2. For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, any
taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the taxes otherwise due under
chapter 143 or 148, excluding withholding tax under sections 143.191 to
143.265, in an amount equal to fifty percent of the amount of an eligible
donation. The amount of the tax credit claimed shall not exceed the amount of
the taxpayer's state income tax liability in the tax year for which the credit is

HB 3329 75
claimed. Any amount of credit that the taxpayer is prohibited by this section
from claiming in a tax year shall not be refundable, but may be carried forward
to any of the taxpayer's four subsequent taxable years.
3. To claim the credit authorized in this section, a provider may submit
to the department an application for the tax credit authorized by this section on
behalf of taxpayers. The department shall verify that the provider has
submitted the following items accurately and completely:
(1) A valid application in the form and format required by the
department;
(2) A statement attesting to the eligible donation received, which shall
include the name and taxpayer identification number of the individual making
the eligible donation, the amount of the eligible donation, and the date the
eligible donation was received by the provider; and
(3) A payment from the eligible provider in an amount equal to fifty
percent of the eligible donation.

If the provider applying for the tax credit meets all criteria required by this
subsection, the department shall issue a certificate in the appropriate amount.
4. Tax credits issued under this section may be assigned, transferred,
sold, or otherwise conveyed, and the new owner of the tax credit shall have the
same rights in the credit as the taxpayer. Whenever a certificate is assigned,
transferred, sold, or otherwise conveyed, a notarized endorsement shall be
filed with the department specifying the name and address of the new owner of
the tax credit or the value of the credit.
5. The department shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions
of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2018, shall be invalid and void.
6. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of this section shall automatically sunset six years
after August 28, 2018, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
section shall automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the
reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
under this section is sunset.]
[173.196. 1. Any business firm, as defined in section 32.105, may
make a donation to the "Missouri Higher Education Scholarship Donation
Fund", which is hereby created in the state treasury. A donating business firm

HB 3329 76
shall receive a tax credit as provided in this section equal to fifty percent of the
amount of the donation, except that tax credits shall be awarded each fiscal
year in the order donations are received and the amount of tax credits
authorized shall total no more than two hundred and fifty thousand dollars for
each fiscal year.
2. The department of revenue shall grant tax credits approved under
this section which shall be applied in the order specified in subsection 1 of
section 32.115 until used. The tax credits provided under this section shall be
refundable, and any tax credit not used in the fiscal year in which approved
may be carried over the next five succeeding calendar or fiscal years until the
full credit has been claimed. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
any tax credits granted under this section may be assigned, transferred, sold, or
otherwise conveyed without consent or approval. Such taxpayer, hereinafter
the assignor for purposes of this section, may sell, assign, exchange, or
otherwise transfer earned tax credits:
(1) For no less than seventy-five percent of the par value of such
credits; and
(2) In an amount not to exceed one hundred percent of annual earned
credits.
3. No tax credit authorized under this section may be applied against
any tax applied in a tax year beginning prior to January 1, 1995.
4. All revenues credited to the fund shall be used, subject to
appropriations, to provide scholarships authorized under sections 173.197 to
173.199, and for no other purpose.
5. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, no tax
credits shall be authorized, awarded, or issued to any person or entity claiming
any tax credit under this section.]
[320.093. 1. Any person, firm or corporation who purchases a dry fire
hydrant, as defined in section 320.273, or provides an acceptable means of
water storage for such dry fire hydrant including a pond, tank or other storage
facility with the primary purpose of fire protection within the state of Missouri,
shall be eligible for a credit on income taxes otherwise due pursuant to chapter
143, except sections 143.191 to 143.261, as an incentive to implement safe and
efficient fire protection controls. The tax credit, not to exceed five thousand
dollars, shall be equal to fifty percent of the cost in actual expenditure for any
new water storage construction, equipment, development and installation of
the dry hydrant, including pipes, valves, hydrants and labor for each such
installation of a dry hydrant or new water storage facility. The amount of the
tax credit claimed for in-kind contributions shall not exceed twenty-five
percent of the total amount of the contribution for which the tax credit is
claimed.
2. Any amount of credit which exceeds the tax due shall not be
refunded but may be carried over to any subsequent taxable year, not to exceed
seven years. The person, firm or corporation may elect to assign to a third
party the approved tax credit. The certificate of assignment and other
appropriate forms shall be filed with the Missouri department of revenue and
the department of economic development.

HB 3329 77
3. The person, firm or corporation shall make application for the credit
to the department of economic development after receiving approval of the
state fire marshal. The fire marshal shall establish by rule promulgated
pursuant to chapter 536 the requirements to be met based on the National
Resources Conservation Service's Dry Hydrant Standard. The state fire
marshal or designated local representative shall review and authorize the
construction and installation of any dry fire hydrant site. Only approved dry
fire hydrant sites shall be eligible for tax credits as indicated in this section.
Under no circumstance shall such authority deny any entity the ability to
provide a dry fire hydrant site when tax credits are not requested.
4. The department of public safety shall certify to the department of
revenue that the dry hydrant system meets the requirements to obtain a tax
credit as specified in subsection 5 of this section.
5. In order to qualify for a tax credit under this section, a dry hydrant
or new water storage facility shall meet the following minimum requirements:
(1) Each body of water or water storage structure shall be able to
provide two hundred fifty gallons per minute for a continuous two-hour period
during a fifty-year drought or freeze at a vertical lift of eighteen feet;
(2) Each dry hydrant shall be located within twenty-five feet of an all-
weather roadway and shall be accessible to fire protection equipment;
(3) Dry hydrants shall be located a reasonable distance from other dry
or pressurized hydrants; and
(4) The site shall provide a measurable economic improvement
potential for rural development.
6. New credits shall not be awarded under this section after August 28,
2010. The total amount of all tax credits allowed pursuant to this section is
five hundred thousand dollars in any one fiscal year as approved by the
director of the department of economic development.
7. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions
of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2007, shall be invalid and void.]
[348.300. As used in sections 348.300 to 348.318, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Commercial activity located in Missouri", any research,
development, prototype fabrication, and subsequent precommercialization
activity, or any activity related thereto, conducted in Missouri for the purpose
of producing a service or a product or process for manufacture, assembly or
sale or developing a service based on such a product or process by any person,
corporation, partnership, joint venture, unincorporated association, trust or
other organization doing business in Missouri. Subsequent to January 1, 1999,

HB 3329 78
a commercial activity located in Missouri shall mean only such activity that is
located within a distressed community, as defined in section 135.530;
(2) "Follow-up capital", capital provided to a commercial activity
located in Missouri in which a qualified fund has previously invested seed
capital or start-up capital and which does not exceed ten times the amount of
such seed and start-up capital;
(3) "Person", any individual, corporation, partnership, or other entity,
including any charitable corporation which is exempt from federal income tax
and whose Missouri unrelated business taxable income, if any, would be
subject to the state income tax imposed under chapter 143;
(4) "Qualified contribution", cash contribution to a qualified fund;
(5) "Qualified economic development organization", any corporation
organized under the provisions of chapter 355 which has as of January 1, 1991,
obtained a contract with the department of economic development to operate
an innovation center to promote, assist and coordinate the research and
development of new services, products or processes in the state of Missouri;
and the Missouri technology corporation organized pursuant to the provisions
of sections 348.250 to 348.275;
(6) "Qualified fund", any corporation, partnership, joint venture,
unincorporated association, trust or other organization which is established
under the laws of Missouri after December 31, 1985, which meets all of the
following requirements established by this subdivision. The fund shall have as
its sole purpose and business the making of investments, of which at least
ninety percent of the dollars invested shall be qualified investments. The fund
shall enter into a contract with one or more qualified economic development
organizations which shall entitle the qualified economic development
organizations to receive not less than ten percent of all distributions of
equity and dividends or other earnings of the fund. Such contracts shall
require the qualified fund to transfer to the Missouri technology corporation
organized pursuant to the provisions of sections 348.250 to 348.275 this
interest and make corresponding distributions thereto in the event the qualified
economic development organization holding such interest is dissolved or
ceases to do business for a period of one year or more;
(7) "Qualified investment", any investment of seed capital, start-up
capital, or follow-up capital in any commercial activity located in Missouri;
(8) "Seed capital", capital provided to a commercial activity located in
Missouri for research, development and precommercialization activities to
prove a concept for a new product or process or service, and for activities
related thereto;
(9) "Start-up capital", capital provided to a commercial activity located
in Missouri for use in preproduction product development or service
development or initial marketing thereof, and for activities related thereto;
(10) "State tax liability", any state tax liability incurred by a taxpayer
under the provisions of chapters 143, 147 and 148, exclusive of the provisions
relating to the withholding of tax as provided for in sections 143.191 to
143.265 and related provisions;
(11) "Uninvested capital", the amount of any distribution, other than of
earnings, by a qualified fund made within five years of the issuance of a

HB 3329 79
certificate of tax credit as provided by sections 348.300 to 348.318; or the
portion of all qualified contributions to a qualified fund which are not invested
as qualified investments within five years of the issuance of a certificate of tax
credit as provided by sections 348.300 to 348.318 to the extent that the amount
not so invested exceeds ten percent of all such qualified contributions.]
[348.300. As used in sections 348.300 to 348.318, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Commercial activity located in Missouri", any research,
development, prototype fabrication, and subsequent precommercialization
activity, or any activity related thereto, conducted in Missouri for the purpose
of producing a service or a product or process for manufacture, assembly or
sale or developing a service based on such a product or process by any person,
corporation, partnership, joint venture, unincorporated association, trust or
other organization doing business in Missouri. Subsequent to January 1, 1999,
a commercial activity located in Missouri shall mean only such activity that is
located within a distressed community, as defined in section 135.530;
(2) "Follow-up capital", capital provided to a commercial activity
located in Missouri in which a qualified fund has previously invested seed
capital or start-up capital and which does not exceed ten times the amount of
such seed and start-up capital;
(3) "Person", any individual, corporation, partnership, or other entity,
including any charitable corporation which is exempt from federal income tax
and whose Missouri unrelated business taxable income, if any, would be
subject to the state income tax imposed under chapter 143;
(4) "Qualified contribution", cash contribution to a qualified fund;
(5) "Qualified economic development organization", any corporation
organized under the provisions of chapter 355 which has as of January 1, 1991,
obtained a contract with the department of economic development to operate
an innovation center to promote, assist and coordinate the research and
development of new services, products or processes in the state of Missouri;
and the Missouri technology corporation organized pursuant to the provisions
of sections 348.253 to 348.266;
(6) "Qualified fund", any corporation, partnership, joint venture,
unincorporated association, trust or other organization which is established
under the laws of Missouri after December 31, 1985, which meets all of the
following requirements established by this subdivision. The fund shall have as
its sole purpose and business the making of investments, of which at least
ninety percent of the dollars invested shall be qualified investments. The fund
shall enter into a contract with one or more qualified economic development
organizations which shall entitle the qualified economic development
organizations to receive not less than ten percent of all distributions of
equity and dividends or other earnings of the fund. Such contracts shall
require the qualified fund to transfer to the Missouri technology corporation
organized pursuant to the provisions of sections 348.253 to 348.266 this
interest and make corresponding distributions thereto in the event the qualified
economic development organization holding such interest is dissolved or
ceases to do business for a period of one year or more;

HB 3329 80
(7) "Qualified investment", any investment of seed capital, start-up
capital, or follow-up capital in any commercial activity located in Missouri;
(8) "Seed capital", capital provided to a commercial activity located in
Missouri for research, development and precommercialization activities to
prove a concept for a new product or process or service, and for activities
related thereto;
(9) "Start-up capital", capital provided to a commercial activity located
in Missouri for use in preproduction product development or service
development or initial marketing thereof, and for activities related thereto;
(10) "State tax liability", any state tax liability incurred by a taxpayer
under the provisions of chapters 143, 147 and 148, exclusive of the provisions
relating to the withholding of tax as provided for in sections 143.191 to
143.265 and related provisions;
(11) "Uninvested capital", the amount of any distribution, other than of
earnings, by a qualified fund made within five years of the issuance of a
certificate of tax credit as provided by sections 348.300 to 348.318; or the
portion of all qualified contributions to a qualified fund which are not invested
as qualified investments within five years of the issuance of a certificate of tax
credit as provided by sections 348.300 to 348.318 to the extent that the amount
not so invested exceeds ten percent of all such qualified contributions.]
[348.302. 1. Any person who makes a qualified contribution to a
qualified fund shall be entitled to receive a tax credit equal to fifty percent of
the amount of the qualified contribution. The tax credit shall be evidenced by
a tax credit certificate in accordance with the provisions of sections 348.300 to
348.318 and may be used to satisfy the state tax liability of the owner of such
certificate that becomes due in the tax year in which the qualified contribution
is made, or in any of the ten tax years thereafter. No person may receive a tax
credit pursuant to sections 348.300 to 348.318 unless that person presents a tax
credit certificate to the department of revenue for payment of such state tax
liability.
2. The amount of such qualified contributions which can be made is
limited so that the aggregate of all tax credits authorized under the provisions
of sections 348.300 to 348.318 shall not exceed nine million dollars. All tax
credits authorized under the provisions of this section may be transferred, sold
or assigned.]
[348.304. The total amount of credit evidenced by certificates of tax
credit issued to taxpayers at the request of any one qualified economic
development organization shall not exceed two million dollars; except that,
this two-million-dollar limitation shall not apply to certificates of tax credit
issued after January 1, 1996. Prior to January 1, 1996, any qualified economic
development organization may enter into a contractual agreement with any
other qualified economic development organization to allocate to the latter any
portion of the two million dollars of tax credits which it is authorized to issue
to taxpayers under the provisions of this section. The certificate of tax credit
may be issued in one aggregate certificate or in a reasonable number of
multiple certificates in regard to one qualified contribution. Any issued

HB 3329 81
certificate may be surrendered in exchange for new certificates not to exceed
in value the value of the issued certificate. The number and denomination of
multiple certificates, if issued, shall be determined by the director of the
department of economic development.]
[348.306. No person shall receive, by issuance, transfer or assignment,
certificates of tax credit issued under the provisions of sections 348.300 to
348.318 in an amount in excess of one million dollars. Subject to the
provisions of this section, certificates of tax credit issued in accordance with
sections 348.300 to 348.318 may be transferred or assigned by notarized
endorsement thereof which names the transferee.]
[348.308. 1. The director of the department of economic development
shall be responsible for the administration and issuance of the certificate of tax
credits authorized by sections 348.300 to 348.318. The director of the
department of economic development shall issue a certificate of tax credit at
the request of any qualified economic development organization. Each request
shall include a true copy of the documents creating the qualified fund and the
interest of the qualified economic development organization in the qualified
fund, the name of the person who is to receive a certificate of tax credit, the
type of state tax liability, as specified in subdivision (10) of section 348.300,
against which the tax credit is to be used, and the amount of the certificate of
tax credit to be issued to the person making the qualified contribution. Each
request shall be acknowledged under oath by the person making the qualified
contribution and the president of the qualified economic development
organization.
2. In the event that two or more qualified economic development
organizations have an interest in a qualified fund, either or both of such
qualified economic development organizations may request issuance of
certificates of tax credit in accordance with the provisions of sections
348.300 to 348.318 to persons contributing to qualified funds.]
[348.310. The Missouri department of revenue shall accept a
certificate of tax credit in lieu of other payment in such amount as is equal
to the lesser of the amount of the tax or the remaining unused amount of the
credit as indicated on the certificate of tax credit; and shall indicate on the
certificate of tax credit the amount of tax thereby paid, the date of such
payment, and the remainder of the unused credit available to the taxpayer after
such payment. The certificate of tax credit shall be returned to the director of
the department of economic development. The director of the department of
economic development shall issue a new certificate to the proper owner for
any unused balance.]
[348.312. No provision of sections 348.300 to 348.318 shall be
construed to require a qualified economic development organization to accept
an interest in any fund, nor shall any provision of sections 348.300 to 348.318
be construed to limit or restrict the terms and conditions on which a qualified

HB 3329 82
economic development organization may agree to accept an interest in any
fund.]
[348.316. 1. Each qualified fund, on or before the due date of its
federal income tax return, shall make a report for a period corresponding to the
qualified fund's federal income tax year. The report shall be made on a form
required by the department of economic development. It shall be verified by
the affidavit of the fund's president, or another authorized officer, to the
department of economic development. It shall state the amount of all
uninvested capital, whether distributions of equity or funds not invested in
qualified investments, and it shall contain other such information as may be
required by the director of the department of economic development.
2. Upon the receipt of such returns, the director of the department of
economic development shall verify the same and certify the amount of tax due
from the various funds to the director of revenue within sixty days from the
date of the return. The director of revenue shall send each qualified fund a
notice of tax due within thirty days of the date of certification by the
department of economic development. The qualified fund shall pay the tax as
provided in the notice within thirty days of the date of such notice.]
[348.318. Except as otherwise specifically provided in sections
348.300 to 348.318, interest and penalty provisions and procedural matters
under the provisions of sections 348.300 to 348.318 shall be determined
pursuant to and in the manner prescribed in the following sections of the
revised statutes of Missouri, the state income tax law, governing similar
procedures thereunder: sections 143.271 to 143.301, 143.511, 143.551 to
143.571, 143.611 to 143.751, 143.771, 143.791 to 143.861, 143.881 to
143.971, and 143.986.]
[620.635. Sections 620.635 to 620.653 shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri New Enterprise Creation Act".]
[620.638. As used in sections 620.635 to 620.653, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Committed contributions", the total amount of qualified
contributions that are committed to a qualifying fund by contractual
agreement;
(2) "Corporation", the Missouri technology corporation as established
pursuant to section 348.251;
(3) "Department", the department of economic development;
(4) "Director", the director of the department of economic
development;
(5) "Follow-up capital", capital provided to a qualified business in
which a qualified fund has previously invested seed capital or start-up capital.
No more than forty percent of the qualified contributions to a qualified fund
may be used for follow-up capital, and no qualified contributions which
generate tax credits before the second round of allocations as authorized by
section 620.650 shall be used for follow-up capital investments;

HB 3329 83
(6) "Person", any individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability
company or other entity, including any charitable organization which is
exempt from federal income tax and whose Missouri unrelated business
taxable income, if any, would be subject to the state income tax imposed under
chapter 143;
(7) "Positive cash flow", total cash receipts from sales or services, but
not from investments or loans, exceeding total cash expenditures as calculated
on a fiscal year basis;
(8) "Qualified business", any independently owned and operated
business which is headquartered and located in Missouri and which is involved
in or intends to be involved in commerce for the purpose of manufacturing,
processing or assembling products, conducting research and development, or
providing services in interstate commerce. Such a business shall maintain its
headquarters in Missouri for a period of at least three years from the date of
receipt of a qualified investment or be subject to penalties pursuant to section
620.017;
(9) "Qualified contribution", cash contributions to a qualified fund
pursuant to the terms of contractual agreements made between the qualified
fund and a qualified economic development organization authorized by the
corporation to enter into such contracts;
(10) "Qualified economic development organization", any corporation
organized pursuant to the provisions of chapter 355 that, as of January 1, 1991,
had obtained a contract with the department to operate an innovation center to
promote, assist and coordinate the research and development of new services,
products or processes in this state;
(11) "Qualified fund", a fund established by any corporation,
partnership, joint venture, unincorporated association, trust or other
organization established pursuant to the laws of Missouri and approved by
the corporation;
(12) "Qualified investment", any investment of seed capital, start-up
capital or follow-up capital in a qualified business that does not cause more
than ten percent of all the qualified contributions to a qualified fund to be
invested in a single qualified business;
(13) "Seed capital", capital provided to a qualified business for
research, development and precommercialization activities to prove a concept
for a new product, process or service, and for activities related thereto;
provided that, seed capital shall not be provided to any business which in a
past fiscal year has experienced a positive cash flow;
(14) "Start-up capital", capital provided to a qualified business for use
in preproduction product development, service development or initial
marketing thereof; provided that, start-up capital shall not be provided to
any business which has experienced a positive cash flow in a past fiscal year;
(15) "Uninvested capital", that portion of any qualified contribution to
a qualified fund, other than management fees not to exceed three percent per
year of committed contributions, qualified investments and other expenses or
fees authorized by the corporation, that is not invested as a qualified
investment within ten years of its receipt.]

HB 3329 84
[620.641. The powers and duties of the Missouri seed capital
investment board shall be transferred to the Missouri technology corporation
effective August 28, 2011, and the Missouri seed capital investment board
shall be dissolved.]
[620.644. 1. The Missouri seed capital and commercialization
strategy shall be jointly developed and approved by the boards of directors of
all of the qualified economic development organizations and submitted as one
plan to the corporation for its approval. The board shall not approve any
qualified fund, exclusive of the fund approved by the corporation, unless such
fund is described in the Missouri seed capital and commercialization strategy.
The strategy shall include a proposal for the establishment and operation of
between one and four qualified funds in Missouri, including the fund approved
by the corporation pursuant to the provisions of section 620.653. The initial
strategy shall be submitted to the board no later than July 1, 2000, and shall be
approved or rejected by the board within three months of receipt. No tax
credits authorized pursuant to the provisions of sections 620.635 to 620.653
shall be awarded until such strategy has been approved by the board, other
than tax credits authorized for qualified contributions to the fund approved by
the corporation.
2. The department shall authorize the use of up to twenty million
dollars in tax credits by the approved qualified funds, in aggregate pursuant to
the provisions of section 620.650, with not more than five million dollars of
tax credits being issued in any one year.
3. The corporation shall approve the professional managers employed
by the qualified funds according to criteria similar to that used by the U.S.
Small Business Administration's Small Business Investment Corporation
Program.
4. The department may promulgate any rules and regulations
necessary to administer the provisions of sections 620.635 to 620.653. No
rule or regulation or portion of a rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to the
authority of this section shall become effective unless it has been promulgated
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 536.
5. The corporation shall report the following to the department:
(1) As soon as practicable after the receipt of a qualified contribution
the name of each person from which the qualified contribution was received,
the amount of each contributor's qualified contribution and the tax credits
computed pursuant to this section;
(2) On a quarterly basis, the amount of qualified investments made to
any qualified business;
(3) On a quarterly basis, verification that the investment of seed
capital, start-up capital, or follow-up capital in a qualified business does not
direct more than ten percent of all the qualified contributions to a qualified
fund to be invested in a single qualifying business.
6. Each qualified fund shall provide annual audited financial
statements, including the opinion of an independent certified public
accountant, to the department within ninety days of the close of the state
fiscal year. The audit shall address the methods of operation and conduct of

HB 3329 85
the business of the qualified economic development organization to determine
compliance with the statutes and program and program rules and that the
qualified contributions received by the qualified fund have been invested as
required by this section.]
[620.647. 1. The corporation may authorize each qualified economic
development organization to enter into contractual agreements with any
qualified fund allowing such qualified fund to offer tax credits authorized
pursuant to the provisions of sections 620.635 to 620.653 to those persons
making qualified contributions to the qualified fund. The corporation shall
establish policies and procedures requiring each authorized qualified economic
development organization to secure from each qualified fund and its investors
the maximum fund equity interest possible, as dictated by market conditions,
in exchange for the use of the tax credits. All tax credits authorized pursuant
to sections 620.635 to 620.653 shall be administered by the department.
2. Each qualified fund shall enter into a contract with one or more
qualified economic development organizations which shall entitle all qualified
economic development organizations in existence at that time to receive and
share equally all distributions of equity and dividends or other earnings of the
fund that are generated as a result of any equity interest secured as a result of
actions taken to comply with subsection 1 of this section. Such contracts shall
require the qualified funds to transfer to the corporation all distributions of
dividends or other earnings of the fund that are owed to any qualified
economic development organization that has dissolved or has ceased doing
business for a period of one year or more.
3. All distributions of dividends, earnings, equity or the like owed
pursuant to the provisions of sections 620.635 to 620.653 to a qualified
economic development organization by any qualified fund shall be paid to the
qualified economic development organization. The qualified economic
development organization shall use such payments solely for reinvestment in
qualified funds in order to provide ongoing seed capital, start-up capital and
follow-up capital for Missouri businesses. No qualified economic
development organization may transfer any dividends, earnings, equity or
the like owed it pursuant to sections 620.635 to 620.653 to any other person or
entity without the approval of the corporation.]
[620.650. 1. The sole purpose of each qualified fund is to make
investments. One hundred percent of investments made from qualified
contributions shall be qualified investments.
2. Any person who makes a qualified contribution to a qualified fund
shall receive a tax credit against the tax otherwise due pursuant to chapter 143,
chapter 147, or chapter 148, other than taxes withheld pursuant to sections
143.191 to 143.265, in an amount equal to one hundred percent of such
person's qualified contribution.
3. Such person shall submit to the department an application for the
tax credit on a form provided by the department. The department shall award
tax credits in the order the applications are received and based upon the
strategy approved by the corporation. Tax credits issued pursuant to this

HB 3329 86
section may be claimed for the tax year in which the qualified contribution is
made or in any of the following ten years, and may be assigned, transferred or
sold.
4. There is hereby imposed on each qualified fund a tax equal to
fifteen percent of the qualified fund's uninvested capital at the close of such
qualified fund's tax year. For purposes of tax computation, any distribution
made by a qualified fund during a tax year is deemed made at the end of such
tax year. Each tax year, every qualified fund shall remit the tax imposed by
this section to the director of the department of revenue for deposit in the state
treasury to the credit of the general revenue fund.]
[620.653. The provisions of sections 620.635 to 620.650 to the
contrary notwithstanding, one qualified fund shall be approved by the
corporation as soon as practicable after July 8, 1999. Such fund need not be
initially incorporated into the seed capital and commercialization strategy until
after the appointment of the board. After the appointment of the board, all
powers exercised by the corporation in relation to that fund shall be transferred
to the board. After the dissolution of the board, all powers exercised by the
board shall be transferred to the corporation. The corporation shall approve
the professional fund manager employed by the qualified fund established by
this section.]
[620.1875. Sections 620.1875 to 620.1890 shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Quality Jobs Act".]
[620.1878. For the purposes of sections 620.1875 to 620.1890, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Approval", a document submitted by the department to the
qualified company that states the benefits that may be provided by this
program;
(2) "Average wage", the new payroll divided by the number of new
jobs;
(3) "Commencement of operations", the starting date for the qualified
company's first new employee, which must be no later than twelve months
from the date of the approval;
(4) "County average wage", the average wages in each county as
determined by the department for the most recently completed full calendar
year. However, if the computed county average wage is above the statewide
average wage, the statewide average wage shall be deemed the county average
wage for such county for the purpose of determining eligibility. The
department shall publish the county average wage for each county at least
annually. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision to the contrary,
for any qualified company that in conjunction with their project is relocating
employees from a Missouri county with a higher county average wage, the
company shall obtain the endorsement of the governing body of the
community from which jobs are being relocated or the county average wage
for their project shall be the county average wage for the county from which
the employees are being relocated;

HB 3329 87
(5) "Department", the Missouri department of economic development;
(6) "Director", the director of the department of economic
development;
(7) "Employee", a person employed by a qualified company;
(8) "Full-time employee", an employee of the qualified company that
is scheduled to work an average of at least thirty-five hours per week for a
twelve-month period, and one for which the qualified company offers health
insurance and pays at least fifty percent of such insurance premiums;
(9) "High-impact project", a qualified company that, within two years
from commencement of operations, creates one hundred or more new jobs;
(10) "Local incentives", the present value of the dollar amount of
direct benefit received by a qualified company for a project facility from one
or more local political subdivisions, but shall not include loans or other funds
provided to the qualified company that must be repaid by the qualified
company to the political subdivision;
(11) "NAICS", the 1997 edition of the North American Industry
Classification System as prepared by the Executive Office of the President,
Office of Management and Budget. Any NAICS sector, subsector, industry
group or industry identified in this section shall include its corresponding
classification in subsequent federal industry classification systems;
(12) "New direct local revenue", the present value of the dollar amount
of direct net new tax revenues of the local political subdivisions likely to be
produced by the project over a ten-year period as calculated by the department,
excluding local earnings tax, and net new utility revenues, provided the local
incentives include a discount or other direct incentives from utilities owned or
operated by the political subdivision;
(13) "New investment", the purchase or leasing of new tangible assets
to be placed in operation at the project facility, which will be directly related to
the new jobs;
(14) "New job", the number of full-time employees located at the
project facility that exceeds the project facility base employment less any
decrease in the number of full-time employees at related facilities below the
related facility base employment. No job that was created prior to the date of
the notice of intent shall be deemed a new job. An employee that spends less
than fifty percent of the employee's work time at the facility is still considered
to be located at a facility if the employee receives his or her directions and
control from that facility, is on the facility's payroll, one hundred percent of the
employee's income from such employment is Missouri income, and the
employee is paid at or above the state average wage;
(15) "New payroll", the amount of taxable wages of full-time
employees, excluding owners, located at the project facility that exceeds the
project facility base payroll. If full-time employment at related facilities is
below the related facility base employment, any decrease in payroll for full-
time employees at the related facilities below that related facility base payroll
shall also be subtracted to determine new payroll;
(16) "Notice of intent", a form developed by the department,
completed by the qualified company and submitted to the department which

HB 3329 88
states the qualified company's intent to hire new jobs and request benefits
under this program;
(17) "Percent of local incentives", the amount of local incentives
divided by the amount of new direct local revenue;
(18) "Program", the Missouri quality jobs program provided in
sections 620.1875 to 620.1890;
(19) "Project facility", the building used by a qualified company at
which the new jobs and new investment will be located. A project facility may
include separate buildings that are located within fifteen miles of each other or
within the same county such that their purpose and operations are interrelated;
(20) "Project facility base employment", the greater of the number of
full-time employees located at the project facility on the date of the notice of
intent or for the twelve-month period prior to the date of the notice of intent,
the average number of full-time employees located at the project facility. In
the event the project facility has not been in operation for a full twelve-month
period, the average number of full-time employees for the number of months
the project facility has been in operation prior to the date of the notice of
intent;
(21) "Project facility base payroll", the total amount of taxable wages
paid by the qualified company to full-time employees of the qualified
company located at the project facility in the twelve months prior to the notice
of intent, not including the payroll of the owners of the qualified company
unless the qualified company is participating in an employee stock ownership
plan. For purposes of calculating the benefits under this program, the amount
of base payroll shall increase each year based on an appropriate measure, as
determined by the department;
(22) "Project period", the time period that the benefits are provided to
a qualified company;
(23) "Qualified company", a firm, partnership, joint venture,
100 association, private or public corporation whether organized for profit or
101 not, or headquarters of such entity registered to do business in Missouri that is
102 the owner or operator of a project facility, offers health insurance to all full-
103 time employees of all facilities located in this state, and pays at least fifty
104 percent of such insurance premiums. For the purposes of sections 620.1875 to
105 620.1890, the term "qualified company" shall not include:
106 (a) Gambling establishments (NAICS industry group 7132);
107 (b) Retail trade establishments (NAICS sectors 44 and 45);
108 (c) Food and drinking places (NAICS subsector 722);
109 (d) Public utilities (NAICS 221 including water and sewer services);
110 (e) Any company that is delinquent in the payment of any
111 nonprotested taxes or any other amounts due the state or federal government
112 or any other political subdivision of this state;
113 (f) Any company that has filed for or has publicly announced its
114 intention to file for bankruptcy protection. However, a company that has filed
115 for or has publicly announced its intention to file for bankruptcy between
116 January 1, 2009, and December 31, 2009, may be a qualified company
117 provided that such company:

HB 3329 89
118 a. Certifies to the department that it plans to reorganize and not to
119 liquidate; and
120 b. After its bankruptcy petition has been filed, it produces proof, in a
121 form and at times satisfactory to the department, that it is not delinquent in
122 filing any tax returns or making any payment due to the state of Missouri,
123 including but not limited to all tax payments due after the filing of the
124 bankruptcy petition and under the terms of the plan of reorganization.
125
126 Any taxpayer who is awarded benefits under this subsection and who files for
127 bankruptcy under Chapter 7 of the United States Bankruptcy Code, Title 11
128 U.S.C., shall immediately notify the department and shall forfeit such benefits
129 and shall repay the state an amount equal to any state tax credits already
130 redeemed and any withholding taxes already retained;
131 (g) Educational services (NAICS sector 61);
132 (h) Religious organizations (NAICS industry group 8131);
133 (i) Public administration (NAICS sector 92);
134 (j) Ethanol distillation or production; or
135 (k) Biodiesel production.
136
137 Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the headquarters
138 or administrative offices of an otherwise excluded business may qualify for
139 benefits if the offices serve a multistate territory. In the event a national, state,
140 or regional headquarters operation is not the predominant activity of a project
141 facility, the new jobs and investment of such headquarters operation is
142 considered eligible for benefits under this section if the other requirements are
143 satisfied;
144 (24) "Qualified renewable energy sources" shall not be construed to
145 include ethanol distillation or production or biodiesel production; however, it
146 shall include:
147 (a) Open-looped biomass;
148 (b) Close-looped biomass;
149 (c) Solar;
150 (d) Wind;
151 (e) Geothermal; and
152 (f) Hydropower;
153 (25) "Related company" means:
154 (a) A corporation, partnership, trust, or association controlled by the
155 qualified company;
156 (b) An individual, corporation, partnership, trust, or association in
157 control of the qualified company; or
158 (c) Corporations, partnerships, trusts or associations controlled by an
159 individual, corporation, partnership, trust or association in control of the
160 qualified company. As used in this subdivision, "control of a corporation"
161 shall mean ownership, directly or indirectly, of stock possessing at least fifty
162 percent of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock entitled to
163 vote, "control of a partnership or association" shall mean ownership of at least
164 fifty percent of the capital or profits interest in such partnership or association,
165 "control of a trust" shall mean ownership, directly or indirectly, of at least fifty

HB 3329 90
166 percent of the beneficial interest in the principal or income of such trust, and
167 ownership shall be determined as provided in Section 318 of the Internal
168 Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
169 (26) "Related facility", a facility operated by the qualified company or
170 a related company located in this state that is directly related to the operations
171 of the project facility;
172 (27) "Related facility base employment", the greater of the number of
173 full-time employees located at all related facilities on the date of the notice of
174 intent or for the twelve-month period prior to the date of the notice of intent,
175 the average number of full-time employees located at all related facilities of
176 the qualified company or a related company located in this state;
177 (28) "Related facility base payroll", the total amount of taxable wages
178 paid by the qualified company to full-time employees of the qualified
179 company located at a related facility in the twelve months prior to the filing of
180 the notice of intent, not including the payroll of the owners of the qualified
181 company unless the qualified company is participating in an employee stock
182 ownership plan. For purposes of calculating the benefits under this program,
183 the amount of related facility base payroll shall increase each year based on an
184 appropriate measure, as determined by the department;
185 (29) "Rural area", a county in Missouri with a population less than
186 seventy-five thousand or that does not contain an individual city with a
187 population greater than fifty thousand according to the most recent federal
188 decennial census;
189 (30) "Small and expanding business project", a qualified company that
190 within two years of the date of the approval creates a minimum of twenty new
191 jobs if the project facility is located in a rural area or a minimum of forty new
192 jobs if the project facility is not located in a rural area and creates fewer than
193 one hundred new jobs regardless of the location of the project facility;
194 (31) "Tax credits", tax credits issued by the department to offset the
195 state income taxes imposed by chapters 143 and 148, or which may be sold or
196 refunded as provided for in this program;
197 (32) "Technology business project", a qualified company that within
198 two years of the date of the approval creates a minimum of ten new jobs
199 involved in the operations of a company:
200 (a) Which is a technology company, as determined by a regulation
201 promulgated by the department under the provisions of section 620.1884 or
202 classified by NAICS codes;
203 (b) Which owns or leases a facility which produces electricity derived
204 from qualified renewable energy sources, or produces fuel for the generation
205 of electricity from qualified renewable energy sources, but does not include
206 any company that has received the alcohol mixture credit, alcohol credit, or
207 small ethanol producer credit pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Section 40 of the tax code
208 in the previous tax year;
209 (c) Which researches, develops, or manufactures power system
210 technology for: aerospace; space; defense; hybrid vehicles; or implantable or
211 wearable medical devices; or

HB 3329 91
212 (d) Which is a clinical molecular diagnostic laboratory focused on
213 detecting and monitoring infections in immunocompromised patient
214 populations;
215 (33) "Withholding tax", the state tax imposed by sections 143.191 to
216 143.265. For purposes of this program, the withholding tax shall be computed
217 using a schedule as determined by the department based on average wages.]
[620.1881. 1. The department of economic development shall respond
within thirty days to a company who provides a notice of intent with either an
approval or a rejection of the notice of intent. The department shall give
preference to qualified companies and projects targeted at an area of the state
which has recently been classified as a disaster area by the federal government.
Failure to respond on behalf of the department of economic development shall
result in the notice of intent being deemed an approval for the purposes of this
section. A qualified company who is provided an approval for a project shall
be allowed a benefit as provided in this program in the amount and duration
provided in this section. A qualified company may receive additional periods
for subsequent new jobs at the same facility after the full initial period if the
minimum thresholds are met as set forth in sections 620.1875 to 620.1890.
There is no limit on the number of periods a qualified company may
participate in the program, as long as the minimum thresholds are achieved
and the qualified company provides the department with the required reporting
and is in proper compliance for this program or other state programs. A
qualified company may elect to file a notice of intent to start a new project
period concurrent with an existing project period if the minimum thresholds
are achieved and the qualified company provides the department with the
required reporting and is in proper compliance for this program and other state
programs; however, the qualified company may not receive any further benefit
under the original approval for jobs created after the date of the new notice of
intent, and any jobs created before the new notice of intent may not be
included as new jobs for the purpose of benefit calculation in relation to the
new approval. When a qualified company has filed and received approval of a
notice of intent and subsequently files another notice of intent, the department
shall apply the definition of project facility under subdivision (19) of section
620.1878 to the new notice of intent as well as all previously approved notices
of intent and shall determine the application of the definitions of new job, new
payroll, project facility base employment, and project facility base payroll
accordingly.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any qualified
company that is awarded benefits under this program may not simultaneously
receive tax credits or exemptions under sections 135.100 to 135.150, sections
135.200 to 135.286, section 135.535, or sections 135.900 to 135.906 at the
same project facility. The benefits available to the company under any other
state programs for which the company is eligible and which utilize
withholding tax from the new jobs of the company must first be credited to
the other state program before the withholding retention level applicable under
the Missouri quality jobs act will begin to accrue. These other state programs
include, but are not limited to, the Missouri works jobs training program under

HB 3329 92
sections 620.800 to 620.809, the real property tax increment allocation
redevelopment act, sections 99.800 to 99.865, or the Missouri downtown and
rural economic stimulus act under sections 99.915 to 99.980. If any qualified
company also participates in the Missouri works jobs training program in
sections 620.800 to 620.809, the company shall retain no withholding tax, but
the department shall issue a refundable tax credit for the full amount of benefit
allowed under this subdivision. The calendar year annual maximum amount
of tax credits which may be issued to a qualifying company that also
participates in the new job training program shall be increased by an amount
equivalent to the withholding tax retained by that company under the new jobs
training program. However, if the combined benefits of the quality jobs
program and the new jobs training program exceed the projected state benefit
of the project, as determined by the department of economic development
through a cost-benefit analysis, the increase in the maximum tax credits shall
be limited to the amount that would not cause the combined benefits to exceed
the projected state benefit. Any taxpayer who is awarded benefits under this
program who knowingly hires individuals who are not allowed to work legally
in the United States shall immediately forfeit such benefits and shall repay the
state an amount equal to any state tax credits already redeemed and any
withholding taxes already retained.
3. The types of projects and the amount of benefits to be provided are:
(1) Small and expanding business projects: in exchange for the
consideration provided by the new tax revenues and other economic stimuli
that will be generated by the new jobs created by the program, a qualified
company may retain an amount equal to the withholding tax as calculated
under subdivision (33) of section 620.1878 from the new jobs that would
otherwise be withheld and remitted by the qualified company under the
provisions of sections 143.191 to 143.265 for a period of three years from the
date the required number of new jobs were created if the average wage of the
new payroll equals or exceeds the county average wage or for a period of five
years from the date the required number of new jobs were created if the
average wage of the new payroll equals or exceeds one hundred twenty
percent of the county average wage;
(2) Technology business projects: in exchange for the consideration
provided by the new tax revenues and other economic stimuli that will be
generated by the new jobs created by the program, a qualified company may
retain an amount equal to a maximum of five percent of new payroll for a
period of five years from the date the required number of jobs were created
from the withholding tax of the new jobs that would otherwise be withheld and
remitted by the qualified company under the provisions of sections 143.191 to
143.265 if the average wage of the new payroll equals or exceeds the county
average wage. An additional one-half percent of new payroll may be added to
the five percent maximum if the average wage of the new payroll in any year
exceeds one hundred twenty percent of the county average wage in the county
in which the project facility is located, plus an additional one-half percent of
new payroll may be added if the average wage of the new payroll in any year
exceeds one hundred forty percent of the average wage in the county in which
the project facility is located. The department shall issue a refundable tax

HB 3329 93
credit for any difference between the amount of benefit allowed under this
subdivision and the amount of withholding tax retained by the company, in the
event the withholding tax is not sufficient to provide the entire amount of
benefit due to the qualified company under this subdivision;
(3) High impact projects: in exchange for the consideration provided
by the new tax revenues and other economic stimuli that will be generated by
the new jobs created by the program, a qualified company may retain an
amount from the withholding tax of the new jobs that would otherwise be
withheld and remitted by the qualified company under the provisions of
sections 143.191 to 143.265, equal to three percent of new payroll for a period
100 of five years from the date the required number of jobs were created if the
101 average wage of the new payroll equals or exceeds the county average wage of
102 the county in which the project facility is located. For high-impact projects in
103 a facility located within two adjacent counties, the new payroll shall equal or
104 exceed the higher county average wage of the adjacent counties. The
105 percentage of payroll allowed under this subdivision shall be three and one-
106 half percent of new payroll if the average wage of the new payroll in any year
107 exceeds one hundred twenty percent of the county average wage in the county
108 in which the project facility is located. The percentage of payroll allowed
109 under this subdivision shall be four percent of new payroll if the average wage
110 of the new payroll in any year exceeds one hundred forty percent of the county
111 average wage in the county in which the project facility is located. An
112 additional one percent of new payroll may be added to these percentages if
113 local incentives equal between ten percent and twenty-four percent of the new
114 direct local revenue; an additional two percent of new payroll is added to these
115 percentages if the local incentives equal between twenty-five percent and
116 forty-nine percent of the new direct local revenue; or an additional three
117 percent of payroll is added to these percentages if the local incentives equal
118 fifty percent or more of the new direct local revenue. The department shall
119 issue a refundable tax credit for any difference between the amount of benefit
120 allowed under this subdivision and the amount of withholding tax retained by
121 the company, in the event the withholding tax is not sufficient to provide the
122 entire amount of benefit due to the qualified company under this subdivision;
123 (4) Job retention projects: a qualified company may receive a tax
124 credit for the retention of jobs in this state, provided the qualified company and
125 the project meets all of the following conditions:
126 (a) For each of the twenty-four months preceding the year in which
127 application for the program is made the qualified company must have
128 maintained at least one thousand full-time employees at the employer's site in
129 the state at which the jobs are based, and the average wage of such employees
130 must meet or exceed the county average wage;
131 (b) The qualified company retained at the project facility the level of
132 full-time employees that existed in the taxable year immediately preceding the
133 year in which application for the program is made;
134 (c) The qualified company is considered to have a significant
135 statewide effect on the economy, and has been determined to represent a
136 substantial risk of relocation from the state by the quality jobs advisory task
137 force established in section 620.1887; provided, however, until such time as

HB 3329 94
138 the initial at-large members of the quality jobs advisory task force are
139 appointed, this determination shall be made by the director of the department
140 of economic development;
141 (d) The qualified company in the project facility will cause to be
142 invested a minimum of seventy million dollars in new investment prior to the
143 end of two years or will cause to be invested a minimum of thirty million
144 dollars in new investment prior to the end of two years and maintain an annual
145 payroll of at least seventy million dollars during each of the years for which a
146 credit is claimed; and
147 (e) The local taxing entities shall provide local incentives of at least
148 fifty percent of the new direct local revenues created by the project over a ten-
149 year period.
150
151 The quality jobs advisory task force may recommend to the department of
152 economic development that appropriate penalties be applied to the company
153 for violating the agreement. The amount of the job retention credit granted
154 may be equal to up to fifty percent of the amount of withholding tax generated
155 by the full-time jobs at the project facility for a period of five years. The
156 calendar year annual maximum amount of tax credit that may be issued to any
157 qualified company for a job retention project or combination of job retention
158 projects shall be seven hundred fifty thousand dollars per year, but the
159 maximum amount may be increased up to one million dollars if such action is
160 proposed by the department and approved by the quality jobs advisory task
161 force established in section 620.1887; provided, however, until such time as
162 the initial at-large members of the quality jobs advisory task force are
163 appointed, this determination shall be made by the director of the department
164 of economic development. In considering such a request, the task force shall
165 rely on economic modeling and other information supplied by the department
166 when requesting the increased limit on behalf of the job retention project. In
167 no event shall the total amount of all tax credits issued for the entire job
168 retention program under this subdivision exceed three million dollars annually.
169 Notwithstanding the above, no tax credits shall be issued for job retention
170 projects approved by the department after August 30, 2013;
171 (5) Small business job retention and flood survivor relief: a qualified
172 company may receive a tax credit under sections 620.1875 to 620.1890 for the
173 retention of jobs and flood survivor relief in this state for each job retained
174 over a three-year period, provided that:
175 (a) The qualified company did not receive any state or federal benefits,
176 incentives, or tax relief or abatement in locating its facility in a flood plain;
177 (b) The qualified company and related companies have fewer than one
178 hundred employees at the time application for the program is made;
179 (c) The average wage of the qualified company's and related
180 companies' employees must meet or exceed the county average wage;
181 (d) All of the qualified company's and related companies' facilities are
182 located in this state;
183 (e) The facilities at the primary business site in this state have been
184 directly damaged by floodwater rising above the level of a five hundred year

HB 3329 95
185 flood at least two years, but fewer than eight years, prior to the time
186 application is made;
187 (f) The qualified company made significant efforts to protect the
188 facilities prior to any impending danger from rising floodwaters;
189 (g) For each year it receives tax credits under sections 620.1875 to
190 620.1890, the qualified company and related companies retained, at the
191 company's facilities in this state, at least the level of full-time, year-round
192 employees that existed in the taxable year immediately preceding the year in
193 which application for the program is made; and
194 (h) In the years it receives tax credits under sections 620.1875 to
195 620.1890, the company cumulatively invests at least two million dollars in
196 capital improvements in facilities and equipment located at such facilities that
197 are not located within a five hundred year flood plain as designated by the
198 Federal Emergency Management Agency, and amended from time to time.
199 The amount of the small business job retention and flood survivor relief credit
200 granted may be equal to up to one hundred percent of the amount of
201 withholding tax generated by the full-time jobs at the project facility for a
202 period of three years. The calendar year annual maximum amount of tax credit
203 that may be issued to any qualified company for a small business job retention
204 and survivor relief project shall be two hundred fifty thousand dollars per year,
205 but the maximum amount may be increased up to five hundred thousand
206 dollars if such action is proposed by the department and approved by the
207 quality jobs advisory task force established in section 620.1887. In
208 considering such a request, the task force shall rely on economic modeling
209 and other information supplied by the department when requesting an increase
210 in the limit on behalf of the small business job retention and flood survivor
211 relief project. In no event shall the total amount of all tax credits issued for the
212 entire small business job retention and flood survivor relief program under this
213 subdivision exceed five hundred thousand dollars annually. Notwithstanding
214 the provisions of this subdivision to the contrary, no tax credits shall be issued
215 for small business job retention and flood survivor relief projects approved by
216 the department after August 30, 2010.
217 4. The qualified company shall provide an annual report of the number
218 of jobs and such other information as may be required by the department to
219 document the basis for the benefits of this program. The department may
220 withhold the approval of any benefits until it is satisfied that proper
221 documentation has been provided, and shall reduce the benefits to reflect any
222 reduction in full-time employees or new payroll. Upon approval by the
223 department, the qualified company may begin the retention of the withholding
224 taxes when it reaches the minimum number of new jobs and the average wage
225 exceeds the county average wage. Tax credits, if any, may be issued upon
226 satisfaction by the department that the qualified company has exceeded the
227 county average wage and the minimum number of new jobs. In such annual
228 report, if the average wage is below the county average wage, the qualified
229 company has not maintained the employee insurance as required, or if the
230 number of new jobs is below the minimum, the qualified company shall not
231 receive tax credits or retain the withholding tax for the balance of the benefit
232 period. In the case of a qualified company that initially filed a notice of intent

HB 3329 96
233 and received an approval from the department for high-impact benefits and the
234 minimum number of new jobs in an annual report is below the minimum for
235 high-impact projects, the company shall not receive tax credits for the balance
236 of the benefit period but may continue to retain the withholding taxes if it
237 otherwise meets the requirements of a small and expanding business under this
238 program.
239 5. The maximum calendar year annual tax credits issued for the entire
240 program shall not exceed eighty million dollars. Notwithstanding any
241 provision of law to the contrary, the maximum annual tax credits authorized
242 under section 135.535 are hereby reduced from ten million dollars to eight
243 million dollars, with the balance of two million dollars transferred to this
244 program. There shall be no limit on the amount of withholding taxes that may
245 be retained by approved companies under this program.
246 6. The department shall allocate the annual tax credits based on the
247 date of the approval, reserving such tax credits based on the department's best
248 estimate of new jobs and new payroll of the project, and the other factors in the
249 determination of benefits of this program. However, the annual issuance of tax
250 credits is subject to the annual verification of the actual new payroll. The
251 allocation of tax credits for the period assigned to a project shall expire if,
252 within two years from the date of commencement of operations, or approval if
253 applicable, the minimum thresholds have not been achieved. The qualified
254 company may retain authorized amounts from the withholding tax under this
255 section once the minimum new jobs thresholds are met for the duration of the
256 project period. No benefits shall be provided under this program until the
257 qualified company meets the minimum new jobs thresholds. In the event the
258 qualified company does not meet the minimum new job threshold, the
259 qualified company may submit a new notice of intent or the department may
260 provide a new approval for a new project of the qualified company at the
261 project facility or other facilities.
262 7. For a qualified company with flow-through tax treatment to its
263 members, partners, or shareholders, the tax credit shall be allowed to members,
264 partners, or shareholders in proportion to their share of ownership on the last
265 day of the qualified company's tax period.
266 8. Tax credits may be claimed against taxes otherwise imposed by
267 chapters 143 and 148, and may not be carried forward but shall be claimed
268 within one year of the close of the taxable year for which they were issued,
269 except as provided under subdivision (4) of subsection 3 of this section.
270 9. Tax credits authorized by this section may be transferred, sold, or
271 assigned by filing a notarized endorsement thereof with the department that
272 names the transferee, the amount of tax credit transferred, and the value
273 received for the credit, as well as any other information reasonably requested
274 by the department.
275 10. Prior to the issuance of tax credits, the department shall verify
276 through the department of revenue, or any other state department, that the tax
277 credit applicant does not owe any delinquent income, sales, or use tax or
278 interest or penalties on such taxes, or any delinquent fees or assessments levied
279 by any state department and through the department of commerce and
280 insurance that the applicant does not owe any delinquent insurance taxes.

HB 3329 97
281 Such delinquency shall not affect the authorization of the application for such
282 tax credits, except that at issuance credits shall be first applied to the
283 delinquency and any amount issued shall be reduced by the applicant's tax
284 delinquency. If the department of revenue or the department of commerce and
285 insurance, or any other state department, concludes that a taxpayer is
286 delinquent after June fifteenth but before July first of any year and the
287 application of tax credits to such delinquency causes a tax deficiency on behalf
288 of the taxpayer to arise, then the taxpayer shall be granted thirty days to satisfy
289 the deficiency in which interest, penalties, and additions to tax shall be tolled.
290 After applying all available credits toward a tax delinquency, the administering
291 agency shall notify the appropriate department and that department shall
292 update the amount of outstanding delinquent tax owed by the applicant. If any
293 credits remain after satisfying all insurance, income, sales, and use tax
294 delinquencies, the remaining credits shall be issued to the applicant, subject to
295 the restrictions of other provisions of law.
296 11. Except as provided under subdivision (4) of subsection 3 of this
297 section, the director of revenue shall issue a refund to the qualified company to
298 the extent that the amount of credits allowed in this section exceeds the
299 amount of the qualified company's income tax.
300 12. An employee of a qualified company will receive full credit for the
301 amount of tax withheld as provided in section 143.211.
302 13. If any provision of sections 620.1875 to 620.1890 or application
303 thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not
304 affect other provisions or application of these sections which can be given
305 effect without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end, the
306 provisions of sections 620.1875 to 620.1890 are hereby declared severable.]
[620.1884. The department may adopt such rules, statements of policy,
procedures, forms, and guidelines as may be necessary to carry out the
provisions of sections 620.1875 to 620.1890. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2005, shall be invalid and void.]
[620.1887. There is hereby created a volunteer task force, to be known
as the "Quality Jobs Advisory Task Force", which shall consist of the
chairperson of the economic development committee of the Missouri senate or
his or her designee, a member of the economic development committee of the
Missouri senate appointed by the minority leader of the Missouri senate, the
chairperson of the economic development committee of the Missouri house of
representatives or his or her designee, a member of the economic development
committee of the Missouri house of representatives appointed by the minority
leader of the Missouri house of representatives, the director of the department

HB 3329 98
of economic development or his or her designee, and two members to be
appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate.]
[620.1890. Prior to March first each year, the department will provide
a report on the program to the general assembly including the names of
participating companies, location of such companies, the annual amount of
benefits provided, the estimated net state fiscal impact (direct and indirect new
state taxes derived from the project), the number of new jobs created or jobs
retained, the average wages of each project, and the types of qualified
companies using the program.]
[620.2600. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the
"Innovation Campus Tax Credit Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Certificate", a tax credit certificate issued under this section;
(2) "Department", the Missouri department of economic development;
(3) "Eligible donation", donations received from a taxpayer by
innovation campuses that are to be used solely for projects that advance
learning in the areas of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics.
Eligible donations may include cash, publicly traded stocks and bonds, and
real estate that shall and will be valued and documented according to the rules
promulgated by the department of economic development;
(4) "Innovation education campus" or "innovation campus", as defined
in section 178.1100, an educational partnership consisting of at least one of
each of the following entities:
(a) A local Missouri high school or K-12 school district;
(b) A Missouri four-year public or private higher education institution;
(c) A Missouri-based business or businesses; and
(d) A Missouri two-year public higher education institution or state
technical college of Missouri;
(5) "Taxpayer", any of the following individuals or entities who make
an eligible donation to any innovation campus:
(a) A person, firm, partner in a firm, corporation, or a shareholder in
an S corporation doing business in the state of Missouri and subject to the state
income tax imposed in chapter 143;
(b) A corporation subject to the annual corporation franchise tax
imposed in chapter 147;
(c) An insurance company paying an annual tax on its gross premium
receipts in this state;
(d) Any other financial institution paying taxes to the state of Missouri
or any political subdivisions of this state under chapter 148;
(e) An individual subject to the state income tax imposed in chapter
143;
(f) Any charitable organization which is exempt from federal income
tax and whose Missouri unrelated business taxable income, if any, would be
subject to the state income tax imposed under chapter 143.
3. For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, any
taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the taxes otherwise due under

HB 3329 99
chapters 147, 148, or 143, excluding withholding tax imposed by sections
143.191 to 143.265, in an amount equal to fifty percent of the amount of an
eligible donation, subject to the restrictions in this section. The amount of the
tax credit claimed shall not exceed the amount of the taxpayer's state income
tax liability in the tax year for which the credit is claimed. Any amount of
credit that the taxpayer is prohibited by this section from claiming in a tax year
shall not be refundable, but may be carried forward to any of the taxpayer's
four subsequent taxable years.
4. To claim the credit authorized in this section, an innovation campus
may submit to the department an application for the tax credit authorized by
this section on behalf of taxpayers. The department shall verify that the
innovation campus has submitted the following items:
(1) A valid application in the form and format required by the
department;
(2) A statement attesting to the eligible donation received, which shall
include the name and taxpayer identification number of the individual or
taxpayer making the eligible donation, the amount of the eligible donation, and
the date the eligible donation was received by the innovation campus; and
(3) Payment from the innovation campus equal to the value of the tax
credit for which application is made.

If the innovation campus applying for the tax credit meets all criteria required
by this subsection, the department shall issue a certificate in the appropriate
amount.
5. Tax credits issued under this section may be assigned, transferred,
sold, or otherwise conveyed, and the new owner of the tax credit shall have the
same rights in the credit as the taxpayer. Whenever a certificate is assigned,
transferred, sold, or otherwise conveyed, a notarized endorsement shall be
filed with the department specifying the name and address of the new owner of
the tax credit and the value of the credit.
6. The department may promulgate rules to implement the provisions
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions
of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
assembly under and pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2014, shall be invalid and void.
7. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The program authorized under this section shall expire six years
after August 28, 2014, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
section shall automatically sunset twelve years after August 28, 2014; and

HB 3329 100
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
under this section is sunset.]
✔